Ohio, session 136, HB455.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That sections 109.57, 109.803, 124.011, 133.06, 135.142, 135.143, 149.41, 2151.354, 2152.19, 2915.092, 2919.24, 2921.44, 3301.01, 3301.02, 3301.03, 3301.07, 3301.079, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0716, 3301.0730, 3301.111, 3301.12, 3301.133, 3301.45, 3301.52, 3301.85, 3302.01, 3302.02, 3302.021, 3302.03, 3302.034, 3302.035, 3302.04, 3302.05, 3302.07, 3302.10, 3302.12, 3302.13, 3302.151, 3302.17, 3302.21, 3302.41, 3307.01, 3309.01, 3309.011, 3310.03, 3310.14, 3310.522, 3311.242, 3311.741, 3311.80, 3313.11, 3313.411, 3313.413, 3313.483, 3313.603, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.612, 3313.614, 3313.618, 3313.6110, 3313.6111, 3313.6112, 3313.6113, 3313.6114, 3313.64, 3313.661, 3313.663, 3313.664, 3313.6611, 3313.7112, 3313.7118, 3313.753, 3313.814, 3313.902, 3314.016, 3314.017, 3314.02, 3314.031, 3314.034, 3314.35, 3314.351, 3314.353, 3314.362, 3315.42, 3316.03, 3316.04, 3316.06, 3316.14, 3317.02, 3317.023, 3317.03, 3317.18, 3317.25, 3319.2310, 3319.31, 3319.311, 3319.319, 3319.39, 3319.393, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3325.08, 3326.11, 3327.014, 3331.02, 3333.041, 3333.048, 3333.301, 3345.061, 3365.01, 3365.032, 3365.07, 3728.01, 3737.07, 3781.106, 3792.04, 4109.07, 4117.01, 4723.483, 4723.4811, 4729.01, 4729.513, 4729.541, 4730.433, 4730.437, 4731.92, 4731.96, 5104.53, 5502.262, 5705.212, 5705.213, 5753.11, and 6109.121 be amended and new section 3314.25 and sections 3314.252 and 3319.265 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 109.57. (A)(1) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall procure from wherever procurable and file for record photographs, pictures, descriptions, fingerprints, measurements, and other information that may be pertinent of all persons who have been convicted of committing within this state a felony, any crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, or any misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, of all children under eighteen years of age who have been adjudicated delinquent children for committing within this state an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult or who have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to committing within this state a felony or an offense of violence, and of all well-known and habitual criminals. The person in charge of any county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution and the person in charge of any state institution having custody of a person suspected of having committed a felony, any crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, or any misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code or having custody of a child under eighteen years of age with respect to whom there is probable cause to believe that the child may have committed an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult shall furnish such material to the superintendent of the bureau. Fingerprints, photographs, or other descriptive information of a child who is under eighteen years of age, has not been arrested or otherwise taken into custody for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence who is not in any other category of child specified in this division, if committed by an adult, has not been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, has not been convicted of or pleaded guilty to committing a felony or an offense of violence, and is not a child with respect to whom there is probable cause to believe that the child may have committed an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult shall not be procured by the superintendent or furnished by any person in charge of any county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution, except as authorized in section 2151.313 of the Revised Code. (2) Every clerk of a court of record in this state, other than the supreme court or a court of appeals, shall send to the superintendent of the bureau a weekly report containing a summary of each case involving a felony, involving any crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, involving a misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, or involving an adjudication in a case in which a child under eighteen years of age was alleged to be a delinquent child for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult. The clerk of the court of common pleas shall include in the report and summary the clerk sends under this division all information described in divisions (A)(2)(a) to (f) of this section regarding a case before the court of appeals that is served by that clerk. The summary shall be written on the standard forms furnished by the superintendent pursuant to division (B) of this section and shall include the following information: (a) The incident tracking number contained on the standard forms furnished by the superintendent pursuant to division (B) of this section; (b) The style and number of the case; (c) The date of arrest, offense, summons, or arraignment; (d) The date that the person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense, adjudicated a delinquent child for committing the act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, found not guilty of the offense, or found not to be a delinquent child for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, the date of an entry dismissing the charge, an entry declaring a mistrial of the offense in which the person is discharged, an entry finding that the person or child is not competent to stand trial, or an entry of a nolle prosequi, or the date of any other determination that constitutes final resolution of the case; (e) A statement of the original charge with the section of the Revised Code that was alleged to be violated; (f) If the person or child was convicted, pleaded guilty, or was adjudicated a delinquent child, the sentence or terms of probation imposed or any other disposition of the offender or the delinquent child. If the offense involved the disarming of a law enforcement officer or an attempt to disarm a law enforcement officer, the clerk shall clearly state that fact in the summary, and the superintendent shall ensure that a clear statement of that fact is placed in the bureau's records. (3) The superintendent shall cooperate with and assist sheriffs, chiefs of police, and other law enforcement officers in the establishment of a complete system of criminal identification and in obtaining fingerprints and other means of identification of all persons arrested on a charge of a felony, any crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, or a misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and of all children under eighteen years of age arrested or otherwise taken into custody for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult. The superintendent also shall file for record the fingerprint impressions of all persons confined in a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution for the violation of state laws and of all children under eighteen years of age who are confined in a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution or in any facility for delinquent children for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, and any other information that the superintendent may receive from law enforcement officials of the state and its political subdivisions. (4) The superintendent shall carry out Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code with respect to the registration of persons who are convicted of or plead guilty to a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense and with respect to all other duties imposed on the bureau under that chapter. (5) The bureau shall perform centralized recordkeeping functions for criminal history records and services in this state for purposes of the national crime prevention and privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised Code and is the criminal history record repository as defined in that section for purposes of that compact. The superintendent or the superintendent's designee is the compact officer for purposes of that compact and shall carry out the responsibilities of the compact officer specified in that compact. (6) The superintendent shall, upon request, assist a county coroner in the identification of a deceased person through the use of fingerprint impressions obtained pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section or collected pursuant to section 109.572 or 311.41 of the Revised Code. (B) The superintendent shall prepare and furnish to every county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution and to every clerk of a court in this state specified in division (A)(2) of this section standard forms for reporting the information required under division (A) of this section. The standard forms that the superintendent prepares pursuant to this division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, or in both tangible formats and electronic formats. (C)(1) The superintendent may operate a center for electronic, automated, or other data processing for the storage and retrieval of information, data, and statistics pertaining to criminals and to children under eighteen years of age who are adjudicated delinquent children for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, criminal activity, crime prevention, law enforcement, and criminal justice, and may establish and operate a statewide communications network to be known as the Ohio law enforcement gateway to gather and disseminate information, data, and statistics for the use of law enforcement agencies and for other uses specified in this division. The superintendent may gather, store, retrieve, and disseminate information, data, and statistics that pertain to children who are under eighteen years of age and that are gathered pursuant to sections 109.57 to 109.61 of the Revised Code together with information, data, and statistics that pertain to adults and that are gathered pursuant to those sections. (2) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee shall gather information of the nature described in division (C)(1) of this section that pertains to the offense and delinquency history of a person who has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense for inclusion in the state registry of sex offenders and child-victim offenders maintained pursuant to division (A)(1) of section 2950.13 of the Revised Code and in the internet database operated pursuant to division (A)(13) of that section and for possible inclusion in the internet database operated pursuant to division (A)(11) of that section. (3) In addition to any other authorized use of information, data, and statistics of the nature described in division (C)(1) of this section, the superintendent or the superintendent's designee may provide and exchange the information, data, and statistics pursuant to the national crime prevention and privacy compact as described in division (A)(5) of this section. (4) The Ohio law enforcement gateway shall contain the name, confidential address, and telephone number of program participants in the address confidentiality program established under sections 111.41 to 111.47 of the Revised Code. (5) The attorney general may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing guidelines for the operation of and participation in the Ohio law enforcement gateway. The rules may include criteria for granting and restricting access to information gathered and disseminated through the Ohio law enforcement gateway. The attorney general shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that grant access to information in the gateway regarding an address confidentiality program participant under sections 111.41 to 111.47 of the Revised Code to only chiefs of police, village marshals, county sheriffs, county prosecuting attorneys, and a designee of each of these individuals. The attorney general shall permit an office of a county coroner, the state medical board, and board of nursing to access and view, but not alter, information gathered and disseminated through the Ohio law enforcement gateway. The attorney general may appoint a steering committee to advise the attorney general in the operation of the Ohio law enforcement gateway that is comprised of persons who are representatives of the criminal justice agencies in this state that use the Ohio law enforcement gateway and is chaired by the superintendent or the superintendent's designee. (D)(1) The following are not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code: (a) Information and materials furnished to the superintendent pursuant to division (A) of this section; (b) Information, data, and statistics gathered or disseminated through the Ohio law enforcement gateway pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section; (c) Information and materials furnished to any board or person under division (F) or (G) of this section. (2) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee shall gather and retain information so furnished under division (A) of this section that pertains to the offense and delinquency history of a person who has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense for the purposes described in division (C)(2) of this section. (E)(1) The attorney general shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and subject to division (E)(2) of this section, setting forth the procedure by which a person may receive or release information gathered by the superintendent pursuant to division (A) of this section. A reasonable fee may be charged for this service. If a temporary employment service submits a request for a determination of whether a person the service plans to refer to an employment position has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense listed or described in division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, the request shall be treated as a single request and only one fee shall be charged. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (E)(3) or (4) of this section, a rule adopted under division (E)(1) of this section may provide only for the release of information gathered pursuant to division (A) of this section that relates to the conviction of a person, or a person's plea of guilty to, a criminal offense or to the arrest of a person as provided in division (E)(3) of this section. The superintendent shall not release, and the attorney general shall not adopt any rule under division (E)(1) of this section that permits the release of, any information gathered pursuant to division (A) of this section that relates to an adjudication of a child as a delinquent child, or that relates to a criminal conviction of a person under eighteen years of age if the person's case was transferred back to a juvenile court under division (B)(2) or (3) of section 2152.121 of the Revised Code and the juvenile court imposed a disposition or serious youthful offender disposition upon the person under either division, unless either of the following applies with respect to the adjudication or conviction: (a) The adjudication or conviction was for a violation of section 2903.01 or 2903.02 of the Revised Code. (b) The adjudication or conviction was for a sexually oriented offense, the juvenile court was required to classify the child a juvenile offender registrant for that offense under section 2152.82, 2152.83, or 2152.86 of the Revised Code, that classification has not been removed, and the records of the adjudication or conviction have not been sealed or expunged pursuant to sections 2151.355 to 2151.358 or sealed or expunged pursuant to section 2953.32 of the Revised Code. (3) A rule adopted under division (E)(1) of this section may provide for the release of information gathered pursuant to division (A) of this section that relates to the arrest of a person who is eighteen years of age or older when the person has not been convicted as a result of that arrest if any of the following applies: (a) The arrest was made outside of this state. (b) A criminal action resulting from the arrest is pending, and the superintendent confirms that the criminal action has not been resolved at the time the criminal records check is performed. (c) The bureau cannot reasonably determine whether a criminal action resulting from the arrest is pending, and not more than one year has elapsed since the date of the arrest. (4) A rule adopted under division (E)(1) of this section may provide for the release of information gathered pursuant to division (A) of this section that relates to an adjudication of a child as a delinquent child if not more than five years have elapsed since the date of the adjudication, the adjudication was for an act that would have been a felony if committed by an adult, the records of the adjudication have not been sealed or expunged pursuant to sections 2151.355 to 2151.358 of the Revised Code, and the request for information is made under division (F) of this section or under section 109.572 of the Revised Code. In the case of an adjudication for a violation of the terms of community control or supervised release, the five-year period shall be calculated from the date of the adjudication to which the community control or supervised release pertains. (F)(1) As used in division (F)(2) of this section, "head start agency" means an entity in this state that has been approved to be an agency for purposes of subchapter II of the "Community Economic Development Act," 95 Stat. 489 (1981), 42 U.S.C.A. 9831, as amended. (2)(a) In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 109.572, 2151.86, 3301.32, 3301.541, division (C) of section 3310.58, or section 3319.39, 3319.391, 3327.10, 3740.11, 5103.053, 5104.013, 5123.081, or 5153.111 of the Revised Code or that is made under section 3314.41, 3319.392, or 3326.25, or 3328.20 of the Revised Code, the board of education of any school district; the director of developmental disabilities; any county board of developmental disabilities; any provider or subcontractor as defined in section 5123.081 of the Revised Code; the chief administrator of any chartered nonpublic school; the chief administrator of a registered private provider that is not also a chartered nonpublic school; the chief administrator of any home health agency; the chief administrator of or person operating any child care center, type A family child care home, or type B family child care home licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code; the chief administrator of or person operating any authorized private before and after school care program; the chief administrator of any head start agency; the executive director of a public children services agency; the operator of a residential facility, as defined in section 2151.46 of the Revised Code; a private company described in section 3314.41, 3319.392, or 3326.25, or 3328.20 of the Revised Code; or an employer described in division (J)(2) of section 3327.10 of the Revised Code may request that the superintendent of the bureau investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment in any position after October 2, 1989, or any individual wishing to apply for employment with a board of education may request, with regard to the individual, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that individual. On receipt of the request, subject to division (E)(2) of this section, the superintendent shall determine whether that information exists and, upon request of the person, board, or entity requesting information, also shall request from the federal bureau of investigation any criminal records it has pertaining to that individual. The superintendent or the superintendent's designee also may request criminal history records from other states or the federal government pursuant to the national crime prevention and privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised Code. Within thirty days of the date that the superintendent receives a request, subject to division (E)(2) of this section, the superintendent shall send to the board, entity, or person a report of any information that the superintendent determines exists, including information contained in records that have been sealed under section 2953.32 of the Revised Code, and, within thirty days of its receipt, subject to division (E)(2) of this section, shall send the board, entity, or person a report of any information received from the federal bureau of investigation, other than information the dissemination of which is prohibited by federal law. (b) When a board of education or a registered private provider is required to receive information under this section as a prerequisite to employment of an individual pursuant to division (C) of section 3310.58 or section 3319.39 of the Revised Code, it may accept a certified copy of records that were issued by the bureau of criminal identification and investigation and that are presented by an individual applying for employment with the district in lieu of requesting that information itself. In such a case, the board shall accept the certified copy issued by the bureau in order to make a photocopy of it for that individual's employment application documents and shall return the certified copy to the individual. In a case of that nature, a district or provider only shall accept a certified copy of records of that nature within one year after the date of their issuance by the bureau. (c) Notwithstanding division (F)(2)(a) of this section, in the case of a request under section 3319.39, 3319.391, or 3327.10 of the Revised Code only for criminal records maintained by the federal bureau of investigation, the superintendent shall not determine whether any information gathered under division (A) of this section exists on the person for whom the request is made. (3) The state board of education or the department of education and workforce may request, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment after October 2, 1989, in any position with the state board or the department of education and workforce, any information that a school district board of education is authorized to request under division (F)(2) of this section, and the superintendent of the bureau shall proceed as if the request has been received from a school district board of education under division (F)(2) of this section. (4) When the superintendent of the bureau receives a request for information under section 3319.291 of the Revised Code, the superintendent shall proceed as if the request has been received from a school district board of education and shall comply with divisions (F)(2)(a) and (c) of this section. (G) In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 3712.09, 3721.121, or 3740.11 of the Revised Code with respect to an individual who has applied for employment in a position that involves providing direct care to an older adult or adult resident, the chief administrator of a home health agency, hospice care program, home licensed under Chapter 3721. of the Revised Code, or adult day-care program operated pursuant to rules adopted under section 3721.04 of the Revised Code may request that the superintendent of the bureau investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied after January 27, 1997, for employment in a position that does not involve providing direct care to an older adult or adult resident, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that individual. In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 173.27 of the Revised Code with respect to an individual who has applied for employment in a position that involves providing ombudsman services to residents of long-term care facilities or recipients of community-based long-term care services, the state long-term care ombudsman, the director of aging, a regional long-term care ombudsman program, or the designee of the ombudsman, director, or program may request that the superintendent investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment in a position that does not involve providing such ombudsman services, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that applicant. In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 173.38 of the Revised Code with respect to an individual who has applied for employment in a direct-care position, the chief administrator of a provider, as defined in section 173.39 of the Revised Code, may request that the superintendent investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment in a position that is not a direct-care position, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that applicant. In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 3712.09 of the Revised Code with respect to an individual who has applied for employment in a position that involves providing direct care to a pediatric respite care patient, the chief administrator of a pediatric respite care program may request that the superintendent of the bureau investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment in a position that does not involve providing direct care to a pediatric respite care patient, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that individual. On receipt of a request under this division, the superintendent shall determine whether that information exists and, on request of the individual requesting information, shall also request from the federal bureau of investigation any criminal records it has pertaining to the applicant. The superintendent or the superintendent's designee also may request criminal history records from other states or the federal government pursuant to the national crime prevention and privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised Code. Within thirty days of the date a request is received, subject to division (E)(2) of this section, the superintendent shall send to the requester a report of any information determined to exist, including information contained in records that have been sealed under section 2953.32 of the Revised Code, and, within thirty days of its receipt, shall send the requester a report of any information received from the federal bureau of investigation, other than information the dissemination of which is prohibited by federal law. (H) Information obtained by a government entity or person under this section is confidential and shall not be released or disseminated. (I) The superintendent may charge a reasonable fee for providing information or criminal records under division (F)(2) or (G) of this section. (J) As used in this section: (1) "Pediatric respite care program" and "pediatric care patient" have the same meanings as in section 3712.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Sexually oriented offense" and "child-victim oriented offense" have the same meanings as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or entity registered with the department of education and workforce under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code to participate in the autism scholarship program or section 3310.58 of the Revised Code to participate in the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program. Sec. 109.803. (A)(1) Subject to divisions (A)(2) and (B) of this section, every appointing authority shall require each of its appointed peace officers and troopers to complete twenty-four hours of continuing professional training each calendar year. Twenty-four hours is intended to be a minimum requirement, and appointing authorities are encouraged to exceed the twenty-four hour minimum. A minimum of twenty-four hours of continuing professional training shall be reimbursed each calendar year and a maximum of forty hours of continuing professional training may be reimbursed each calendar year. (2) An appointing authority may submit a written request to the peace officer training commission that requests for a calendar year because of emergency circumstances an extension of the time within which one or more of its appointed peace officers or troopers must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission, as described in division (A)(1) of this section. A request made under this division shall set forth the name of each of the appointing authority's peace officers or troopers for whom an extension is requested, identify the emergency circumstances related to that peace officer or trooper, include documentation of those emergency circumstances, and set forth the date on which the request is submitted to the commission. A request shall be made under this division not later than the fifteenth day of December in the calendar year for which the extension is requested. Upon receipt of a written request made under this division, the executive director of the commission shall review the request and the submitted documentation. If the executive director of the commission is satisfied that emergency circumstances exist for any peace officer or trooper for whom a request was made under this division, the executive director may approve the request for that peace officer or trooper and grant an extension of the time within which that peace officer or trooper must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission. An extension granted under this division may be for any period of time the executive director believes to be appropriate, and the executive director shall specify in the notice granting the extension the date on which the extension ends. Not later than thirty days after the date on which a request is submitted to the commission, for each peace officer and trooper for whom an extension is requested, the executive director either shall approve the request and grant an extension or deny the request and deny an extension and shall send to the appointing authority that submitted the request written notice of the executive director's decision. If the executive director grants an extension of the time within which a particular appointed peace officer or trooper of an appointing authority must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission, the appointing authority shall require that peace officer or trooper to complete the required minimum number of hours of training not later than the date on which the extension ends. (B) With the advice of the Ohio peace officer training commission, the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code rules setting forth minimum standards for continuing professional training for peace officers and troopers and governing the administration of continuing professional training programs for peace officers and troopers. The rules adopted by the attorney general under division (B) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Allow peace officers and troopers to earn credit for up to four hours of continuing professional training for time spent while on duty providing drug use prevention education training that utilizes evidence-based curricula to students in school districts, community schools established under Chapter 3314., and STEM schools established under Chapter 3326., and college-preparatory boarding schools established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (2) Allow a peace officer or trooper appointed by a law enforcement agency to earn hours of continuing professional training for other peace officers or troopers appointed by the law enforcement agency by providing drug use prevention education training under division (B)(1) of this section so that hours earned by the peace officer or trooper providing the training in excess of four hours may be applied to offset the number of continuing professional training hours required of another peace officer or trooper appointed by that law enforcement agency. (3) Prohibit the use of continuing professional training hours earned under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section from being used to offset any mandatory hands-on training requirement. (4) Require a peace officer to complete training on proper interactions with civilians during traffic stops and other in-person encounters, which training shall have an online offering and shall include all of the following topics: (a) A person's rights during an interaction with a peace officer, including all of the following: (i) When a peace officer may require a person to exit a vehicle; (ii) Constitutional protections from illegal search and seizure; (iii) The rights of a passenger in a vehicle who has been pulled over for a traffic stop; (iv) The right for a citizen to record an encounter with a peace officer. (b) Proper actions for interacting with a civilian and methods for diffusing a stressful encounter with a civilian; (c) Laws regarding questioning and detention by peace officers, including any law requiring a person to present proof of identity to a peace officer, and the consequences for a person's or officer's failure to comply with those laws; (d) Any other requirements and procedures necessary for the proper implementation of this section. (C) The attorney general shall transmit a certified copy of any rule adopted under this section to the secretary of state. (D) As used in this section: (1) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 109.71 of the Revised Code. (2) "Trooper" means an individual appointed as a state highway patrol trooper under section 5503.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Appointing authority" means any agency or entity that appoints a peace officer or trooper. Sec. 124.011. (A) When the territory of a city school district is not located in more than one city, the civil service commission of the city in which the district has territory shall serve as the commission for the school district. When the territory of a city school district is located in more than one city, the commission of the city that shall serve as the commission for the school district shall be the commission of the city that is the residence of the greatest number of the pupils of the district. (B) If the commission determined under division (A) of this section is not the commission of the city that served the district on the effective date of this section, the legislative authority of the city whose commission acted on such date may, on request of the board of education, authorize its commission to continue to serve the district and, if so authorized, the commission shall continue to serve the district. (C) If due to a change in population or school district territory or any other reason the commission of the city determined under division (A) of this section changes, the legislative authority of the city whose commission served the district prior to the change may, on request of the board of education, authorize its commission to continue to serve the district, and if so authorized, the commission shall continue to serve the district. (D) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Revised Code, a city school district and city may enter into a written agreement that the city school district shall not be subject, in whole or in part, to the jurisdiction of the city's civil service commission. Sec. 133.06. (A) A school district shall not incur, without a vote of the electors, net indebtedness that exceeds an amount equal to one-tenth of one per cent of its tax valuation, except as provided in divisions (G) and (H) of this section and in division (D) of section 3313.372 of the Revised Code, or as prescribed in section 3318.052 or 3318.44 of the Revised Code, or as provided in division (J) of this section. (B) Except as provided in divisions (E), (F), and (I) of this section, a school district shall not incur net indebtedness that exceeds an amount equal to nine per cent of its tax valuation. (C) A school district shall not submit to a vote of the electors the question of the issuance of securities in an amount that will make the district's net indebtedness after the issuance of the securities exceed an amount equal to four per cent of its tax valuation, unless the director of education and workforce, acting under policies adopted by the department of education and workforce, and the tax commissioner, acting under written policies of the commissioner, consent to the submission. A request for the consents shall be made at least one hundred twenty days prior to the election at which the question is to be submitted. The director of education and workforce shall certify to the district the director's and the tax commissioner's decisions within thirty days after receipt of the request for consents. If the electors do not approve the issuance of securities at the election for which the director of education and workforce and tax commissioner consented to the submission of the question, the school district may submit the same question to the electors on the date that the next special election may be held under section 3501.01 of the Revised Code without submitting a new request for consent. If the school district seeks to submit the same question at any other subsequent election, the district shall first submit a new request for consent in accordance with this division. (D) In calculating the net indebtedness of a school district, none of the following shall be considered: (1) Securities issued to acquire school buses and other equipment used in transporting pupils or issued pursuant to division (D) of section 133.10 of the Revised Code; (2) Securities issued under division (F) of this section and, to the extent in excess of the limitation stated in division (B) of this section, under division (E) of this section; (3) Indebtedness resulting from the dissolution of a joint vocational school district under section 3311.217 of the Revised Code, evidenced by outstanding securities of that joint vocational school district; (4) Loans, evidenced by any securities, received under sections 3313.483, 3317.0210, and 3317.0211 of the Revised Code; (5) Debt incurred under section 3313.374 of the Revised Code; (6) Debt incurred pursuant to division (B)(4) of section 3313.37 of the Revised Code to acquire computers and related hardware; (7) Debt incurred under section 3318.042 of the Revised Code; (8) Debt incurred under section 5705.2112 or 5705.2113 of the Revised Code by the fiscal board of a qualifying partnership of which the school district is a participating school district. (E) A school district may become a special needs district as to certain securities as provided in division (E) of this section. (1) A board of education, by resolution, may declare its school district to be a special needs district by determining both of the following: (a) The student population is not being adequately serviced by the existing permanent improvements of the district. (b) The district cannot obtain sufficient funds by the issuance of securities within the limitation of division (B) of this section to provide additional or improved needed permanent improvements in time to meet the needs. (2) The board of education shall certify a copy of that resolution to the director of education and workforce with a statistical report showing all of the following: (a) The history of and a projection of the growth of the tax valuation; (b) The projected needs; (c) The estimated cost of permanent improvements proposed to meet such projected needs. (3) The director of education and workforce shall certify the district as an approved special needs district if the director finds both of the following: (a) The district does not have available sufficient additional funds from state or federal sources to meet the projected needs. (b) The projection of the potential average growth of tax valuation during the next five years, according to the information certified to the director and any other information the director obtains, indicates a likelihood of potential average growth of tax valuation of the district during the next five years of an average of not less than one and one-half per cent per year. The findings and certification of the director shall be conclusive. (4) An approved special needs district may incur net indebtedness by the issuance of securities in accordance with the provisions of this chapter in an amount that does not exceed an amount equal to the greater of the following: (a) Twelve per cent of the sum of its tax valuation plus an amount that is the product of multiplying that tax valuation by the percentage by which the tax valuation has increased over the tax valuation on the first day of the sixtieth month preceding the month in which its board determines to submit to the electors the question of issuing the proposed securities; (b) Twelve per cent of the sum of its tax valuation plus an amount that is the product of multiplying that tax valuation by the percentage, determined by the director of education and workforce, by which that tax valuation is projected to increase during the next ten years. (F) A school district may issue securities for emergency purposes, in a principal amount that does not exceed an amount equal to three per cent of its tax valuation, as provided in this division. (1) A board of education, by resolution, may declare an emergency if it determines both of the following: (a) School buildings or other necessary school facilities in the district have been wholly or partially destroyed, or condemned by a constituted public authority, or that such buildings or facilities are partially constructed, or so constructed or planned as to require additions and improvements to them before the buildings or facilities are usable for their intended purpose, or that corrections to permanent improvements are necessary to remove or prevent health or safety hazards. (b) Existing fiscal and net indebtedness limitations make adequate replacement, additions, or improvements impossible. (2) Upon the declaration of an emergency, the board of education may, by resolution, submit to the electors of the district pursuant to section 133.18 of the Revised Code the question of issuing securities for the purpose of paying the cost, in excess of any insurance or condemnation proceeds received by the district, of permanent improvements to respond to the emergency need. (3) The procedures for the election shall be as provided in section 133.18 of the Revised Code, except that: (a) The form of the ballot shall describe the emergency existing, refer to this division as the authority under which the emergency is declared, and state that the amount of the proposed securities exceeds the limitations prescribed by division (B) of this section; (b) The resolution required by division (B) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code shall be certified to the county auditor and the board of elections at least one hundred days prior to the election; (c) The county auditor shall advise and, not later than ninety-five days before the election, confirm that advice by certification to, the board of education of the information required by division (C) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code; (d) The board of education shall then certify its resolution and the information required by division (D) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code to the board of elections not less than ninety days prior to the election. (4) Notwithstanding division (B) of section 133.21 of the Revised Code, the first principal payment of securities issued under this division may be set at any date not later than sixty months after the earliest possible principal payment otherwise provided for in that division. (G)(1) The board of education may contract with an architect, professional engineer, or other person experienced in the design and implementation of energy conservation measures for an analysis and recommendations pertaining to installations, modifications of installations, or remodeling that would significantly reduce energy consumption in buildings owned by the district. The report shall include estimates of all costs of such installations, modifications, or remodeling, including costs of design, engineering, installation, maintenance, repairs, measurement and verification of energy savings, and debt service, forgone residual value of materials or equipment replaced by the energy conservation measure, as defined by the Ohio facilities construction commission, a baseline analysis of actual energy consumption data for the preceding three years with the utility baseline based on only the actual energy consumption data for the preceding twelve months, and estimates of the amounts by which energy consumption and resultant operational and maintenance costs, as defined by the commission, would be reduced. If the board finds after receiving the report that the amount of money the district would spend on such installations, modifications, or remodeling is not likely to exceed the amount of money it would save in energy and resultant operational and maintenance costs over the ensuing fifteen years, the board may submit to the commission a copy of its findings and a request for approval to incur indebtedness to finance the making or modification of installations or the remodeling of buildings for the purpose of significantly reducing energy consumption. The facilities construction commission, in consultation with the auditor of state, may deny a request under division (G)(1) of this section by the board of education of any school district that is in a state of fiscal watch pursuant to division (A) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, if it determines that the expenditure of funds is not in the best interest of the school district. No district board of education of a school district that is in a state of fiscal emergency pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code shall submit a request without submitting evidence that the installations, modifications, or remodeling have been approved by the district's financial planning and supervision commission established under section 3316.05 of the Revised Code. No board of education of a school district for which an academic distress commission has been established under section 3302.10 of the Revised Code shall submit a request without first receiving approval to incur indebtedness from the district's academic distress commission established under that section, for so long as such commission continues to be required for the district. (2) The board of education may contract with a person experienced in the implementation of student transportation to produce a report that includes an analysis of and recommendations for the use of alternative fuel vehicles by school districts. The report shall include cost estimates detailing the return on investment over the life of the alternative fuel vehicles and environmental impact of alternative fuel vehicles. The report also shall include estimates of all costs associated with alternative fuel transportation, including facility modifications and vehicle purchase costs or conversion costs. If the board finds after receiving the report that the amount of money the district would spend on purchasing alternative fuel vehicles or vehicle conversion is not likely to exceed the amount of money it would save in fuel and resultant operational and maintenance costs over the ensuing five years, the board may submit to the commission a copy of its findings and a request for approval to incur indebtedness to finance the purchase of new alternative fuel vehicles or vehicle conversions for the purpose of reducing fuel costs. The facilities construction commission, in consultation with the auditor of state, may deny a request under division (G)(2) of this section by the board of education of any school district that is in a state of fiscal watch pursuant to division (A) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, if it determines that the expenditure of funds is not in the best interest of the school district. No district board of education of a school district that is in a state of fiscal emergency pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code shall submit a request without submitting evidence that the purchase or conversion of alternative fuel vehicles has been approved by the district's financial planning and supervision commission established under section 3316.05 of the Revised Code. No board of education of a school district for which an academic distress commission has been established under section 3302.10 of the Revised Code shall submit a request without first receiving approval to incur indebtedness from the district's academic distress commission established under that section, for so long as such commission continues to be required for the district. (3) The facilities construction commission shall approve the board's request provided that the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The commission determines that the board's findings are reasonable. (b) The request for approval is complete. (c) If the request was submitted under division (G)(1) of this section, the installations, modifications, or remodeling are consistent with any project to construct or acquire classroom facilities, or to reconstruct or make additions to existing classroom facilities under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 or sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of the commission's approval, the district may issue securities without a vote of the electors in a principal amount not to exceed nine-tenths of one per cent of its tax valuation for the purpose specified in division (G)(1) or (2) of this section, but the total net indebtedness of the district without a vote of the electors incurred under this and all other sections of the Revised Code, except section 3318.052 of the Revised Code, shall not exceed one per cent of the district's tax valuation. (4)(a) So long as any securities issued under division (G)(1) of this section remain outstanding, the board of education shall monitor the energy consumption and resultant operational and maintenance costs of buildings in which installations or modifications have been made or remodeling has been done pursuant to that division. Except as provided in division (G)(4)(b) of this section, the board shall maintain and annually update a report in a form and manner prescribed by the facilities construction commission documenting the reductions in energy consumption and resultant operational and maintenance cost savings attributable to such installations, modifications, or remodeling. The resultant operational and maintenance cost savings shall be certified by the school district treasurer. The report shall be submitted annually to the commission. (b) If the facilities construction commission verifies that the certified annual reports submitted to the commission by a board of education under division (G)(4)(a) of this section fulfill the guarantee required under division (B) of section 3313.372 of the Revised Code for three consecutive years, the board of education shall no longer be subject to the annual reporting requirements of division (G)(4)(a) of this section. (5) So long as any securities issued under division (G)(2) of this section remain outstanding, the board of education shall monitor the purchase of new alternative fuel vehicles or vehicle conversions pursuant to that division. The board shall maintain and annually update a report in a form and manner prescribed by the facilities construction commission documenting the purchase of new alternative fuel vehicles or vehicle conversions, the associated environmental impact, and return on investment. The resultant fuel and operational and maintenance cost savings shall be certified by the school district treasurer. The report shall be submitted annually to the commission. (H) With the consent of the director of education and workforce, a school district may incur without a vote of the electors net indebtedness that exceeds the amounts stated in divisions (A) and (G) of this section for the purpose of paying costs of permanent improvements, if and to the extent that both of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) The fiscal officer of the school district estimates that receipts of the school district from payments made under or pursuant to agreements entered into pursuant to section 725.02, 1728.10, 3735.671, 5709.081, 5709.082, 5709.40, 5709.41, 5709.45, 5709.57, 5709.62, 5709.63, 5709.632, 5709.73, 5709.78, or 5709.82 of the Revised Code, or distributions under division (C) of section 5709.43 or division (B) of section 5709.47 of the Revised Code, or any combination thereof, are, after accounting for any appropriate coverage requirements, sufficient in time and amount, and are committed by the proceedings, to pay the debt charges on the securities issued to evidence that indebtedness and payable from those receipts, and the taxing authority of the district confirms the fiscal officer's estimate, which confirmation is approved by the director of education and workforce; (2) The fiscal officer of the school district certifies, and the taxing authority of the district confirms, that the district, at the time of the certification and confirmation, reasonably expects to have sufficient revenue available for the purpose of operating such permanent improvements for their intended purpose upon acquisition or completion thereof, and the director of education and workforce approves the taxing authority's confirmation. The maximum maturity of securities issued under division (H) of this section shall be the lesser of twenty years or the maximum maturity calculated under section 133.20 of the Revised Code. (I) A school district may incur net indebtedness by the issuance of securities in accordance with the provisions of this chapter in excess of the limit specified in division (B) or (C) of this section when necessary to raise the school district portion of the basic project cost and any additional funds necessary to participate in a project under Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code, including the cost of items designated by the facilities construction commission as required locally funded initiatives, the cost of other locally funded initiatives in an amount that does not exceed fifty per cent of the district's portion of the basic project cost, and the cost for site acquisition. A school district shall notify the director of education and workforce whenever that district will exceed either limit pursuant to this division. (J) A school district whose portion of the basic project cost of its classroom facilities project under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code is greater than or equal to one hundred million dollars may incur without a vote of the electors net indebtedness in an amount up to two per cent of its tax valuation through the issuance of general obligation securities in order to generate all or part of the amount of its portion of the basic project cost if the controlling board has approved the facilities construction commission's conditional approval of the project under section 3318.04 of the Revised Code. The school district board and the Ohio facilities construction commission shall include the dedication of the proceeds of such securities in the agreement entered into under section 3318.08 of the Revised Code. No state moneys shall be released for a project to which this section applies until the proceeds of any bonds issued under this section that are dedicated for the payment of the school district portion of the project are first deposited into the school district's project construction fund. Sec. 135.142. (A) In addition to the investments authorized by section 135.14 of the Revised Code, any board of education, by a two-thirds vote of its members, may authorize the treasurer of the board of education to invest up to forty per cent of the interim moneys of the board, available for investment at any one time, in either of the following: (1) Commercial paper notes issued by any entity that is defined in division (K) of section 1706.01 of the Revised Code and has assets exceeding five hundred million dollars, and to which notes all of the following apply: (a) The notes are rated at the time of purchase in the highest classification established by at least two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (b) The aggregate value of the notes does not exceed ten per cent of the aggregate value of the outstanding commercial paper of the issuing corporation. (c) The notes mature no later than two hundred seventy days after purchase. (d) The investment in commercial paper notes of a single issuer shall not exceed in the aggregate five per cent of interim moneys of the board available for investment at the time of purchase. (2) Bankers' acceptances of banks that are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation and that mature no later than one hundred eighty days after purchase. (B) No investment authorized pursuant to division (A) of this section shall be made, whether or not authorized by a board of education, unless the treasurer of the board of education has completed additional training for making the types of investments authorized pursuant to division (A) of this section. The type and amount of such training shall be approved and may be conducted by or provided under the supervision of the treasurer of state. (C) The treasurer of the board of education shall prepare annually and submit to the board of education, the director of education and workforce, and the auditor of state, on or before the thirty-first day of August, a report listing each investment made pursuant to division (A) of this section during the preceding fiscal year, income earned from such investments, fees and commissions paid pursuant to division (D) of this section, and any other information required by the board, the director, and the auditor of state. (D) A board of education may make appropriations and expenditures for fees and commissions in connection with investments made pursuant to division (A) of this section. (E)(1) In addition to the investments authorized by section 135.14 of the Revised Code and division (A) of this section, any board of education that is a party to an agreement with the treasurer of state pursuant to division (G) of section 135.143 of the Revised Code and that has outstanding obligations issued under authority of section 133.10 of the Revised Code may authorize the treasurer of the board of education to invest interim moneys of the board in debt interests rated in either of the two highest rating classifications by at least two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations and issued by entities that are defined in division (K) of section 1706.01 of the Revised Code. The debt interests purchased under authority of division (E) of this section shall mature not later than the latest maturity date of the outstanding obligations issued under authority of section 133.10 or 133.301 of the Revised Code. (2) If any of the debt interests acquired under division (E)(1) of this section ceases to be rated as there required, its issuer shall notify the treasurer of state of this fact within twenty-four hours. At any time thereafter the treasurer of state may require collateralization at the rate of one hundred two per cent of any remaining obligation of the entity, with securities authorized for investment under section 135.143 of the Revised Code. The collateral shall be delivered to and held by a custodian acceptable to the treasurer of state, marked to market daily, and any default to be cured within twelve hours. Unlimited substitution shall be allowed of comparable securities. Sec. 135.143. (A) The treasurer of state may invest or execute transactions for any part or all of the interim funds of the state in the following classifications of obligations: (1) United States treasury bills, notes, bonds, or any other obligations or securities issued by the United States treasury or any other obligation guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States; (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, or any other obligations or securities issued by any federal government agency or instrumentality; (3)(a) Bonds, notes, and other obligations of the state of Ohio, including, but not limited to, any obligations issued by the treasurer of state, the Ohio public facilities commission, the Ohio housing finance agency, the Ohio water development authority, the Ohio turnpike infrastructure commission, the Ohio higher educational facility commission, and state institutions of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) Bonds, notes, and other obligations of any state or political subdivision thereof rated in the three highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization and purchased through a registered securities broker or dealer, provided the treasurer of state is not the sole purchaser of the bonds, notes, or other obligations at original issuance. (4)(a) Written repurchase agreements with any eligible Ohio financial institution that is a member of the federal reserve system or federal home loan bank, any registered United States government securities dealer, or any counterparty rated in one of the three highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization or otherwise determined by the treasurer of state to have adequate capital and liquidity, under the terms of which agreement the treasurer of state purchases and the eligible financial institution, dealer, or counterparty agrees unconditionally to repurchase any of the securities that are listed in division (A)(1), (2), (3), (6), or (11) of this section. The market value of securities subject to these transactions must exceed the principal value of the repurchase agreement by an amount specified by the treasurer of state, and the securities must be delivered into the custody of the treasurer of state or the qualified trustee or agent designated by the treasurer of state. The agreement shall contain the requirement that for each transaction pursuant to the agreement, the participating institution, dealer, or counterparty shall provide all of the following information: (i) The par value of the securities; (ii) The type, rate, and maturity date of the securities; (iii) A numerical identifier generally accepted in the securities industry that designates the securities. (b) The treasurer of state also may sell any securities, listed in division (A)(1), (2), (6), or (11) of this section, regardless of maturity or time of redemption of the securities, under the same terms and conditions for repurchase, provided that the securities have been fully paid for and are owned by the treasurer of state at the time of the sale. (c) For purposes of division (A)(4) of this section, the treasurer of state shall only buy or sell securities listed in division (A)(11) of this section issued by entities that are organized under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States. (5) Securities lending agreements with any eligible financial institution that is a member of the federal reserve system or federal home loan bank or any recognized United States government securities dealer, under the terms of which agreements the treasurer of state lends securities and the eligible financial institution or dealer agrees to simultaneously exchange similar securities or cash, equal value for equal value. Securities and cash received as collateral for a securities lending agreement are not interim funds of the state. The investment of cash collateral received pursuant to a securities lending agreement may be invested only in such instruments specified by the treasurer of state in accordance with a written investment policy. (6) Various forms of commercial paper issued by any entity that is organized under the laws of the United States or a state, which notes are rated in the two highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, provided that the total amount invested under this section in any commercial paper at any time shall not exceed forty per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state; (7) Bankers acceptances, maturing in two hundred seventy days or less, provided that the total amount invested in bankers acceptances at any time shall not exceed ten per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state; (8) Certificates of deposit, savings accounts, or deposit accounts in eligible institutions applying for interim moneys as provided in section 135.08 of the Revised Code, including linked deposits as authorized under section 135.61 of the Revised Code. For interim funds invested in accordance with division (A)(8) of this section, the pledging requirements described in section 135.18, 135.181, or 135.182 of the Revised Code may be reduced by up to ten per cent in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state. (9) Negotiable certificates of deposit denominated in United States dollars issued by a nationally or state-chartered bank, a savings association or a federal savings association, a state or federal credit union, or a federally licensed or state-licensed branch of a foreign bank, which are rated in the two highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, provided that the total amount invested under this section in negotiable certificates of deposit at any time shall not exceed twenty-five per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. Interim funds invested in accordance with division (A)(9) of this section are not limited to institutions applying for interim moneys under section 135.08 of the Revised Code, nor are they subject to any pledging requirements described in sections 135.18, 135.181, or 135.182 of the Revised Code. (10) The state treasurer's investment pool authorized under section 135.45 of the Revised Code; (11) Debt interests, other than commercial paper described in division (A)(6) of this section, rated in the four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations and issued by entities that are organized under the laws of the United States or a state, or issued by foreign nations diplomatically recognized by the United States government, or any instrument based on, derived from, or related to such interests, provided that: (a) The investments in debt interests other than commercial paper, when added to the investment in written repurchase agreements for securities listed in division (A)(3) or (11) of this section, shall not exceed in the aggregate twenty-five per cent of the state's portfolio. (b) The investments in debt interests rated in the fourth highest category shall not exceed in the aggregate ten per cent of the state's portfolio. (c) The investments in debt interests issued by foreign nations shall not exceed in the aggregate two per cent of the state's portfolio. The treasurer of state shall invest under division (A)(11) of this section in a debt interest issued by a foreign nation only if the debt interest is backed by the full faith and credit of that foreign nation, and provided that all interest and principal shall be denominated and payable in United States funds. (d) When added to the investment in commercial paper and negotiable certificates of deposit, the investments in the debt interests of a single issuer shall not exceed in the aggregate five per cent of the state's portfolio. (e) For purposes of division (A)(11) of this section, a debt interest is rated in the four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations if either the debt interest itself or the issuer of the debt interest is rated, or is implicitly rated, in the four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (f) For purposes of division (A)(11) of this section, the "state's portfolio" means the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. (12) No-load money market mutual funds rated in the highest category by one nationally recognized statistical rating organization or consisting exclusively of obligations described in division (A)(1), (2), or (6) of this section and repurchase agreements secured by such obligations; (13) Obligations issued by, or on behalf of, an Ohio political subdivision under Chapter 133. of the Revised Code or Section 12 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, and identified in an agreement described in division (G) of this section; (14) Obligations issued by the state of Ohio, any political subdivision thereof, or by or on behalf of any nonprofit corporation or association doing business in this state rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization and identified in an agreement described in division (K) of this section. (B)(1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the treasurer of state shall notify the state board of deposit that the following reports pertaining to the immediately preceding month have been posted to the web site maintained by the treasurer of state: (a) The daily ledger report of state funds prepared in accordance with section 113.13 of the Revised Code; (b) The monthly portfolio report detailing the current inventory of all investments and deposits held within the classification of interim moneys; (c) The monthly activity report within the classification of interim moneys summarized by type of investment or deposit. (2) In the event the state board of deposit does not concur in such classification or in the investments or deposits made under this section, subject to division (B)(3) of this section, the board may order the treasurer of state to sell or liquidate any of the investments or deposits, and any such order shall specifically describe the investments or deposits and fix the date upon which they are to be sold or liquidated. Investments or deposits so ordered to be sold or liquidated shall be sold or liquidated for cash by the treasurer of state on the date fixed in such order at the then current market price. Neither the treasurer of state nor the members of the state board of deposit shall be held accountable for any loss occasioned by sales or liquidations of investments or deposits at prices lower than their cost. Any loss or expense incurred in making these sales or liquidations is payable as other expenses of the treasurer's office. (3) Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, the state board of deposit shall not order the treasurer of state to sell or liquidate investments or deposits with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. (C) If any securities or obligations invested in by the treasurer of state pursuant to this section are registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, such securities or obligations shall be registered in the name of the treasurer of state. (D) The treasurer of state is responsible for the safekeeping of all securities or obligations under this section. Any such securities or obligations may be deposited for safekeeping as provided in section 113.05 of the Revised Code. (E) Interest earned on any investments or deposits authorized by this section shall be collected by the treasurer of state and credited by the treasurer of state to the proper fund of the state. (F) Whenever investments or deposits acquired under this section mature and become due and payable, the treasurer of state shall present them for payment according to their tenor, and shall collect the moneys payable thereon. The moneys so collected shall be treated as public moneys subject to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (G) The treasurer of state and any entity issuing obligations referred to in division (A)(13) of this section, which obligations mature within one year from the original date of issuance, may enter into an agreement providing for: (1) The purchase of those obligations by the treasurer of state on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (2) The payment to the treasurer of state of a reasonable fee as consideration for the agreement of the treasurer of state to purchase those obligations; provided, however, that the treasurer of state shall not be authorized to enter into any such agreement with a board of education of a school district that has an outstanding obligation with respect to a loan received under authority of section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. (H) For purposes of division (G) of this section, a fee shall not be considered reasonable unless it is set to recover only the direct costs, a reasonable estimate of the indirect costs associated with the purchasing of obligations under division (G) of this section and any reselling of the obligations or any interest in the obligations, including interests in a fund comprised of the obligations, and the administration thereof. No money from the general revenue fund shall be used to subsidize the purchase or resale of these obligations. (I) All money collected by the treasurer of state from the fee imposed by division (G) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state political subdivision obligations fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. Money credited to the fund shall be used solely to pay the treasurer of state's direct and indirect costs associated with purchasing and reselling obligations under division (G) of this section. (J) As used in this section, "political subdivision" means a county, township, municipal corporation, school district, or other body corporate and politic responsible for governmental activities in a geographic area smaller than that of the state. (K)(1) The treasurer of state and any entity issuing obligations referred to in division (A)(14) of this section, which obligations require a conditional liquidity requirement, may enter into an agreement providing for the following: (a) The purchase of the obligations by the treasurer of state on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (b) Payment to the treasurer of state of a fee as consideration for the agreement of the treasurer of state to purchase the obligations. (2) The treasurer of state shall not enter into agreements under division (K)(1) of this section for obligations that, in the aggregate, exceed ten per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. (3) For purposes of division (A)(14) of this section, an obligation is rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization if either the debt interest itself or the obligor of the debt interest is rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization. (4) All money collected by the treasurer of state from the fee imposed by division (K) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state securities tender program fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The amount of income from the state securities tender program credited to the state securities tender program fund shall not exceed one per cent of the average par value of obligations subject to agreements under division (K)(1) of this section. All other such income shall be credited to the general revenue fund. The treasurer of state may use the state securities tender program fund solely for operations of the office of the treasurer of state. (L)(1) The treasurer of state and a state university or college issuing obligations under section 3345.12 of the Revised Code may enter into an agreement providing for the following: (a) The purchase of those obligations by the treasurer of state pursuant to division (A)(3)(a) of this section on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (b) The department of higher education to withhold, in the event the state university or college does not pay bond service charges on the obligations when due, appropriated funds allocated to the state university or college in an amount sufficient to pay bond service charges on the obligations, less any amounts deposited for that purpose under the bond proceedings. Upon the request of the treasurer of state, the department of higher education shall promptly pay to the treasurer of state the amounts withheld. (2) For purposes of division (L)(1) of this section, "obligations," "state university or college," "bond service charges," and "bond proceedings" have the same meanings as in section 3345.12 of the Revised Code. (M) Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, the treasurer of state shall not do either of the following: (1) Make an investment decision with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy; (2) Permit any person or entity to which the treasurer of state delegates the management of the investment of state money to make investment decisions with state money with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. Sec. 149.41. There is hereby created in each city, local, joint vocational, and exempted village school district a school district records commission, and in each educational service center an educational service center records commission. Each records commission shall be composed of the president, the treasurer of the board of education or governing board of the educational service center, and the superintendent of schools in each such district or educational service center, or their designees. The commission shall meet at least once every twelve months. The function of the commission shall be to review applications for one-time disposal of obsolete records and schedules of records retention and disposition submitted by any employee of the school district or educational service center. The commission may dispose of records pursuant to the procedure outlined in section 149.381 of the Revised Code. The commission, at any time, may review any schedule it has previously approved and, for good cause shown, may revise that schedule under the procedure outlined in that section. Sec. 2151.354. (A) If the child is adjudicated an unruly child, the court may: (1) Make any of the dispositions authorized under section 2151.353 of the Revised Code; (2) Place the child on community control under any sanctions, services, and conditions that the court prescribes, as described in division (A)(4) of section 2152.19 of the Revised Code, provided that, if the court imposes a period of community service upon the child, the period of community service shall not exceed one hundred seventy-five hours; (3) Suspend the driver's license, probationary driver's license, or temporary instruction permit issued to the child for a period of time prescribed by the court and suspend the registration of all motor vehicles registered in the name of the child for a period of time prescribed by the court. A child whose license or permit is so suspended is ineligible for issuance of a license or permit during the period of suspension. At the end of the period of suspension, the child shall not be reissued a license or permit until the child has paid any applicable reinstatement fee and complied with all requirements governing license reinstatement. (4) Commit the child to the temporary or permanent custody of the court; (5) Make any further disposition the court finds proper that is consistent with sections 2151.312 and 2151.56 to 2151.59 of the Revised Code; (6) If, after making a disposition under division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, the court finds upon further hearing that the child is not amenable to treatment or rehabilitation under that disposition, make a disposition otherwise authorized under divisions (A)(1), (4), (5), and (8) of section 2152.19 of the Revised Code that is consistent with sections 2151.312 and 2151.56 to 2151.59 of the Revised Code. (B) If a child is adjudicated an unruly child for committing any act that, if committed by an adult, would be a drug abuse offense, as defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code, or a violation of division (B) of section 2917.11 of the Revised Code, in addition to imposing, in its discretion, any other order of disposition authorized by this section, the court shall do both of the following: (1) Require the child to participate in a drug abuse or alcohol abuse counseling program; (2) Suspend the temporary instruction permit, probationary driver's license, or driver's license issued to the child for a period of time prescribed by the court. The court, in its discretion, may terminate the suspension if the child attends and satisfactorily completes a drug abuse or alcohol abuse education, intervention, or treatment program specified by the court. During the time the child is attending a program as described in this division, the court shall retain the child's temporary instruction permit, probationary driver's license, or driver's license, and the court shall return the permit or license if it terminates the suspension. (C)(1) If a child is adjudicated an unruly child for being an habitual truant, in addition to or in lieu of imposing any other order of disposition authorized by this section, the court may do any of the following: (a) Order the board of education of the child's school district or the governing board of the educational service center in the child's school district to require the child to attend an alternative school if an alternative school has been established pursuant to section 3313.533 of the Revised Code in the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school; (b) Require the child to participate in any academic program or community service program; (c) Require the child to participate in a drug abuse or alcohol abuse counseling program; (d) Require that the child receive appropriate medical or psychological treatment or counseling; (e) Maintain jurisdiction over the child during the subsequent school year for the purpose of monitoring the child's attendance; (f) Make any other order that the court finds proper to address the child's habitual truancy, including an order requiring the child to not be absent without legitimate excuse from the public school the child is supposed to attend for thirty or more consecutive hours, forty-two or more hours in one school month, or seventy-two or more hours in a school year and including an order requiring the child to participate in a truancy prevention mediation program. (2) If a child is adjudicated an unruly child for being an habitual truant and the court determines that the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child has failed to cause the child's attendance at school in violation of section 3321.38 of the Revised Code, in addition to any order of disposition authorized by this section, all of the following apply: (a) The court may require the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child to participate in any community service program, preferably a community service program that requires the involvement of the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child in the school attended by the child. (b) The court may require the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child to participate in a truancy prevention mediation program. (c) The court shall warn the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child that any subsequent adjudication of the child as an unruly or delinquent child for being an habitual truant or for violating a court order regarding the child's prior adjudication as an unruly child for being an habitual truant, may result in a criminal charge against the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child for a violation of division (C) of section 2919.21 or section 2919.24 of the Revised Code. (d) Not later than ten days after a child is adjudicated an unruly child for being an habitual truant, the court shall provide notice of that fact to the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school and to the school in which the child was enrolled at the time of the filing of the complaint. Sec. 2152.19. (A) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent child, the court may make any of the following orders of disposition, in addition to any other disposition authorized or required by this chapter: (1) Any order that is authorized by section 2151.353 of the Revised Code for the care and protection of an abused, neglected, or dependent child; (2) Commit the child to the temporary custody of any school, camp, institution, or other facility operated for the care of delinquent children by the county, by a district organized under section 2152.41 or 2151.65 of the Revised Code, or by a private agency or organization, within or without the state, that is authorized and qualified to provide the care, treatment, or placement required, including, but not limited to, a school, camp, or facility operated under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code; (3) Place the child in a detention facility or district detention facility operated under section 2152.41 of the Revised Code, for up to ninety days; (4) Place the child on community control under any sanctions, services, and conditions that the court prescribes. As a condition of community control in every case and in addition to any other condition that it imposes upon the child, the court shall require the child to abide by the law during the period of community control. As referred to in this division, community control includes, but is not limited to, the following sanctions and conditions: (a) A period of basic probation supervision in which the child is required to maintain contact with a person appointed to supervise the child in accordance with sanctions imposed by the court; (b) A period of intensive probation supervision in which the child is required to maintain frequent contact with a person appointed by the court to supervise the child while the child is seeking or maintaining employment and participating in training, education, and treatment programs as the order of disposition; (c) A period of day reporting in which the child is required each day to report to and leave a center or another approved reporting location at specified times in order to participate in work, education or training, treatment, and other approved programs at the center or outside the center; (d) A period of community service of up to five hundred hours for an act that would be a felony or a misdemeanor of the first degree if committed by an adult, up to two hundred hours for an act that would be a misdemeanor of the second, third, or fourth degree if committed by an adult, or up to thirty hours for an act that would be a minor misdemeanor if committed by an adult; (e) A requirement that the child obtain a high school diploma, a certificate of high school equivalence, vocational training, or employment; (f) A period of drug and alcohol use monitoring; (g) A requirement of alcohol or drug assessment or counseling, or a period in an alcohol or drug treatment program with a level of security for the child as determined necessary by the court; (h) A period in which the court orders the child to observe a curfew that may involve daytime or evening hours; (i) A requirement that the child serve monitored time; (j) A period of house arrest without electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring; (k) A period of electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring without house arrest, or house arrest with electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring or both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring, that does not exceed the maximum sentence of imprisonment that could be imposed upon an adult who commits the same act. A period of house arrest with electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring or both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring, imposed under this division shall not extend beyond the child's twenty-first birthday. If a court imposes a period of house arrest with electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring or both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring, upon a child under this division, it shall require the child: to remain in the child's home or other specified premises for the entire period of house arrest with electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring or both except when the court permits the child to leave those premises to go to school or to other specified premises. Regarding electronic monitoring, the court also shall require the child to be monitored by a central system that can determine the child's location at designated times; to report periodically to a person designated by the court; and to enter into a written contract with the court agreeing to comply with all requirements imposed by the court, agreeing to pay any fee imposed by the court for the costs of the house arrest with electronic monitoring, and agreeing to waive the right to receive credit for any time served on house arrest with electronic monitoring toward the period of any other dispositional order imposed upon the child if the child violates any of the requirements of the dispositional order of house arrest with electronic monitoring. The court also may impose other reasonable requirements upon the child. Unless ordered by the court, a child shall not receive credit for any time served on house arrest with electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring or both toward any other dispositional order imposed upon the child for the act for which was imposed the dispositional order of house arrest with electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring. As used in this division and division (A)(4)(l) of this section, "continuous alcohol monitoring" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (l) A suspension of the driver's license, probationary driver's license, or temporary instruction permit issued to the child for a period of time prescribed by the court, or a suspension of the registration of all motor vehicles registered in the name of the child for a period of time prescribed by the court. A child whose license or permit is so suspended is ineligible for issuance of a license or permit during the period of suspension. At the end of the period of suspension, the child shall not be reissued a license or permit until the child has paid any applicable reinstatement fee and complied with all requirements governing license reinstatement. (5) Commit the child to the custody of the court; (6) Require the child to not be absent without legitimate excuse from the public school the child is supposed to attend for thirty or more consecutive hours, forty-two or more hours in one school month, or seventy-two or more hours in a school year; (7)(a) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent child for violating a court order regarding the child's prior adjudication as an unruly child for being a habitual truant, do either or both of the following: (i) Require the child to participate in a truancy prevention mediation program; (ii) Make any order of disposition as authorized by this section, except that the court shall not commit the child to a facility described in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section unless the court determines that the child violated a lawful court order made pursuant to division (C)(1)(e)(C)(1)(f) of section 2151.354 of the Revised Code or division (A)(6) of this section. (b) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent child for violating a court order regarding the child's prior adjudication as an unruly child for being a habitual truant and the court determines that the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child has failed to cause the child's attendance at school in violation of section 3321.38 of the Revised Code, do either or both of the following: (i) Require the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child to participate in a truancy prevention mediation program; (ii) Require the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child to participate in any community service program, preferably a community service program that requires the involvement of the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child in the school attended by the child. (8) Make any further disposition that the court finds proper, except that the child shall not be placed in a state correctional institution, a county, multicounty, or municipal jail or workhouse, or another place in which an adult convicted of a crime, under arrest, or charged with a crime is held. (B) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent child, in addition to any order of disposition made under division (A) of this section, the court, in the following situations and for the specified periods of time, shall suspend the child's temporary instruction permit, restricted license, probationary driver's license, or nonresident operating privilege, or suspend the child's ability to obtain such a permit: (1) If the child is adjudicated a delinquent child for violating section 2923.122 of the Revised Code, impose a class four suspension of the child's license, permit, or privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or deny the child the issuance of a license or permit in accordance with division (F)(1) of section 2923.122 of the Revised Code. (2) If the child is adjudicated a delinquent child for committing an act that if committed by an adult would be a drug abuse offense or for violating division (B) of section 2917.11 of the Revised Code, suspend the child's license, permit, or privilege for a period of time prescribed by the court. The court, in its discretion, may terminate the suspension if the child attends and satisfactorily completes a drug abuse or alcohol abuse education, intervention, or treatment program specified by the court. During the time the child is attending a program described in this division, the court shall retain the child's temporary instruction permit, probationary driver's license, or driver's license, and the court shall return the permit or license if it terminates the suspension as described in this division. (C) The court may establish a victim-offender mediation program in which victims and their offenders meet to discuss the offense and suggest possible restitution. If the court obtains the assent of the victim of the delinquent act committed by the child, the court may require the child to participate in the program. (D)(1) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent child for committing an act that would be a felony if committed by an adult and if the child caused, attempted to cause, threatened to cause, or created a risk of physical harm to the victim of the act, the court, prior to issuing an order of disposition under this section, shall order the preparation of a victim impact statement by the probation department of the county in which the victim of the act resides, by the court's own probation department, or by a victim assistance program that is operated by the state, a county, a municipal corporation, or another governmental entity. The court shall consider the victim impact statement in determining the order of disposition to issue for the child. (2) Each victim impact statement shall identify the victim of the act for which the child was adjudicated a delinquent child, itemize any economic loss suffered by the victim as a result of the act, identify any physical injury suffered by the victim as a result of the act and the seriousness and permanence of the injury, identify any change in the victim's personal welfare or familial relationships as a result of the act and any psychological impact experienced by the victim or the victim's family as a result of the act, and contain any other information related to the impact of the act upon the victim that the court requires. (3) A victim impact statement shall be kept confidential and is not a public record. However, the court may furnish copies of the statement to the department of youth services if the delinquent child is committed to the department or to both the adjudicated delinquent child or the adjudicated delinquent child's counsel and the prosecuting attorney. The copy of a victim impact statement furnished by the court to the department pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential and is not a public record. If an officer is preparing pursuant to section 2947.06 or 2951.03 of the Revised Code or Criminal Rule 32.2 a presentence investigation report pertaining to a person, the court shall make available to the officer, for use in preparing the report, a copy of any victim impact statement regarding that person. The copies of a victim impact statement that are made available to the adjudicated delinquent child or the adjudicated delinquent child's counsel and the prosecuting attorney pursuant to this division shall be returned to the court by the person to whom they were made available immediately following the imposition of an order of disposition for the child under this chapter. The copy of a victim impact statement that is made available pursuant to this division to an officer preparing a criminal presentence investigation report shall be returned to the court by the officer immediately following its use in preparing the report. (4) The department of youth services shall work with local probation departments and victim assistance programs to develop a standard victim impact statement. (E)(1) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent child for violating a court order regarding the child's prior adjudication as an unruly child for being a habitual truant and the court determines that the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child has failed to cause the child's attendance at school in violation of section 3321.38 of the Revised Code, in addition to any order of disposition it makes under this section, the court shall warn the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child that any subsequent adjudication with regard to truancy may result in a criminal charge against the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child for a violation of division (C) of section 2919.21 or section 2919.24 of the Revised Code. (2) Not later than ten days after a child is adjudicated a delinquent child for violating a court order regarding the child's prior adjudication as an unruly child for being an habitual truant, the court shall provide notice of that fact to the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school and to the school in which the child was enrolled at the time of the filing of the complaint. (F)(1) During the period of a delinquent child's community control granted under this section, authorized probation officers who are engaged within the scope of their supervisory duties or responsibilities may search, with or without a warrant, the person of the delinquent child, the place of residence of the delinquent child, and a motor vehicle, another item of tangible or intangible personal property, or other real property in which the delinquent child has a right, title, or interest or for which the delinquent child has the express or implied permission of a person with a right, title, or interest to use, occupy, or possess if the probation officers have reasonable grounds to believe that the delinquent child is not abiding by the law or otherwise is not complying with the conditions of the delinquent child's community control. The court that places a delinquent child on community control under this section shall provide the delinquent child with a written notice that informs the delinquent child that authorized probation officers who are engaged within the scope of their supervisory duties or responsibilities may conduct those types of searches during the period of community control if they have reasonable grounds to believe that the delinquent child is not abiding by the law or otherwise is not complying with the conditions of the delinquent child's community control. The court also shall provide the written notice described in division (E)(2) of this section to each parent, guardian, or custodian of the delinquent child who is described in that division. (2) The court that places a child on community control under this section shall provide the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian with a written notice that informs them that authorized probation officers may conduct searches pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section. The notice shall specifically state that a permissible search might extend to a motor vehicle, another item of tangible or intangible personal property, or a place of residence or other real property in which a notified parent, guardian, or custodian has a right, title, or interest and that the parent, guardian, or custodian expressly or impliedly permits the child to use, occupy, or possess. (G) If a juvenile court commits a delinquent child to the custody of any person, organization, or entity pursuant to this section and if the delinquent act for which the child is so committed is a sexually oriented offense or is a child-victim oriented offense, the court in the order of disposition shall do one of the following: (1) Require that the child be provided treatment as described in division (A)(2) of section 5139.13 of the Revised Code; (2) Inform the person, organization, or entity that it is the preferred course of action in this state that the child be provided treatment as described in division (A)(2) of section 5139.13 of the Revised Code and encourage the person, organization, or entity to provide that treatment. Sec. 2915.092. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, a person or entity may conduct a raffle to raise money for the person or entity and does not need a license to conduct bingo in order to conduct a raffle drawing that is not for profit if the person or entity is any of the following: (a) Exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (b) A school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or chartered nonpublic school; (c) Exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. (2) If a person or entity that is described in division (A)(1)(c) of this section conducts a raffle, the person or entity shall distribute at least fifty per cent of the net profit from the raffle to a charitable purpose described in division (V) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code or to a department or agency of the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision. (B) Except as provided in division (A) of this section, no person shall conduct a raffle drawing that is for profit or a raffle drawing that is not for profit. (C) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of illegal conduct of a raffle. Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegal conduct of a raffle is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of division (B) of this section, illegal conduct of a raffle is a felony of the fifth degree. Sec. 2919.24. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Delinquent child" has the same meaning as in section 2152.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Unruly child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.022 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, including a parent, guardian, or other custodian of a child, shall do any of the following: (1) Aid, abet, induce, cause, encourage, or contribute to a child or a ward of the juvenile court becoming an unruly child or a delinquent child; (2) Act in a way tending to cause a child or a ward of the juvenile court to become an unruly child or a delinquent child; (3) Act in a way that contributes to an adjudication of the child as a delinquent child based on the child's violation of a court order adjudicating the child an unruly a child for being an a habitual truant; (4) If the person is the parent, guardian, or custodian of a child who has the duties under Chapters 2152. and 2950. of the Revised Code to register, register a new residence address, and periodically verify a residence address, and, if applicable, to send a notice of intent to reside, and if the child is not emancipated, as defined in section 2919.121 of the Revised Code, fail to ensure that the child complies with those duties under Chapters 2152. and 2950. of the Revised Code. (C) An adjudication of a child as being unruly or delinquent is unnecessary for a conviction under this section. (D) Whoever violates this section is guilty of contributing to the unruliness or delinquency of a child, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Each day of violation of this section is a separate offense. Sec. 2921.44. (A) No law enforcement officer shall negligently do any of the following: (1) Fail to serve a lawful warrant without delay; (2) Fail to prevent or halt the commission of an offense or to apprehend an offender, when it is in the law enforcement officer's power to do so alone or with available assistance. (B) No law enforcement, ministerial, or judicial officer shall negligently fail to perform a lawful duty in a criminal case or proceeding. (C) No officer, having charge of a detention facility, shall negligently do any of the following: (1) Allow the detention facility to become littered or unsanitary; (2) Fail to provide persons confined in the detention facility with adequate food, clothing, bedding, shelter, and medical attention; (3) Fail to control an unruly prisoner, or to prevent intimidation of or physical harm to a prisoner by another; (4) Allow a prisoner to escape; (5) Fail to observe any lawful and reasonable regulation for the management of the detention facility. (D) No public official of the state shall recklessly create a deficiency, incur a liability, or expend a greater sum than is appropriated by the general assembly for the use in any one year of the department, agency, or institution of the state with which the public official is connected. (E) No public servant shall recklessly fail to perform a duty expressly imposed by law with respect to the public servant's office, or recklessly do any act expressly forbidden by law with respect to the public servant's office. (F) Whoever violates this section is guilty of dereliction of duty, a misdemeanor of the second degree. (G) Except as otherwise provided by law, a public servant who is a county treasurer; county auditor; township fiscal officer; city auditor; city treasurer; village fiscal officer; village clerk-treasurer; village clerk; in the case of a municipal corporation having a charter that designates an officer who, by virtue of the charter, has duties and functions similar to those of the city or village officers referred to in this section, the officer so designated by the charter; school district treasurer; fiscal officer of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; or treasurer of a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; or fiscal officer of a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code and is convicted of or pleads guilty to dereliction of duty is disqualified from holding any public office, employment, or position of trust in this state for four years following the date of conviction or of entry of the plea, and is not entitled to hold any public office until any repayment or restitution required by the court is satisfied. (H) As used in this section, "public servant" includes the following: (1) An officer or employee of a contractor as defined in section 9.08 of the Revised Code; (2) A fiscal officer employed by the operator of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code or by the operator of a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.01. There is hereby created the state board of education consisting of five seven members to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Each initial member appointed after the effective date of this amendment to an office that is vacant as of January 1, 2027, shall have a term of office that begins on January 1, 2027. Each initial such member shall be appointed not later than that date. Sec. 3301.02. (A) Members of the board shall serve four-year terms beginning the first day of January and ending on the thirty-first day of December. (B) No person shall hold the office of member of the state board of education for a period of longer than two successive terms of four years. Terms shall be considered successive unless separated by a period of four or more years. Only terms beginning on or after January 1, 1996, shall be considered in determining an individual's eligibility to hold office. (C) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, members who were elected or appointed under this section as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendment September 30, 2025, shall remain in office until the expiration of their current terms. Upon the expiration of the current term of elected members, all eleven elected offices shall be abolished and no successor shall be elected after the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025. If such elected member vacates the office prior to the expiration of the member's term, no individual shall be appointed or elected to fill that vacancy, and that office is abolished. The offices of the first three appointed members to reach the expiration of their current terms or vacate the office prior to the expiration of their current terms shall be abolished. Thereafter, the state board consists only of fivethe appointed members as prescribed under section 3301.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.03. (A) Each member of the board shall be a qualified elector residing in the state. OneAt least one member shall represent have experience as a representative for each of the following: (1) A rural school district; (2) A suburban school district; (3) An urban school district; (4) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (5) A chartered nonpublic school. (B) No member of the board shall, during the member's term of office, hold any other office of trust or profit or be an employee or officer of any public or private elementary or secondary school. Before entering on the duties of office, each member shall subscribe to the official oath of office. (C) Each member of the state board of education shall be paid a salary fixed pursuant to division (J) of section 124.15 of the Revised Code, together with the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in the performance of the member's official duties or in the conduct of authorized board business, and while en route to and from the member's home for such purposes. (B) (D) As used in this section only, "office of trust or profit" means: (1) A federal or state elective office or an elected office of a political subdivision of the state; (2) A position on a board or commission of the state that is appointed by the governor; (3) An office set forth in section 121.03, 121.04, or 121.05 of the Revised Code; (4) An office of the government of the United States that is appointed by the president of the United States. Sec. 3301.07. The director of education and workforce shall exercise under the acts of the general assembly general supervision of the system of public education in the state. In addition to the powers otherwise imposed on the director under the provisions of law, the director shall have the powers described in this section. (A) The director shall exercise policy forming, planning, and evaluative functions for the public schools of the state except as otherwise provided by law. (B)(1) The director shall exercise leadership in the improvement of public education in this state, and administer the educational policies of this state relating to public schools, and relating to instruction and instructional material, building and equipment, transportation of pupils, administrative responsibilities of school officials and personnel, and finance and organization of school districts, educational service centers, and territory. Consultative and advisory services in such matters shall be provided by the department of education and workforce to school districts and educational service centers of this state. (2) The director also shall develop a standard of financial reporting which shall be used by each school district board of education and each governing board of an educational service center, each governing authority of a community school established under Chapter 3314., and each governing body of a STEM school established under Chapter 3326., and each board of trustees of a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code to make its financial information and annual budgets for each school building under its control available to the public in a format understandable by the average citizen. The format shall show, both at the district and at the school building level, revenue by source; expenditures for salaries, wages, and benefits of employees, showing such amounts separately for classroom teachers, other employees required to hold licenses issued pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, and all other employees; expenditures other than for personnel, by category, including utilities, textbooks and other educational materials, equipment, permanent improvements, pupil transportation, extracurricular athletics, and other extracurricular activities; and per pupil expenditures. The format shall also include information on total revenue and expenditures, per pupil revenue, and expenditures for both classroom and nonclassroom purposes, as defined by the standards adopted under section 3302.20 of the Revised Code in the aggregate and for each subgroup of students, as defined by section 3317.40 of the Revised Code, that receives services provided for by state or federal funding. (3) Each school district board, governing authority, governing body, or board of trustees, or its respective designee, shall annually report, to the department, all financial information required by the standards for financial reporting, as prescribed by division (B)(2) of this section and adopted by the director. The department shall make all reports submitted pursuant to this division available in such a way that allows for comparison between financial information included in these reports and financial information included in reports produced prior to July 1, 2013. The department shall post these reports in a prominent location on its web site and shall notify each school when reports are made available. (C) The director shall administer and supervise the allocation and distribution of all state and federal funds for public school education under the provisions of law, and may prescribe such systems of accounting as are necessary and proper to this function. It may require county auditors and treasurers, boards of education, educational service center governing boards, treasurers of such boards, teachers, and other school officers and employees, or other public officers or employees, to file with it such reports as it may prescribe relating to such funds, or to the management and condition of such funds. (D)(1) Wherever in Titles IX, XXIII, XXIX, XXXIII, XXXVII, XLVII, and LI of the Revised Code a reference is made to standards prescribed under this section or division (D) of this section, that reference shall be construed to refer to the standards prescribed under division (D)(2) of this section, unless the context specifically indicates a different meaning or intent. (2) The director shall formulate and prescribe minimum standards to be applied to all elementary and secondary schools in this state for the purpose of providing children access to a general education of high quality according to the learning needs of each individual, including students with disabilities, economically disadvantaged students, English learners, and students identified as gifted. Such standards shall provide adequately for: a requirement that teachers, administrators, and other professional personnel be licensed by the state board of education and assigned according to training and qualifications; efficient and effective instructional materials and equipment, including library facilities; the proper organization, administration, and supervision of each school, including regulations for preparing all necessary records and reports and the preparation of a statement of policies and objectives for each school; the provision of safe buildings, grounds, health and sanitary facilities and services; admission of pupils, and such requirements for their promotion from grade to grade as will assure that they are capable and prepared for the level of study to which they are certified; and requirements for graduation. The minimum standards the director adopts under this section are limited to powers and duties that are expressly prescribed and authorized in statute. The director shall base any standards governing the promotion of students or requirements for graduation on the ability of students, at any grade level, to earn credits or advance upon demonstration of mastery of knowledge and skills through competency-based learning models. Credits of grade level advancement shall not require a minimum number of days or hours in a classroom. The director shall base any standards governing the assignment of staff on ensuring each school has a sufficient number of teachers to ensure a student has an appropriate level of interaction to meet each student's personal learning goals. In the formulation and administration of such standards for nonpublic schools the director shall also consider the particular needs, methods and objectives of those schools, provided they do not conflict with the provision of a general education of a high quality and provided that regular procedures shall be followed for promotion from grade to grade of pupils who have met the educational requirements prescribed. (3) In addition to the minimum standards required by division (D)(2) of this section, the director may formulate and prescribe the following additional minimum operating standards for school districts: (a) Standards for the effective and efficient organization, administration, and supervision of each school district with a commitment to high expectations for every student based on the learning needs of each individual, including students with disabilities, economically disadvantaged students, English learners, and students identified as gifted, and commitment to closing the achievement gap without suppressing the achievement levels of higher achieving students so that all students achieve core knowledge and skills in accordance with the statewide academic standards adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code; (b) Standards for the establishment of business advisory councils under section 3313.82 of the Revised Code; (c) Standards for school district buildings that may require the effective and efficient organization, administration, and supervision of each school district building with a commitment to high expectations for every student based on the learning needs of each individual, including students with disabilities, economically disadvantaged students, English learners, and students identified as gifted, and commitment to closing the achievement gap without suppressing the achievement levels of higher achieving students so that all students achieve core knowledge and skills in accordance with the statewide academic standards adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. (E) The director may require as part of the health curriculum information developed under section 2108.34 of the Revised Code promoting the donation of anatomical gifts pursuant to Chapter 2108. of the Revised Code and may provide the information to high schools, educational service centers, and joint vocational school district boards of education; (F) The director shall prepare and submit annually to the governor and the general assembly a report on the status, needs, and major problems of the public schools of the state, with recommendations for necessary legislative action and a ten-year projection of the state's public and nonpublic school enrollment, by year and by grade level. (G) The director shall prepare and submit to the director of budget and management the biennial budgetary requests of the department and its divisions and for the public schools of the state. (H)(G) The director shall cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies concerned with the health and welfare of children and youth of the state. (I)(H) The director shall require such reports from school districts and educational service centers, school officers, and employees as are necessary and desirable. The superintendents and treasurers of school districts and educational service centers shall certify as to the accuracy of all reports required by statutory law or director's rules to be submitted by the district or educational service center and which contain information necessary for calculation of state funding. Any superintendent who knowingly falsifies such report shall be subject to license revocation pursuant to section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. (J)(I) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director shall adopt procedures, standards, and guidelines for the education of children with disabilities pursuant to Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, including procedures, standards, and guidelines governing programs and services operated by county boards of developmental disabilities pursuant to section 3323.09 of the Revised Code. (K)(J) For the purpose of encouraging the development of special programs of education for academically gifted children, the director shall employ competent persons to analyze and publish data, promote research, advise and counsel with boards of education, and encourage the training of teachers in the special instruction of gifted children. The director may provide financial assistance out of any funds appropriated for this purpose to boards of education and educational service center governing boards for developing and conducting programs of education for academically gifted children. (L)(K) The director shall require that all public schools emphasize and encourage, within existing units of study, the teaching of energy and resource conservation as recommended to each district board of education by leading business persons involved in energy production and conservation, beginning in the primary grades. (M)(L) The director shall formulate and prescribe minimum standards requiring the use of phonics as a technique in the teaching of reading in grades kindergarten through three. In addition, the director shall provide in-service training programs for teachers on the use of phonics as a technique in the teaching of reading in grades kindergarten through three. (N)(M) The director may adopt rules necessary for carrying out any function imposed on the director by law, and may provide rules as are necessary for the government of the department and its employees, and may delegate to any deputy director the management and administration of any function imposed on the director by law. (O)(N) Upon application from the board of education of a school district, the director may issue a waiver exempting the district from compliance with the standards adopted under divisions (B)(2) and (D) of this section, as they relate to the operation of a school operated by the district. The director shall adopt standards for the approval or disapproval of waivers under this division. The director shall consider every application for a waiver, and shall determine whether to grant or deny a waiver in accordance with the those standards. For each waiver granted, the director shall specify the period of time during which the waiver is in effect, which shall not exceed five years. A district board may apply to renew a waiver. Sec. 3301.079. (A)(1) The department of education and workforce periodically shall adopt statewide academic standards with emphasis on coherence, focus, and essential knowledge and that are more challenging and demanding when compared to international standards for each of grades kindergarten through twelve in English language arts, mathematics, science, and social studies. (a) The department shall ensure that the standards do all of the following: (i) Include the essential academic content and skills that students are expected to know and be able to do at each grade level that will allow each student to be prepared for postsecondary instruction and the workplace for success in the twenty-first century; (ii) Include the development of skill sets that promote information, media, and technological literacy; (iii) Include interdisciplinary, project-based, real-world learning opportunities; (iv) Instill life-long learning by providing essential knowledge and skills based in the liberal arts tradition, as well as science, technology, engineering, mathematics, and career-technical education; (v) Be clearly written, transparent, and understandable by parents, educators, and the general public. (b) The department shall incorporate into the social studies standards for grades four to twelve academic content regarding the original texts of the Declaration of Independence, the Northwest Ordinance, the Constitution of the United States and its amendments, with emphasis on the Bill of Rights, and the Ohio Constitution, and their original context. The department shall revise the model curricula and achievement assessments adopted under divisions (B) and (C) of this section as necessary to reflect the additional American history and American government content. The department shall make available a list of suggested grade-appropriate supplemental readings that place the documents prescribed by this division in their historical context, which teachers may use as a resource to assist students in reading the documents within that context. (c) When the department adopts or revises academic content standards in social studies, American history, American government, or science under division (A)(1) of this section, it shall develop such standards independently and not as part of a multistate consortium. (2)(a) After completing the standards required by division (A)(1) of this section, the department shall adopt standards and model curricula for instruction in technology, financial literacy and entrepreneurship, fine arts, and foreign language for grades kindergarten through twelve. The standards shall meet the same requirements prescribed in division (A)(1)(a) of this section. (b) The department shall incorporate into the standards and model curriculum for financial literacy and entrepreneurship for grades nine through twelve academic content regarding free market capitalism. The academic content shall include all of the following concepts related to free market capitalism: (i) Raw materials, labor, and capital, the three classical factors of economic production, are privately owned. (ii) Individuals control their own ability to work, earn wages, and obtain skills to earn and increase wages. (iii) Private ownership of capital may include a sole proprietorship, a family business, a publicly traded corporation, a group of private investors, or a bank. (iv) Markets aggregate the exchange of goods and services throughout the world. Market prices are the only way to convey so much constantly changing information about the supply of goods and services, and the demand for them, for consumers and producers to make informed economic decisions for themselves. (v) Wealth is created by providing goods and services that people value at a profit, and both sellers and buyers seek to profit in some way in a free market transaction. Thus, profit earned through transactions can be consumed, saved, reinvested in the business, or dispersed to shareholders. (vi) Wealth creation involves asset value appreciation and depreciation, voluntary exchange of equity ownership, and open and closed markets. (vii) The free market is driven by, and tends to produce, entrepreneurship and innovation. (viii) The free market can include side effects and market failures where at least part of the cost of the transaction, including producing, transporting, selling, or buying, is born by others outside of the transaction. (ix) The political features of the free market, including legally protected property rights, legally enforceable contracts, patent protections, and the mitigation of side effects and market failures; (x) Societies that embrace the free market often embrace political and personal freedom as well. (3) The department shall adopt the most recent standards developed by the national association for sport and physical education for physical education in grades kindergarten through twelve or shall adopt its own standards for physical education in those grades and revise and update them periodically. The department shall employ a full-time physical education coordinator to provide guidance and technical assistance to districts, community schools, and STEM schools in implementing the physical education standards adopted under this division. The director of education and workforce shall determine that the person employed as coordinator is qualified for the position, as demonstrated by possessing an adequate combination of education, license, and experience. (4) The department shall update the standards and model curriculum for instruction in computer science in grades kindergarten through twelve, which shall include standards for introductory and advanced computer science courses in grades nine through twelve. When developing the standards and curriculum, the department shall consider recommendations from computer science education stakeholder groups, including teachers and representatives from higher education, industry, computer science organizations in Ohio, and national computer science organizations. Any district or school may utilize the computer science standards or model curriculum or any part thereof adopted pursuant to division (A)(4) of this section. However, no district or school shall be required to utilize all or any part of the standards or curriculum. (5) When academic standards have been completed for any subject area required by this section, the department shall inform all school districts, all community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, all STEM schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, and all nonpublic schools required to administer the assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code of the content of those standards. Additionally, upon completion of any academic standards under this section, the department shall post those standards on the department's web site. (B)(1) The department shall adopt a model curriculum for instruction in each subject area for which updated academic standards are required by division (A)(1) of this section and for each of grades kindergarten through twelve that is sufficient to meet the needs of students in every community. The model curriculum shall be aligned with the standards, to ensure that the academic content and skills specified for each grade level are taught to students, and shall demonstrate vertical articulation and emphasize coherence, focus, and rigor. When any model curriculum has been completed, the department shall inform all school districts, community schools, and STEM schools of the content of that model curriculum. (2) The department, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall adopt model curricula for grades kindergarten through twelve that embed career connection learning strategies into regular classroom instruction. (3) All school districts, community schools, and STEM schools may utilize the state standards and the model curriculum established by the department, together with other relevant resources, examples, or models to ensure that students have the opportunity to attain the academic standards. Upon request, the department shall provide technical assistance to any district, community school, or STEM school in implementing the model curriculum. Nothing in this section requires any school district to utilize all or any part of a model curriculum developed under this section. (C) The department shall develop achievement assessments aligned with the academic standards and model curriculum for each of the subject areas and grade levels required by divisions division (A)(1) and (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. When any achievement assessment has been completed, the department shall inform all school districts, community schools, STEM schools, and nonpublic schools required to administer the assessment of its completion, and the department shall make the achievement assessment available to the districts and schools. (D)(1) Not later than June 30, 2026, the department shall do both of the following: (a) Adopt a diagnostic assessment aligned with the academic standards for each of grades kindergarten to three in reading; (b) Approve a list of up to five diagnostic assessments aligned with the academic standards for each of grades kindergarten to three for both reading and mathematics. The department's list of approved diagnostic assessments for reading shall include the three reading diagnostic assessments that were approved by the department for use as comparable tools for purposes of division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code, as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025, and are most widely used by public schools in the state. (2) Each diagnostic assessment adopted or approved under division (D)(1) of this section shall be designed to measure student comprehension of academic content and mastery of related skills for the relevant subject area and grade level. The diagnostic assessment for reading shall be designed to measure student comprehension of foundational reading skills aligned to the science of reading. Any diagnostic assessment adopted by the department shall not include components to identify gifted students. Blank copies of diagnostic assessments shall be public records. (3) School districts shall administer a diagnostic assessment in reading and mathematics adopted or approved by the department pursuant to section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code beginning in the 2026-2027 school year. (E) The department shall not adopt a diagnostic or achievement assessment for any grade level or subject area other than those specified in this section. (F) Whenever the department consults with persons for the purpose of drafting or reviewing any standards, diagnostic assessments, achievement assessments, or model curriculum required under this section, the department shall first consult with parents of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade and with active Ohio classroom teachers, other school personnel, and administrators with expertise in the appropriate subject area. Whenever practicable, the department shall consult with teachers recognized as outstanding in their fields. If the department contracts with more than one outside entity for the development of the achievement assessments required by this section, the department shall ensure the interchangeability of those assessments. (G) Whenever the department adopts standards or model curricula under this section, the department also shall provide information on the use of blended, online, or digital learning in the delivery of the standards or curricula to students in accordance with division (A)(5) of this section. (H) The fairness sensitivity review committee of the department shall not allow any question on any achievement or diagnostic assessment developed under this section or any proficiency test prescribed by former section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, as it existed prior to September 11, 2001, to include, be written to promote, or inquire as to individual moral or social values or beliefs. The decision of the committee shall be final. This section does not create a private cause of action. (I) Not later than sixty days prior to the adoption of updated academic standards under division (A)(1) of this section or updated model curricula under division (B)(1) of this section, the director of education and workforce shall present the academic standards or model curricula, as applicable, in person at a public hearing of the respective committees of the house of representatives and senate that consider education legislation. (J) As used in this section: (1) "Blended learning" means the delivery of instruction in a combination of time primarily in a supervised physical location away from home and online delivery whereby the student has some element of control over time, place, path, or pace of learning and includes noncomputer-based learning opportunities. (2) "Online learning" means students work primarily from their residences on assignments delivered via an internet- or other computer-based instructional method. (3) "Coherence" means a reflection of the structure of the discipline being taught. (4) "Digital learning" means learning facilitated by technology that gives students some element of control over time, place, path, or pace of learning. (5) "Focus" means limiting the number of items included in a curriculum to allow for deeper exploration of the subject matter. (6) "Vertical articulation" means key academic concepts and skills associated with mastery in particular content areas should be articulated and reinforced in a developmentally appropriate manner at each grade level so that over time students acquire a depth of knowledge and understanding in the core academic disciplines. Sec. 3301.0710. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules establishing a statewide program to assess student achievement. The department shall ensure that all assessments administered under the program are aligned with the academic standards and model curricula adopted by the department and are created with input from Ohio parents, Ohio classroom teachers, Ohio school administrators, and other Ohio school personnel pursuant to section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. The assessment program shall be designed to ensure that students who receive a high school diploma demonstrate at least high school levels of achievement in English language arts, mathematics, science, and social studies. (A)(1) The department shall prescribe all of the following: (a) Two statewide achievement assessments, one each designed to measure the level of English language arts and mathematics skill expected at the end of third grade; (b) Two statewide achievement assessments, one each designed to measure the level of English language arts and mathematics skill expected at the end of fourth grade; (c) Three statewide achievement assessments, one each designed to measure the level of English language arts, mathematics, and science skill expected at the end of fifth grade; (d) Two statewide achievement assessments, one each designed to measure the level of English language arts and mathematics skill expected at the end of sixth grade; (e) Two statewide achievement assessments, one each designed to measure the level of English language arts and mathematics skill expected at the end of seventh grade; (f) Three statewide achievement assessments, one each designed to measure the level of English language arts, mathematics, and science skill expected at the end of eighth grade. (2) The department shall determine and designate at least five ranges of scores on each of the achievement assessments described in divisions division (A)(1) and (B)(1) of this section. Each range of scores shall be deemed to demonstrate a level of achievement so that any student attaining a score within such range has achieved one of the following: (a) An advanced level of skill; (b) An accomplished level of skill; (c) A proficient level of skill; (d) A basic level of skill; (e) A limited level of skill. (3) For the purpose of implementing division (A) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code, the department shall determine and designate a level of achievement, not lower than the level designated in division (A)(2)(e) of this section, on the third grade English language arts assessment for a student to be promoted to the fourth grade. The department shall review and adjust upward the level of achievement designated under this division each year the test is administered until the level is set equal to the level designated in division (A)(2)(c) of this section. The level of achievement designated under this division shall be equal to the level designated in division (A)(2)(c) of this section not later than July 1, 2024. (4) Each school district or school shall teach and assess social studies in at least the fourth and sixth grades. Any assessment in such area shall be determined by the district or school and may be formative or summative in nature. The results of such assessment shall not be reported to the department. (B)(1) The assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of this section shall collectively be known as the Ohio graduation tests. Those tests shall consist of five statewide high school achievement assessments, one each designed to measure the level of reading, writing, mathematics, science, and social studies skill expected at the end of tenth grade. The department shall designate a score in at least the range designated under division (A)(2)(c) of this section on each such assessment that shall be deemed to be a passing score on the assessment as a condition toward granting high school diplomas under sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.612, and 3325.08 of the Revised Code until the assessment system prescribed by section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code is implemented in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section. (2) The department shall prescribe an assessment system in accordance with section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code that shall replace the Ohio graduation tests beginning with students who enter the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014. (3)(B) The department may enter into a reciprocal agreement with the appropriate body or agency of any other state that has similar statewide achievement assessment requirements for receiving high school diplomas, under which any student who has met an achievement assessment requirement of one state is recognized as having met the similar requirement of the other state for purposes of receiving a high school diploma. For purposes of this section and sections 3301.0711 and 3313.61 of the Revised Code, any student enrolled in any public high school in this state who has met an achievement assessment requirement specified in a reciprocal agreement entered into under this division shall be deemed to have attained at least the applicable score designated under this division on each assessment required by division (B)(1) or (2) of this section that is specified in the agreementunder section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (C) The director of education and workforce shall designate dates and times for the administration of the assessments prescribed by divisions (A) and (B) of this section and section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. In prescribing administration dates pursuant to this division, the director shall designate the dates in such a way as to allow a reasonable length of time between the administration of assessments prescribed under this section and any administration of the national assessment of educational progress given to students in the same grade level pursuant to section 3301.27 of the Revised Code or federal law. (D) The department shall prescribe a practice version of each Ohio graduation test described in division (B)(1) of this section that is of comparable length to the actual test. (E) Any committee established by the department for the purpose of making recommendations regarding the designation of scores on the assessments described by this section shall inform the department of the probable percentage of students who would score in each of the ranges established under division (A)(2) of this section on the assessments if the committee's recommendations are adopted by the department. To the extent possible, these percentages shall be disaggregated by gender, major racial and ethnic groups, English learners, economically disadvantaged students, students with disabilities, and migrant students. Sec. 3301.0711. (A) The department of education and workforce shall: (1) Annually furnish to, grade, and score all assessments required by divisions division (A)(1) and (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to be administered by city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school districts, except that each district shall score any assessment administered pursuant to division (B)(10) of this section. Each assessment so furnished shall include the data verification code of the student to whom the assessment will be administered, as assigned pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. In furnishing the practice versions of Ohio graduation tests prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, the department shall make the tests available on its web site for reproduction by districts. In awarding contracts for grading assessments, the department shall give preference to Ohio-based entities employing Ohio residents. (2) Adopt rules for the ethical use of assessments and prescribing the manner in which the assessments prescribed by section sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall be administered to students. (B) Except as provided in divisions (C) and (J) of this section, the board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall, in accordance with rules adopted under division (A) of this section: (1) Administer the English language arts assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code twice annually to all students in the third grade who have not attained the score designated for that assessment under division (A)(2)(c) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. (2) Administer the mathematics assessment prescribed under division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the third grade. (3) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the fourth grade. (4) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(c) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the fifth grade. (5) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(d) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the sixth grade. (6) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(e) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the seventh grade. (7) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the eighth grade. (8) Except as provided in division (B)(9) of this section, administer any assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as follows: (a) At least once annually to all tenth grade students and at least twice annually to all students in eleventh or twelfth grade who have not yet attained the score on that assessment designated under that division; (b) To any person who has successfully completed the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the person by any high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code but has not received a high school diploma and who requests to take such assessment, at any time such assessment is administered in the district. (9) In lieu of the board of education of any city, local, or exempted village school district in which the student is also enrolled, the board of a joint vocational school district shall administer any assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least twice annually to any student enrolled in the joint vocational school district who has not yet attained the score on that assessment designated under that division. A board of a joint vocational school district may also administer such an assessment to any student described in division (B)(8)(b) of this section. (10) If the district has a three-year average graduation rate of not more than seventy-five per cent, administer each assessment prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in September to all ninth grade students who entered ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014. Except as provided in section 3313.614 of the Revised Code for administration of an assessment to a person who has fulfilled the curriculum requirement for a high school diploma but has not passed one or more of the required assessments, the assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall not be administered after the date specified in the rules adopted under division (D)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (11)(a)(8)(a) Except as provided in divisions (B)(11)(b)(B)(8)(b) and (c) of this section, administer the assessments prescribed by division (B)(2) of section 3301.0710 and section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in accordance with the timeline and plan for implementation of those assessments prescribed by rule adopted under division (D)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (b) A student who has presented evidence to the district or school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. However, no board shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (c) A student shall not be required to retake the Algebra I end-of-course examination or the English language arts II end-of-course examination prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in grades nine through twelve if the student demonstrates at least a proficient level of skill, as prescribed under division (B)(5)(a) of that section, or achieves a competency score, as prescribed under division (B)(10) of that section, in an administration of the examination prior to grade nine. (C)(1)(a) In the case of a student receiving special education services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the individualized education program developed for the student under that chapter shall specify the manner in which the student will participate in the assessments administered under this section, except that a student with significant cognitive disabilities to whom an alternate assessment is administered in accordance with division (C)(1) of this section and a student determined to have a disability that includes an intellectual disability as outlined in guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. The individualized education program may excuse the student from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section if it instead specifies an alternate assessment method approved by the department as conforming to requirements of federal law for receipt of federal funds for disadvantaged pupils. To the extent possible, the individualized education program shall not excuse the student from taking an assessment unless no reasonable accommodation can be made to enable the student to take the assessment. No board shall prohibit a student who is not required to take an assessment under division (C)(1) of this section from taking the assessment. (b) Any alternate assessment approved by the department for a student under this division shall produce measurable results comparable to those produced by the assessment it replaces in order to allow for the student's results to be included in the data compiled for a school district or building under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (c)(i) Any student enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school who has been identified, based on an evaluation conducted in accordance with section 3323.03 of the Revised Code or section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 355, 29 U.S.C.A. 794, as amended, as a child with a disability shall be excused from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section if either of the following apply: (I) A plan developed for the student pursuant to rules adopted by the department excuses the student from taking that assessment. (II) The chartered nonpublic school develops a written plan in which the school, in consultation with the student's parents, determines that an assessment or alternative assessment with accommodations does not accurately assess the student's academic performance. The plan shall include an academic profile of the student's academic performance and shall be reviewed annually to determine if the student's needs continue to require excusal from taking the assessment. (ii) A student with significant cognitive disabilities to whom an alternate assessment is administered in accordance with division (C)(1) of this section and a student determined to have a disability that includes an intellectual disability as outlined in guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (iii) In the case of any student so excused from taking an assessment under division (C)(1)(c) of this section, the chartered nonpublic school shall not prohibit the student from taking the assessment. (2) A district board may, for medical reasons or other good cause, excuse a student from taking an assessment administered under this section on the date scheduled, but that assessment shall be administered to the excused student not later than nine days following the scheduled date. The district board shall annually report the number of students who have not taken one or more of the assessments required by this section to the department not later than the thirtieth day of June. (3) No school district board shall excuse any English learner from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section, except that any English learner who has been enrolled in United States schools for less than two years and for whom no appropriate accommodations are available based on guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. However, no board shall prohibit an English learner who is not required to take that assessment from taking the assessment. A board may permit any English learner to take an assessment required to be administered under this section with appropriate accommodations, as determined by the department. For each English learner, each school district shall annually assess that student's progress in learning English, in accordance with procedures approved by the department. The guidance and procedures issued by the department for the purposes of division (C)(3) of this section shall comply with the rules adopted under section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) The governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may excuse an English learner from taking any assessment administered under this section. (b) No governing authority shall require an English learner who has been enrolled in United States schools for less than two years and for whom no appropriate accommodations are available based on guidance issued by the department to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (c) No governing authority shall prohibit an English learner from taking an assessment from which the student was excused under division (C)(4) of this section. (D)(1) (D) In the school year next succeeding the school year in which the assessments prescribed by division (A)(1) or (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or former division (A)(1), (A)(2), or (B) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to September 11, 2001, are administered to any student, the board of education of any school district in which the student is enrolled in that year shall provide to the student intervention services commensurate with the student's performance, including any intensive intervention required under section 3313.608 of the Revised Code, in any skill in which the student failed to demonstrate at least a score at the proficient level on the assessment. (2) Following any administration of the assessments prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to ninth grade students, each school district that has a three-year average graduation rate of not more than seventy-five per cent shall determine for each high school in the district whether the school shall be required to provide intervention services to any students who took the assessments. In determining which high schools shall provide intervention services based on the resources available, the district shall consider each school's graduation rate and scores on the practice assessments. The district also shall consider the scores received by ninth grade students on the English language arts and mathematics assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in the eighth grade in determining which high schools shall provide intervention services. Each high school selected to provide intervention services under this division shall provide intervention services to any student whose results indicate that the student is failing to make satisfactory progress toward being able to attain scores at the proficient level on the Ohio graduation tests. Intervention services shall be provided in any skill in which a student demonstrates unsatisfactory progress and shall be commensurate with the student's performance. Schools shall provide the intervention services prior to the end of the school year, during the summer following the ninth grade, in the next succeeding school year, or at any combination of those times. (E) Except as provided in section 3313.608 of the Revised Code and division (N) of this section, no school district board of education shall utilize any student's failure to attain a specified score on an assessment administered under this section as a factor in any decision to deny the student promotion to a higher grade level. However, a district board may choose not to promote to the next grade level any student who does not take an assessment administered under this section or make up an assessment as provided by division (C)(2) of this section and who is not exempt from the requirement to take the assessment under division (C)(3) of this section. (F) No person shall be charged a fee for taking any assessment administered under this section. (G)(1) Each school district board shall designate one location for the collection of assessments administered in the spring under division (B)(1) of this section and those administered under divisions (B)(2) to (7) of this section. Each district board shall submit the assessments to the entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessments as follows: (a) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was less than two thousand five hundred, not later than the Friday after all of the assessments have been administered; (b) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was two thousand five hundred or more, but less than seven thousand, not later than the Monday after all of the assessments have been administered; (c) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was seven thousand or more, not later than the Tuesday after all of the assessments have been administered. However, any assessment that a student takes during the make-up period described in division (C)(2) of this section shall be submitted not later than the Friday following the day the student takes the assessment. (2) The department or an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessment shall send to each school district board a list of the individual scores of all persons taking a state achievement assessment as follows: (a) Except as provided in division (G)(2)(b) or (c) of this section, within forty-five days after the administration of the assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the thirtieth day of June following the administration; (b) In the case of the third-grade English language arts assessment, within forty-five days after the administration of that assessment, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the fifteenth day of June following the administration; (c) In the case of the writing component of an assessment or end-of-course examination in the area of English language arts, except for the third-grade English language arts assessment, the results may be sent after forty-five days of the administration of the writing component, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the thirtieth day of June following the administration. (3) For assessments administered under this section by a joint vocational school district, the department or entity shall also send to each city, local, or exempted village school district a list of the individual scores of any students of such city, local, or exempted village school district who are attending school in the joint vocational school district. (4) Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, a A school district, other public school, or chartered nonpublic school may administer the third-grade English language arts or mathematics assessment, or both, in a paper format in any school year for which the district board of education or school governing body adopts a resolution indicating that the district or school chooses to administer the assessment in a paper format. The board or governing body shall submit a copy of the resolution to the department of education and workforce not later than the first day of May prior to the school year for which it will apply. If the resolution is submitted, the district or school shall administer the assessment in a paper format to all students in the third grade, except that any student whose individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 355, 29 U.S.C. 794, as amended, specifies that taking the assessment in an online format is an appropriate accommodation for the student may take the assessment in an online format. (5) A classical school may administer all assessments administered under this section in a paper format, except that any student whose individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794 specifies that taking the assessment in an online format is an appropriate accommodation for the student may take the assessment in an online format. (H) Individual scores on any assessments administered under this section shall be released by a district board only in accordance with section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under division (A) of this section. No district board or its employees shall utilize individual or aggregate results in any manner that conflicts with rules for the ethical use of assessments adopted pursuant to division (A) of this section. (I) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, the department or an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessment shall not release any individual scores on any assessment administered under this section. The department shall adopt rules to ensure the protection of student confidentiality at all times. The rules may require the use of the data verification codes assigned to students pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code to protect the confidentiality of student scores. (J) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, this section does not apply to the board of education of any cooperative education school district except as provided under rules adopted pursuant to this division. (1) In accordance with rules that the department shall adopt, the board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district with territory in a cooperative education school district established pursuant to divisions (A) to (C) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code may enter into an agreement with the board of education of the cooperative education school district for administering any assessment prescribed under this section to students of the city, exempted village, or local school district who are attending school in the cooperative education school district. (2) In accordance with rules that the department shall adopt, the board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district with territory in a cooperative education school district established pursuant to section 3311.521 of the Revised Code shall enter into an agreement with the cooperative district that provides for the administration of any assessment prescribed under this section to both of the following: (a) Students students who are attending school in the cooperative district and who, if the cooperative district were not established, would be entitled to attend school in the city, local, or exempted village school district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code; (b) Persons described in division (B)(8)(b) of this section. Any assessment of students pursuant to such an agreement shall be in lieu of any assessment of such students or persons pursuant to this section. (K)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(1) or (2) of this section, each chartered nonpublic school for which at least sixty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who are participating in state scholarship programs shall administer the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or an alternative standardized assessment determined by the department. In accordance with procedures and deadlines prescribed by the department, the parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the school who is not participating in a state scholarship program may submit notice to the chief administrative officer of the school that the parent or guardian does not wish to have the student take the assessments prescribed for the student's grade level under division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. If a parent or guardian submits an opt-out notice, the school shall not administer the assessments to that student. This option does not apply to any assessment required for a high school diploma under section 3313.612 of the Revised Code. (b) Any chartered nonpublic school that enrolls students who are participating in state scholarship programs may administer an alternative standardized assessment determined by the department instead of the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. Each chartered nonpublic school subject to division (K)(1)(a) or (b) of this section shall report the results of each assessment administered under those divisions to the department. (2) A chartered nonpublic school may submit to the director of education and workforce a request for a waiver from administering the elementary assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The director shall approve or disapprove a request for a waiver submitted under division (K)(2) of this section. To be eligible to submit a request for a waiver, a chartered nonpublic school shall meet the following conditions: (a) At least ninety-five per cent of the students enrolled in the school are children with disabilities, as defined under section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, or have received a diagnosis by a school district or from a physician, including a neuropsychiatrist or psychiatrist, or a psychologist who is authorized to practice in this or another state as having a condition that impairs academic performance, such as dyslexia, dyscalculia, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, or Asperger's syndrome. (b) The school has solely served a student population described in division (K)(1)(a) of this section for at least ten years. (c) The school provides to the department at least five years of records of internal testing conducted by the school that affords the department data required for accountability purposes, including diagnostic assessments and nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement assessments that measure reading and math skills. (3) Any chartered nonpublic school that is not subject to division (K)(1) of this section may participate in the assessment program by administering any of the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The chief administrator of the school shall specify which assessments the school will administer. Such specification shall be made in writing to the director prior to the first day of August of any school year in which assessments are administered and shall include a pledge that the nonpublic school will administer the specified assessments in the same manner as public schools are required to do under this section and rules adopted by the department. (4) The department shall furnish the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to each chartered nonpublic school that is subject to division (K)(1) of this section or participates under division (K)(3) of this section. (L) If a chartered nonpublic school is educating students in grades nine through twelve, the following shall apply: (1) Except as provided in division (L)(4) of this section, for a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is accredited through the independent schools association of the central states and who is attending the school under a state scholarship program, the student shall either take all of the assessments prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code or take an alternative assessment approved by the department under section 3313.619 of the Revised Code. However, a student who is excused from taking an assessment under division (C) of this section or has presented evidence to the chartered nonpublic school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. No governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (2) For a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is accredited through the independent schools association of the central states, and who is not attending the school under a state scholarship program, the student shall not be required to take any assessment prescribed under section 3301.0712 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (3)(a) Except as provided in divisions (L)(3)(b) and (4) of this section, for a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is not accredited through the independent schools association of the central states, regardless of whether the student is attending or is not attending the school under a state scholarship program, the student shall do one of the following: (i) Take all of the assessments prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (ii) Take only the assessment prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, provided that the student's school publishes the results of that assessment for each graduating class. The published results of that assessment shall include the overall composite scores, mean scores, twenty-fifth percentile scores, and seventy-fifth percentile scores for each subject area of the assessment. (iii) Take an alternative assessment approved by the department under section 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (b) A student who is excused from taking an assessment under division (C) of this section or has presented evidence to the chartered nonpublic school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. No governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (4) The assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0712 and 3313.619 of the Revised Code shall not be administered to any student attending the school, if the school meets all of the following conditions: (a) At least ninety-five per cent of the students enrolled in the school are children with disabilities, as defined under section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, or have received a diagnosis by a school district or from a physician, including a neuropsychologist or psychiatrist, or a psychologist who is authorized to practice in this or another state as having a condition that impairs academic performance, such as dyslexia, dyscalculia, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, or Asperger's syndrome. (b) The school has solely served a student population described in division (L)(4)(a) of this section for at least ten years. (c) The school makes available to the department at least five years of records of internal testing conducted by the school that affords the department data required for accountability purposes, including growth in student achievement in reading or mathematics, or both, as measured by nationally norm-referenced assessments that have developed appropriate standards for students. Division (L)(4) of this section applies to any student attending such school regardless of whether the student receives special education or related services and regardless of whether the student is attending the school under a state scholarship program. (M)(1) The superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall administer the assessments described by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code for the state school for the blind and the state school for the deaf. The superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall administer the assessments in the same manner as district boards are required to do under this section and rules adopted by the department and in conformity with division (C)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The department shall furnish the assessments described by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code to the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services. (N) Notwithstanding division (E) of this section, a school district may use a student's failure to attain a score in at least the proficient range on the mathematics assessment described by division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or on an assessment described by division (A)(1)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as a factor in retaining that student in the current grade level. (O)(1) In the manner specified in divisions (O)(3) and (4) of this section, the assessments required by division (A)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall become public records pursuant to section 149.43 of the Revised Code on the thirty-first day of July following the school year that the assessments were administered. (2) The department may field test proposed questions with samples of students to determine the validity, reliability, or appropriateness of questions for possible inclusion in a future year's assessment. The department also may use anchor questions on assessments to ensure that different versions of the same assessment are of comparable difficulty. Field test questions and anchor questions shall not be considered in computing scores for individual students. Field test questions and anchor questions may be included as part of the administration of any assessment required by division (A)(1) or (B) of section 3301.0710 and division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (3) Any field test question or anchor question administered under division (O)(2) of this section shall not be a public record. Such field test questions and anchor questions shall be redacted from any assessments which are released as a public record pursuant to division (O)(1) of this section. (4) Division (O)(4) of this section applies to the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 and division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the assessments administered in the spring of the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall determine which questions on each assessment that are used to compute a student's score are a public record, if any. The department shall determine which questions will be needed for reuse on a future assessment and those questions shall not be public records and shall be redacted from the assessment prior to its release as a public record. However, for each redacted question, the department shall inform each city, local, and exempted village school district of the corresponding statewide academic standard adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code and the corresponding benchmark to which the question relates. The department is not required to provide corresponding standards and benchmarks to field test questions that are redacted under division (O)(3) of this section. (P) As used in this section: (1) "Three-year average" means the average of the most recent consecutive three school years of data. (2) "Dropout" means a student who withdraws from school before completing course requirements for graduation and who is not enrolled in an education program approved by the department or an education program outside the state. "Dropout" does not include a student who has departed the country. (3) "Graduation rate" means the ratio of students receiving a diploma to the number of students who entered ninth grade four years earlier. Students who transfer into the district are added to the calculation. Students who transfer out of the district for reasons other than dropout are subtracted from the calculation. If a student who was a dropout in any previous year returns to the same school district, that student shall be entered into the calculation as if the student had entered ninth grade four years before the graduation year of the graduating class that the student joins. (4) "State scholarship programs" means the educational choice scholarship pilot program established under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code, the autism scholarship program established under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program established under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code, and the pilot project scholarship program established under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (5) "Other public school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314., or a STEM school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (6) "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (7) "Classical school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that is a member of the Ohio classical school association, or its successor organization, and uses a curriculum substantially similar to that of a nationally recognized classical school network. Sec. 3301.0712. (A) The department of education and workforce and the chancellor of higher education shall develop a system of college and work ready assessments as described in division (B) of this section to assess whether each student upon graduating from high school is ready to enter college or the workforce. Beginning with students who enter the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, the system shall replace the Ohio graduation tests prescribed in division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as a measure of student academic performance and one determinant of eligibility for a high school diploma in the manner prescribed by rule adopted under division (D) of this section. (B) The college and work ready assessment system shall consist of the following: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(b) of this section, nationally standardized assessments that measure college and career readiness and are used for college admission. The assessments shall be selected jointly by the department and the chancellor, and one of which shall be selected by each school district or school to administer to its students. The assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of this section shall be administered to all eleventh-grade students in the spring of the school year. (b) Beginning with students who enter the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2022, the parent or guardian of a student may elect not to have a nationally standardized assessment administered to that student. In that event, the student's school district or school shall not administer the nationally standardized assessment to that student. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(b) of this section, seven end-of-course examinations, one in each of the areas of English language arts I, English language arts II, science, Algebra I, geometry, American history, and American government. The end-of-course examinations shall be selected jointly by the department and the chancellor in consultation with faculty in the appropriate subject areas at institutions of higher education of the university system of Ohio. Advanced placement examinations and international baccalaureate examinations, as prescribed under section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, in the areas of science, American history, and American government may be used as end-of-course examinations in accordance with division (B)(4)(a)(i) of this section. Final course grades for courses taken under any other advanced standing program, as prescribed under section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, in the areas of science, American history, and American government may be used in lieu of end-of-course examinations in accordance with division (B)(4)(a)(ii) of this section. (b) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, five end-of-course examinations, one in each areas of English language arts II, science, Algebra I, American history, and American government. However, only the end-of-course examinations in English language arts II and Algebra I shall be required for graduation. The department shall, as necessary to implement division (B)(2)(b) of this section, seek a waiver from the United States secretary of education for testing requirements prescribed under federal law to allow for the use and implementation of Algebra I as the primary assessment of high school mathematics. If the department does not receive a waiver under this division, the end-of-course examinations for students described in division (B)(2)(b) of this section also shall include an end-of-course examination in the area of geometry. However, the geometry end-of-course examination shall not be required for graduation. (3) The end-of-course examinations in American history and American government shall require demonstration of mastery of the American history and American government content for social studies standards adopted under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code and the topics required under division (M) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. At least twenty per cent of the end-of-course examination in American government shall address the topics on American history and American government described in division (M) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, both of the following shall apply: (i) If a student is enrolled in an appropriate advanced placement or international baccalaureate course, that student shall take the advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination in lieu of the science, American history, or American government end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section. The department shall specify the score levels for each advanced placement examination and international baccalaureate examination for purposes of calculating the minimum cumulative performance score that demonstrates the level of academic achievement necessary to earn a high school diploma. (ii) If a student is enrolled in an appropriate course under any other advanced standing program, as described in section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, that student shall not be required to take the science, American history, or American government end-of-course examination, whichever is applicable, prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section. Instead, that student's final course grade shall be used in lieu of the applicable end-of-course examination prescribed under that section. The department, in consultation with the chancellor, shall adopt guidelines for purposes of calculating the corresponding final course grades that demonstrate the level of academic achievement necessary to earn a high school diploma. Division (B)(4)(a)(ii) of this section shall apply only to courses for which students receive transcripted credit, as defined in section 3365.01 of the Revised Code. It shall not apply to remedial or developmental courses. (b) No student shall take a substitute examination or examination prescribed under division (B)(4)(a) of this section in place of the end-of-course examinations in English language arts I, English language arts II, Algebra I, or geometry prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section. (c) The department shall consider additional assessments that may be used as substitute examinations in lieu of the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section. (5) The department shall do all of the following: (a) Determine and designate at least five ranges of scores on each of the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section, and substitute examinations prescribed under division (B)(4) of this section. Not later than sixty days after the designation of ranges of scores, the director of education and workforce shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider primary and secondary education legislation regarding the designated range of scores. Each range of scores shall be considered to demonstrate a level of achievement so that any student attaining a score within such range has achieved one of the following: (i) An advanced level of skill; (ii) An accomplished level of skill; (iii) A proficient level of skill; (iv) A basic level of skill; (v) A limited level of skill. (b) Determine a method by which to calculate a cumulative performance score based on the results of a student's end-of-course examinations or substitute examinations; (c) Determine the minimum cumulative performance score that demonstrates the level of academic achievement necessary to earn a high school diploma under division (A)(2) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. However, no new minimum cumulative performance score shall be determined after October 17, 2019. (d) Develop a table of corresponding score equivalents for the end-of-course examinations and substitute examinations in order to calculate student performance consistently across the different examinations. A score of two on an advanced placement examination or a score of two or three on an international baccalaureate examination shall be considered equivalent to a proficient level of skill as specified under division (B)(5)(a)(iii) of this section. (6)(a) A student who meets both of the following conditions shall not be required to take an end-of-course examination: (i) The student received high school credit prior to July 1, 2015, for a course for which the end-of-course examination is prescribed. (ii) The examination was not available for administration prior to July 1, 2015. Receipt of credit for the course described in division (B)(6)(a)(i) of this section shall satisfy the requirement to take the end-of-course examination. A student exempted under division (B)(6)(a) of this section may take the applicable end-of-course examination at a later date. (b) For purposes of determining whether a student who is exempt from taking an end-of-course examination under division (B)(6)(a) of this section has attained the cumulative score prescribed by division (B)(5)(c) of this section, such student shall select either of the following: (i) The student is considered to have attained a proficient score on the end-of-course examination from which the student is exempt; (ii) The student's final course grade shall be used in lieu of a score on the end-of-course examination from which the student is exempt. The department, in consultation with the chancellor, shall adopt guidelines for purposes of calculating the corresponding final course grades and the minimum cumulative performance score that demonstrates the level of academic achievement necessary to earn a high school diploma. (7)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the department may replace the algebra I end-of-course examination prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section with an algebra II end-of-course examination, beginning with the 2016-2017 school year for students who enter ninth grade on or after July 1, 2016. (b) If the department replaces the algebra I end-of-course examination with an algebra II end-of-course examination as authorized under division (B)(7)(a)(B)(6)(a) of this section, both of the following shall apply: (i) A student who is enrolled in an advanced placement or international baccalaureate course in algebra II shall take the advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination in lieu of the algebra II end-of-course examination. (ii) A student who is enrolled in an algebra II course under any other advanced standing program, as described in section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, shall not be required to take the algebra II end-of-course examination. Instead, that student's final course grade shall be used in lieu of the examination. (c) If a school district or school utilizes an integrated approach to mathematics instruction, the district or school may do either or both of the following: (i) Administer an integrated mathematics I end-of-course examination in lieu of the prescribed algebra I end-of-course examination; (ii) Administer an integrated mathematics II end-of-course examination in lieu of the prescribed geometry end-of-course examination. (8)(a) For students entering the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2015, the assessment in the area of science shall be physical science or biology. For students entering the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2015, the (7) The assessment in the area of science shall be biology. (b) Until July 1, 2019, the department shall make available the end-of-course examination in physical science for students who entered the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2015, and who wish to retake the examination. (c) The department shall adopt rules prescribing the requirements for the end-of-course examination in science for students who entered the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2015, and who have not met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code by July 1, 2019, due to a student's failure to satisfy division (A)(2) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. (9)(8) The department shall not develop or administer an end-of-course examination in the area of world history. (10)(9) The department, in consultation with the chancellor and the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall determine a competency score for both of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations for the purpose of graduation eligibility. (C) The department shall convene a group of national experts, state experts, and local practitioners to provide advice, guidance, and recommendations for the alignment of standards and model curricula to the assessments and in the design of the end-of-course examinations prescribed by this section. (D) Upon completion of the development of the assessment system, the department shall adopt rules prescribing all of the following: (1) A timeline and plan for implementation of the assessment system, including a phased implementation if the department determines such a phase-in is warranted; (2) The date after which a person shall meet the requirements of the entire assessment system as a prerequisite for a diploma of adult education under section 3313.611 of the Revised Code; (3) Whether and the extent to which a person may be excused from an American history end-of-course examination and an American government end-of-course examination under division (H) (G) of section 3313.61 and division (B)(3) of section 3313.612 of the Revised Code; (4) The date after which a person who has fulfilled the curriculum requirement for a diploma but has not passed one or more of the required assessments at the time the person fulfilled the curriculum requirement shall meet the requirements of the entire assessment system as a prerequisite for a high school diploma under division (B) of section 3313.614 of the Revised Code; (5) The extent to which the assessment system applies to students enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program for purposes of division (F) of section 3313.603 or a dropout prevention and recovery community school under section 3314.36 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Any person enrolled in a nonchartered nonpublic school or any person who is exempt from attendance at school for the purpose of home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code may choose to participate in the system of assessments administered under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section. However, no such person shall be required to participate in the system of assessments. (2) The department shall adopt rules for the administration and scoring of any assessments under division (E)(1) of this section. (F) The department shall select at least one nationally recognized job skills assessment. Each school district shall administer that assessment to those students who opt to take it. The department shall reimburse a school district for the costs of administering that assessment. The department shall establish the minimum score a student must attain on the job skills assessment in order to demonstrate a student's workforce readiness and employability. The administration of the job skills assessment to a student under this division shall not exempt a school district from administering the assessments prescribed in division (B) of this section to that student. Sec. 3301.0714. (A) The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules for a statewide education management information system. The rules shall require the department to establish guidelines for the establishment and maintenance of the system in accordance with this section and the rules adopted under this section. The guidelines shall include: (1) Standards identifying and defining the types of data in the system in accordance with divisions (B) and (C) of this section; (2) Procedures for annually collecting and reporting the data to the department in accordance with division (D) of this section; (3) Procedures for annually compiling the data in accordance with division (G) of this section; (4) Procedures for annually reporting the data to the public in accordance with division (H) of this section; (5) Standards to provide strict safeguards to protect the confidentiality of personally identifiable student data. (B) The guidelines adopted under this section shall require the data maintained in the education management information system to include at least the following: (1) Student participation and performance data, for each grade in each school district as a whole and for each grade in each school building in each school district, that includes: (a) The numbers of students receiving each category of instructional service offered by the school district, such as regular education instruction, vocational education instruction, specialized instruction programs or enrichment instruction that is part of the educational curriculum, instruction for gifted students, instruction for students with disabilities, and remedial instruction. The guidelines shall require instructional services under this division to be divided into discrete categories if an instructional service is limited to a specific subject, a specific type of student, or both, such as regular instructional services in mathematics, remedial reading instructional services, instructional services specifically for students gifted in mathematics or some other subject area, or instructional services for students with a specific type of disability. The categories of instructional services required by the guidelines under this division shall be the same as the categories of instructional services used in determining cost units pursuant to division (C)(3) of this section. (b) The numbers of students receiving support or extracurricular services for each of the support services or extracurricular programs offered by the school district, such as counseling services, health services, and extracurricular sports and fine arts programs. The categories of services required by the guidelines under this division shall be the same as the categories of services used in determining cost units pursuant to division (C)(4)(a) of this section. (c) Average student grades in each subject in grades nine through twelve; (d) Academic achievement levels as assessed under sections 3301.0710, 3301.0711, and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (e) The number of students designated as having a disabling condition pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code; (f) The numbers of students reported to the department pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code; (g) Attendance rates and the average daily attendance for the year. For purposes of this division, a student shall be counted as present for any field trip that is approved by the school administration. (h) Expulsion rates; (i) Suspension rates; (j) Dropout rates; (k) Rates of retention in grade; (l) For pupils in grades nine through twelve, the average number of carnegie units, as calculated in accordance with the director's rules; (m) Graduation rates, to be calculated in a manner specified by the department that reflects the rate at which students who were in the ninth grade three years prior to the current year complete school and that is consistent with nationally accepted reporting requirements; (n) Results of diagnostic assessments described in division (A)(1) of section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code; (o) The number of students earning each state diploma seal included in the system prescribed under division (A) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code; (p) The number of students demonstrating competency for graduation using each option described in divisions (B)(1)(a) to (d) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code; (q) The number of students completing each foundational and supporting option as part of the demonstration of competency for graduation pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code; (r) The number of students enrolled in all-day kindergarten, as defined in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code. (2) Personnel and classroom enrollment data for each school district, including: (a) The total numbers of licensed employees and nonlicensed employees and the numbers of full-time equivalent licensed employees and nonlicensed employees providing each category of instructional service, instructional support service, and administrative support service used pursuant to division (C)(3) of this section. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require these categories of data to be maintained for the school district as a whole and, wherever applicable, for each grade in the school district as a whole, for each school building as a whole, and for each grade in each school building. (b) The total number of employees and the number of full-time equivalent employees providing each category of service used pursuant to divisions (C)(4)(a) and (b) of this section, and the total numbers of licensed employees and nonlicensed employees and the numbers of full-time equivalent licensed employees and nonlicensed employees providing each category used pursuant to division (C)(4)(c) of this section. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require these categories of data to be maintained for the school district as a whole and, wherever applicable, for each grade in the school district as a whole, for each school building as a whole, and for each grade in each school building. (c) The total number of regular classroom teachers teaching classes of regular education and the average number of pupils enrolled in each such class, in each of grades kindergarten through five in the district as a whole and in each school building in the school district. (d) The number of lead teachers employed by each school district and each school building. (3)(a) Student demographic data for each school district, including information regarding the gender ratio of the school district's pupils, the racial make-up of the school district's pupils, the number of English learners in the district, and an appropriate measure of the number of the school district's pupils who reside in economically disadvantaged households. The demographic data shall be collected in a manner to allow correlation with data collected under division (B)(1) of this section. Categories for data collected pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section shall conform, where appropriate, to standard practices of agencies of the federal government. (b) With respect to each student entering kindergarten, whether the student previously participated in a public preschool program, a private preschool program, or a head start program, and the number of years the student participated in each of these programs. (4)(a) The core curriculum and instructional materials being used for English language arts in each of grades pre-kindergarten to five; (b) The reading intervention programs being used in each of grades pre-kindergarten to twelve. (5) Any data required to be collected pursuant to federal law. (C) The education management information system shall include cost accounting data for each district as a whole and for each school building in each school district. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require the cost data for each school district to be maintained in a system of mutually exclusive cost units and shall require all of the costs of each school district to be divided among the cost units. The guidelines shall require the system of mutually exclusive cost units to include at least the following: (1) Administrative costs for the school district as a whole. The guidelines shall require the cost units under this division (C)(1) to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil in enrolled ADM in the school district, as determined pursuant to section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (2) Administrative costs for each school building in the school district. The guidelines shall require the cost units under this division (C)(2) to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per full-time equivalent pupil receiving instructional or support services in each building. (3) Instructional services costs for each category of instructional service provided directly to students and required by guidelines adopted pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of this section. The guidelines shall require the cost units under division (C)(3) of this section to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in the school district as a whole and average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in each building in the school district and in terms of a total cost for each category of service and, as a breakdown of the total cost, a cost for each of the following components: (a) The cost of each instructional services category required by guidelines adopted under division (B)(1)(a) of this section that is provided directly to students by a classroom teacher; (b) The cost of the instructional support services, such as services provided by a speech-language pathologist, classroom aide, multimedia aide, or librarian, provided directly to students in conjunction with each instructional services category; (c) The cost of the administrative support services related to each instructional services category, such as the cost of personnel that develop the curriculum for the instructional services category and the cost of personnel supervising or coordinating the delivery of the instructional services category. (4) Support or extracurricular services costs for each category of service directly provided to students and required by guidelines adopted pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of this section. The guidelines shall require the cost units under division (C)(4) of this section to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in the school district as a whole and average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in each building in the school district and in terms of a total cost for each category of service and, as a breakdown of the total cost, a cost for each of the following components: (a) The cost of each support or extracurricular services category required by guidelines adopted under division (B)(1)(b) of this section that is provided directly to students by a licensed employee, such as services provided by a guidance counselor or any services provided by a licensed employee under a supplemental contract; (b) The cost of each such services category provided directly to students by a nonlicensed employee, such as janitorial services, cafeteria services, or services of a sports trainer; (c) The cost of the administrative services related to each services category in division (C)(4)(a) or (b) of this section, such as the cost of any licensed or nonlicensed employees that develop, supervise, coordinate, or otherwise are involved in administering or aiding the delivery of each services category. (D)(1) The guidelines adopted under this section shall require school districts to collect information about individual students, staff members, or both in connection with any data required by division (B) or (C) of this section or other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The guidelines may also require school districts to report information about individual staff members in connection with any data required by division (B) or (C) of this section or other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The guidelines shall not authorize school districts to request social security numbers of individual students. The guidelines shall prohibit the reporting under this section of a student's name, address, and social security number to the department. The guidelines shall also prohibit the reporting under this section of any personally identifiable information about any student, except for the purpose of assigning the data verification code required by division (D)(2) of this section, to any other person unless such person is employed by the school district or the information technology center operated under section 3301.075 of the Revised Code and is authorized by the district or technology center to have access to such information or is employed by an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring or the development of state assessments. The guidelines may require school districts to provide the social security numbers of individual staff members and the county of residence for a student. Nothing in this section prohibits the department from providing a student's county of residence to the department of taxation to facilitate the distribution of tax revenue. (2)(a) The guidelines shall provide for each school district or community school to assign a data verification code that is unique on a statewide basis over time to each student whose initial Ohio enrollment is in that district or school and to report all required individual student data for that student utilizing such code. The guidelines shall also provide for assigning data verification codes to all students enrolled in districts or community schools on the effective date of the guidelines established under this section. The assignment of data verification codes for other entities, as described in division (D)(2)(d) of this section, the use of those codes, and the reporting and use of associated individual student data shall be coordinated by the department of education and workforce in accordance with state and federal law. School districts shall report individual student data to the department through the information technology centers utilizing the code. The entities described in division (D)(2)(d) of this section shall report individual student data to the department in the manner prescribed by the department. (b)(i) Except as provided in sections 3301.941, 3310.11, 3310.42, 3310.63, 3313.978, 3317.20, and 5747.057 of the Revised Code, and in division (D)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, at no time shall the department have access to information that would enable any data verification code to be matched to personally identifiable student data. (ii) For the purpose of making per-pupil payments to community schools under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, the department shall have access to information that would enable any data verification code to be matched to personally identifiable student data. (c) Each school district and community school shall ensure that the data verification code is included in the student's records reported to any subsequent school district, community school, or state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, in which the student enrolls. Any such subsequent district or school shall utilize the same identifier in its reporting of data under this section. (d)(i) The director of any state agency that administers a publicly funded program providing services to children who are younger than compulsory school age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, including the directors of health, job and family services, mental health and addiction servicesbehavioral health, children and youth, and developmental disabilities, shall request and receive, pursuant to sections 3301.0723 and 5180.33 of the Revised Code, a data verification code for a child who is receiving those services. (ii) The director of developmental disabilities, director of health, director of job and family services, director of children and youth, director of mental health and addiction servicesbehavioral health, medicaid director, executive director of the commission on minority health, executive director of the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, or director of education and workforce, on behalf of a program that receives public funds and provides services to children who are younger than compulsory school age, may request and receive, pursuant to section 3301.0723 of the Revised Code, a data verification code for a child who is receiving services from the program. (E) The guidelines adopted under this section may require school districts to collect and report data, information, or reports other than that described in divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section for the purpose of complying with other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The other data, information, or reports may be maintained in the education management information system but are not required to be compiled as part of the profile formats required under division (G) of this section or the annual statewide report required under division (H) of this section. (F) The board of education of each school district shall annually collect and report to the department, in accordance with the guidelines established by the department, the data required pursuant to this section. A school district may collect and report these data notwithstanding section 2151.357 or 3319.321 of the Revised Code. (G) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually compile the data reported by each school district pursuant to division (D) of this section. The department shall design formats for profiling each school district as a whole and each school building within each district and shall compile the data in accordance with these formats. These profile formats shall: (1) Include all of the data gathered under this section in a manner that facilitates comparison among school districts and among school buildings within each school district; (2) Present the data on academic achievement levels as assessed by the testing of student achievement maintained pursuant to division (B)(1)(d) of this section. (H)(1) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually prepare a statewide report for all school districts and the general public that includes the profile of each of the school districts developed pursuant to division (G) of this section. Copies of the report shall be sent to each school district. (2) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually prepare an individual report for each school district and the general public that includes the profiles of each of the school buildings in that school district developed pursuant to division (G) of this section. (I) Any data that is collected or maintained pursuant to this section and that identifies an individual pupil is not a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (J) As used in this section: (1) "School district" means any city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district and, in accordance with section 3314.17 of the Revised Code, any community school. As used in division (L) of this section, "school district" also includes any educational service center or other educational entity required to submit data using the system established under this section. (2) "Cost" means any expenditure for operating expenses made by a school district excluding any expenditures for debt retirement except for payments made to any commercial lending institution for any loan approved pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. (K) Any person who removes data from the information system established under this section for the purpose of releasing it to any person not entitled under law to have access to such information is subject to section 2913.42 of the Revised Code prohibiting tampering with data. (L)(1) In accordance with division (L)(2) of this section and the rules adopted under division (L)(10) of this section, the department may sanction any school district that reports incomplete or inaccurate data, reports data that does not conform to data requirements and descriptions published by the department, fails to report data in a timely manner, or otherwise does not make a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. (2) If the department decides to sanction a school district under this division, the department shall take the following sequential actions: (a) Notify the district in writing that the department has determined that data has not been reported as required under this section and require the district to review its data submission and submit corrected data by a deadline established by the department. The department also may require the district to develop a corrective action plan, which shall include provisions for the district to provide mandatory staff training on data reporting procedures. (b) Withhold up to ten per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year and, if not previously required under division (L)(2)(a) of this section, require the district to develop a corrective action plan in accordance with that division; (c) Withhold an additional amount of up to twenty per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year; (d) Direct department staff or an outside entity to investigate the district's data reporting practices and make recommendations for subsequent actions. The recommendations may include one or more of the following actions: (i) Arrange for an audit of the district's data reporting practices by department staff or an outside entity; (ii) Conduct a site visit and evaluation of the district; (iii) Withhold an additional amount of up to thirty per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year; (iv) Continue monitoring the district's data reporting; (v) Assign department staff to supervise the district's data management system; (vi) Conduct an investigation to determine whether to suspend or revoke the license of any district employee in accordance with division (N) of this section; (vii) If the district is issued a report card under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, indicate on the report card that the district has been sanctioned for failing to report data as required by this section; (viii) If the district is issued a report card under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and incomplete or inaccurate data submitted by the district likely caused the district to receive a higher performance rating than it deserved under that section, issue a revised report card for the district; (ix) Any other action designed to correct the district's data reporting problems. (3) Any time the department takes an action against a school district under division (L)(2) of this section, the department shall make a report of the circumstances that prompted the action. The department shall send a copy of the report to the district superintendent or chief administrator and maintain a copy of the report in its files. (4) If any action taken under division (L)(2) of this section resolves a school district's data reporting problems to the department's satisfaction, the department shall not take any further actions described by that division. If the department withheld funds from the district under that division, the department may release those funds to the district, except that if the department withheld funding under division (L)(2)(c) of this section, the department shall not release the funds withheld under division (L)(2)(b) of this section and, if the department withheld funding under division (L)(2)(d) of this section, the department shall not release the funds withheld under division (L)(2)(b) or (c) of this section. (5) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the department may use its own staff or an outside entity to conduct an audit of a school district's data reporting practices any time the department has reason to believe the district has not made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. If any audit conducted by an outside entity under division (L)(2)(d)(i) or (5) of this section confirms that a district has not made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section, the district shall reimburse the department for the full cost of the audit. The department may withhold state funds due to the district for this purpose. (6) Prior to issuing a revised report card for a school district under division (L)(2)(d)(viii) of this section, the department may hold a hearing to provide the district with an opportunity to demonstrate that it made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. The hearing shall be conducted by a referee appointed by the department. Based on the information provided in the hearing, the referee shall recommend whether the department should issue a revised report card for the district. If the referee affirms the department's contention that the district did not make a good faith effort to report data as required by this section, the district shall bear the full cost of conducting the hearing and of issuing any revised report card. (7) If the department determines that any inaccurate data reported under this section caused a school district to receive excess state funds in any fiscal year, the district shall reimburse the department an amount equal to the excess funds, in accordance with a payment schedule determined by the department. The department may withhold state funds due to the district for this purpose. (8) Any school district that has funds withheld under division (L)(2) of this section may appeal the withholding in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (9) In all cases of a disagreement between the department and a school district regarding the appropriateness of an action taken under division (L)(2) of this section, the burden of proof shall be on the district to demonstrate that it made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. (10) The director of education and workforce shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement division (L) of this section. (M) No information technology center or school district shall acquire, change, or update its student administration software package to manage and report data required to be reported to the department unless it converts to a student software package that is certified by the department. (N) The state board of education, in accordance with sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code, may suspend or revoke a license as defined under division (A) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code that has been issued to any school district employee found to have willfully reported erroneous, inaccurate, or incomplete data to the education management information system. (O) No person shall release or maintain any information about any student in violation of this section. Whoever violates this division is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (P) If the department cannot compile any of the information required by division (I)(H) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code based upon the data collected under this section, the department shall develop a plan and a reasonable timeline for the collection of any data necessary to comply with that division. Sec. 3301.0715. (A)(1) The board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall administer a diagnostic assessment in reading and mathematics adopted or approved in accordance with section 3301.079 of the Revised Code to the following: (a) Each student enrolled in kindergarten, first, second, or third grade. (b) Any student who transfers into the district or to a different school within the district if each applicable diagnostic assessment was not administered by the district or school the student previously attended in the current school year, within thirty days after the date of transfer. If the district or school into which the student transfers cannot determine whether the student has taken any applicable diagnostic assessment in the current school year, the district or school may administer the diagnostic assessment to the student. However, if a student transfers into the district prior to the administration of the diagnostic assessments to all students under division (B) of this section, the district may administer the diagnostic assessments to that student on the date or dates determined under that division. (2) The district shall administer the kindergarten readiness assessment to each kindergarten student not earlier than the first day of July of the school year in which the student is enrolled in kindergarten and not later than the twentieth day of instruction of that school year. In no case shall the results of the readiness assessment be used to prohibit a student from enrolling in kindergarten. (B) Each district board shall administer each diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section at least once annually by the thirtieth day of September to all students in the appropriate grade level. The board shall administer a diagnostic assessment to a student with a significant cognitive disability in accordance with guidelines adopted by the department of education and workforce. A district board may administer any diagnostic assessment in the fall and spring of a school year to measure the amount of academic growth attributable to the instruction received by students during that school year. (C) Each district board shall utilize and score the kindergarten readiness assessment in accordance with rules established by the department of children and youth and shall utilize and score each diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section in accordance with rules established by the department of education and workforce. After the administration of the kindergarten readiness assessment or a diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section, each district shall provide a student's completed assessment, the results of such assessment, and any other accompanying documents used during the administration of the assessment to the parent of that student. The district shall include all such documents and information related to a diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section in any plan developed for the student under division (C) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. Each district shall submit, in the manner prescribed by each department, the results of the assessments administered under this section as follows: (1) The results of the kindergarten readiness assessment to the department of children and youth; (2) The results of all diagnostic assessments described in division (A)(1) of this section to the department of education and workforce pursuant to section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. The department of children and youth may report school and district level kindergarten readiness assessment data. The department of education and workforce may report data from any diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section and may use that data to calculate the measures measure prescribed by divisions (B)(1)(g), (C)(1)(g), and (D)(1)(h)division (A)(8) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (D) Each district board shall provide intervention services to students whose diagnostic assessments described in division (A)(1) of this section show that they are failing to make satisfactory progress toward attaining the academic standards for their grade level. (E) Any chartered nonpublic school may elect to administer the kindergarten readiness assessment to all kindergarten students enrolled in the school. If the school so elects, the chief administrator of the school shall notify the director of children and youth not later than the thirty-first day of March prior to any school year in which the school will administer the assessment. The department of children and youth shall furnish the assessment to the school at no cost to the school. In administering the assessment, the school shall do all of the following: (1) Enter into a written agreement with the department of children and youth specifying that the school will share each participating student's assessment data with the department and, that for the purpose of reporting the data to the department, each participating student will be assigned a data verification code as described in division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code; (2) Require the assessment to be administered by a teacher certified under section 3301.071 of the Revised Code who either has completed training on administering the kindergarten readiness assessment or has been trained by another person who has completed such training; (3) Administer the assessment in the same manner as school districts are required to do under this section and the rules established under division (C) of this section. (F) A school district in which less than eighty per cent of its students score at the proficient level or higher on the third-grade English language arts assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall establish a reading improvement plan supported by reading specialists. Prior to implementation, the plan shall be approved by the school district board of education. (G) As used in this section, "kindergarten readiness assessment" means the diagnostic assessment provided by the department of children and youth under section 5104.52 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.0716. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code, the department of education and workforce may have access to personally identifiable information about any student under the following circumstances: (A) An entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of assessments administered under section 3301.0711 or 3301.0712 of the Revised Code has notified the department that the student's written response to a question on an assessment included threats or descriptions of harm to another person or the student's self and the information is necessary to enable the department to identify the student for purposes of notifying the school district or school in which the student is enrolled of the potential for harm. (B) The department requests the information to respond to an appeal from a school district or school for verification of the accuracy of the student's score on an assessment administered under section 3301.0711 or 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (C) The department requests the information to determine whether the student satisfies the alternative conditions for a high school diploma prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.0730. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Education management information system" means the integrated system of statewide data collecting, reporting, and compiling for school districts and schools prescribed under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. (2) "EMIS guidelines" means any guidance the manual issued by the department of education and workforce containing uniform and consistent instructions for reporting the student, staff, and financial information to be collected and reportedthrough the education management information system, along with including data-element definitions, procedures, and guidelines necessary to implement the education management information system requirements for the submission, review, validation, and correction of data. (B) The department shall develop a procedure that permits users of the education management information system to review and provide comment on new or updated EMIS guidelines. The procedure shall satisfy all of the following conditions: (1) The department shall post a copy of the proposed new or updated EMIS guidelines on the department's web site. The department shall solicit comment from EMIS users on the proposed guidelines for thirty consecutive days. (2) The department shall respond to comments provided by users and may revise the proposed new or updated EMIS guidelines based on comments provided by users within thirty consecutive days after the comment period closes. (3) The department shall post the final new or updated EMIS guidelines on its web site at the end of the response period for thirty consecutive days for a final review by EMIS users. The new or updated guidelines shall take effect after that period ends. (C) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, if the department develops new or updated EMIS guidelines to implement a program, initiative, or policy, the department shall use the procedures prescribed under division (B) of this section. The department shall initiate the procedures not later than the fifteenth day of May immediately prior to the beginning of the school year for which the new or updated EMIS guidelines will be effective. (D) On and after June 1, 2021, the The department shall use the procedure prescribed under division (B) of this section for any new or updated EMIS guidelines developed by the department for the purposes of implementing any of the following: (1) A newly enacted state or federal law that takes effect more than ninety days after the date of enactment; (2) A new or updated federal rule; (3) A rule adopted by the department. (E) The department shall not be required to use the procedure prescribed under division (B) of this section when issuing doing any of the following: (1) Updated Updating EMIS guidelines to address issues that are not substantive, such as correcting grammatical errors; (2) Updated Updating EMIS guidelines to address unforeseen technical errors; (3) Supplemental Issuing supplemental documents regarding designed to assist school districts and schools in understanding and using EMIS guidelines and the education management information system, including documents that do any of the following: (a) Clarify the implementation of EMIS guidelines; (b) Answer questions submitted by users of the education management system; (c) Provide training regarding the education management information system; (4) Creating or updating EMIS guidelines to implement a newly enacted state or federal law that takes effect not more than ninety days after the date of enactment; (5) Removing data items from EMIS guidelines to reduce the reporting burden on districts and schools. (F) Additionally, the department shall establish both of the following: (1) Uniform guidance for career-technical planning districts and information technology centers established under section 3301.075 of the Revised Code regarding the education management information system and EMIS guidelines for career-technical planning districts; (2) Uniform training programs for all personnel employed by the department to administer the education management information system. Sec. 3301.111. (A) The state board of education is responsible for the adoption of requirements for educator licensure, licensee disciplinary actions, school district territory transfer determinations, and such other powers and duties expressly prescribed for the state board under the law, including in sections 3301.071, 3301.074, 3301.28, 3302.151, 3314.40, 3326.24, 3328.19, and Chapters 3311. and 3319. of the Revised Code. In exercising any of its powers or duties, including adopting rules prescribing license requirements, the state board is subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (B) The state board shall make recommendations to the director of education and workforce regarding priorities for primary and secondary education. The state board may request the assistance of the department of education and workforce in exercising the state board's powers and duties. To the extent the director determines such assistance necessary and practicable, the department shall provide the requested assistance. To best serve the interests of primary and secondary education and workforce development in the state of Ohio, and to maximize efficiencies and operations, the state board of education and the department of education and workforce may exchange necessary information and documentation upon request to enable both agencies to effectively perform their functions under state or federal law, including sharing information that is proprietary to the agency or confidential. The agency receiving proprietary or confidential information shall not disclose the information and shall adopt safeguards to prevent disclosure. (C) The state board shall appoint the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with Ohio Constitution, Article VI, Section 4 and section 3301.08 of the Revised Code. The state superintendent shall be the secretary of the state board and its executive officer in accordance with sections 3301.09 and 3301.11 of the Revised Code. The state superintendent may serve as an advisor to the director. (D) The state board shall employ such personnel as it determines necessary to carry out its duties and powers. Subject to the state board's policies, rules, and regulations, the state superintendent shall exercise general supervision of the state board's employees, as prescribed in section 3301.11 of the Revised Code, and may appoint, fix the salary, and terminate the employment of such employees. (E) The state board is subject to all provisions of law pertaining to departments, offices, or institutions established for the exercise of any function of the state government, except that it is not one of the departments provided for under division (A) of section 121.01 of the Revised Code. (F) The headquarters of the state board shall be at the seat of government, where office space suitable and adequate for the work of the state board shall be provided by the appropriate state agency. There the state board shall meet and transact its business, unless the state board chooses to meet elsewhere in Ohio as provided by section 3301.04 of the Revised Code. There the records of the state board and the records, papers, and documents belonging to the state board shall be kept in charge of the state superintendent. Sec. 3301.12. (A) The director of education and workforce, in addition to the authority otherwise imposed on the director, shall perform the following duties: (1) Provide technical and professional assistance and advice to all school districts in reference to all aspects of education, including finance, buildings and equipment, administration, organization of school districts, curriculum and instruction, transportation of pupils, personnel problems, and the interpretation of school laws and state regulations; (2) Prescribe and require the preparation and filing of such financial and other reports from school districts, officers, and employees as are necessary or proper. The director shall prescribe and require the installation by school districts of such standardized reporting forms and accounting procedures as are essential to the businesslike operations of the public schools of the state. (3) Conduct such studies and research projects as are necessary or desirable for the improvement of public school education in Ohio. Such studies and projects may include analysis of data contained in the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. For any study or project that requires the analysis of individual student data, the department of education and workforce or any entity with which the director or department contracts to conduct the study or project shall maintain the confidentiality of student data at all times. For this purpose, the department or contracting entity shall use the data verification code assigned pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code for each student whose data is analyzed. Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(1) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code, at no time shall the director, the department, the state board of education, or any entity conducting a study or research project on the director's behalf have access to a student's name, address, or social security number while analyzing individual student data. (4) Prepare and submit annually a report of the activities of the department and the status, problems, and needs of education in the state; (5) Supervise all agencies over which the department exercises administrative control, including schools for education of persons with disabilities; (6)(5) In accordance with section 3333.048 of the Revised Code, the director, jointly with the chancellor of higher education, shall establish metrics and courses of study for institutions of higher education that prepare educators and other school personnel and shall provide for inspection of those institutions. (B) The director may annually inspect and analyze the expenditures of each school district and make a determination as to the efficiency of each district's costs, relative to other school districts in the state, for instructional, administrative, and student support services. The director shall notify each school district as to the nature of, and reasons for, the determination. The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code setting forth the procedures and standards for the performance of the inspection and analysis. Sec. 3301.133. As used in this section, "form" means any report, document, paper, computer software program, or other instrument used in the management information system created by section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code or used to gather required or requested education data under division (I)(H) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code or any other provision of state or federal statute or rule. (A) The organization of the department of education and workforce shall include an identifiable organizational unit that deals with the management of any education data that the department gathers, processes, uses, or reports. The director of education and workforce shall assign employees to this unit or employ persons for this unit who are trained and experienced in data management and the design of forms and who understand the data needs of the department. The director shall provide a sufficient number of such employees for the unit to perform its duties in an effective and timely manner. (B) The unit established pursuant to division (A) of this section shall: (1) Review each new form or modification of any existing form that the department proposes to put into use. In conducting the review of any form, the unit shall evaluate it utilizing at least the criteria specified under division (C) of this section. The unit shall report in writing to the director whether the form satisfies the criteria specified under division (C) of this section, and if not, the reasons why it does not. Each report shall include recommendations regarding the simplification, consolidation, or elimination of the proposed form or any other forms related to the proposed form that would enable all the criteria specified under division (C) of this section to be met. (2) Regularly contact and seek to work with other state and federal agencies that collect and use education data for the purpose of increasing the efficiency and coordination of data collection; (3) Perform any other duties assigned by the director. (C) In conducting the review of any form pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, the unit established under division (A) of this section shall determine whether the following criteria are satisfied: (1) Each data item on the form does not duplicate data already submitted to the department. (2) The form cannot be consolidated with any other form required by the department. (3) The form is required to be submitted no more often than necessary and no sooner than reasonably necessary prior to the date on which the data reported on the form will be initially used. (4) The stated purpose of the form cannot be met as part of any other procedure, such as a verification or certification procedure or other reporting procedure. (5) If the form or any data item on the form is attributed to any requirement of state statute, federal statute or rule, or any court, the form or data item is limited to the data that the statute, rule, or court requires. (6) If the form or any data item on the form is attributed to the requirements of any research or of any process of auditing school districts for compliance with any requirement, the research is planned or currently taking place or the compliance is currently required. (7) The form is designed in a way that minimizes the cost of completing it. (8) The form includes instructions that clearly explain how to complete it, who will use the data reported on it, and whom to contact with questions about completing the form or the use of the data reported on it. Sec. 3301.45. (A) Not later than the thirtieth day of September of each year, the department of education and workforce shall distribute to all public high schools the information provided by the director of job and family services on the online education and career planning tool developed under section 6301.15 of the Revised Code. (B) Annually, the department shall survey high school administrators and guidance counselors regarding their use of the online planning tool and provide the results of the survey to the director of job and family services to support future refinements and improvements to the online planning tool. As used in this section, "public high school" means a school that serves students in any of grades nine through twelve and is operated by a school district or , a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.52. As used in sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code: (A) "Preschool program" means either of the following: (1) A child care program for preschool children that is operated by a school district board of education or an eligible nonpublic school. (2) A child care program for preschool children age three or older that is operated by a county board of developmental disabilities or a community school. (B) "Preschool child" or "child" means a child who has not entered kindergarten and is not of compulsory school age. (C) "Parent, guardian, or custodian" means the person or government agency that is or will be responsible for a child's school attendance under section 3321.01 of the Revised Code. (D) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a school district or the chief administrative officer of a community school or an eligible nonpublic school. (E) "Director" means the director, head teacher, elementary principal, or site administrator who is the individual on site and responsible for supervision of a preschool program. (F) "Preschool staff member" means a preschool employee whose primary responsibility is care, teaching, or supervision of preschool children. (G) "Nonteaching employee" means a preschool program or school child program employee whose primary responsibilities are duties other than care, teaching, and supervision of preschool children or school children. (H) "Eligible nonpublic school" means a nonpublic school chartered as described in division (B)(7) of section 5104.02 of the Revised Code or chartered by the department of education and workforce for any combination of grades one through twelve, regardless of whether it also offers kindergarten. (I) "School child program" means either of the following: (1) A child care program for only school children that is operated by a school district board of education, county board of developmental disabilities, community school, or eligible nonpublic school; (2) A child care program operated by an authorized private before and after school care program. (J) "School child" means a child who is enrolled in or is eligible to be enrolled in a grade of kindergarten or above but is less than fifteen years old. (K) "School child program staff member" means an employee whose primary responsibility is the care, teaching, or supervision of children in a school child program. (L) "Child care" means administering to the needs of infants, toddlers, preschool children, and school children outside of school hours by persons other than their parents or guardians, custodians, or relatives by blood, marriage, or adoption for any part of the twenty-four-hour day in a place or residence other than a child's own home. (M) "Child care center" and "publicly funded child care" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (N) "Community school" means either of the following: (1) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that is sponsored by an entity that is rated "exemplary" under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (2) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that has received, on its most recent report card, either of the following: (a) If the school offers any of grade levels four through twelve, either of the following: (i) A grade of "C" or better for the overall value-added progress dimension under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and for the performance index score under division (C)(1)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (ii) A a performance rating of three stars or higher for achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If the school does not offer a grade level higher than three, either of the following: (i) A grade of "C" or better for making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three under division (C)(1)(g) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (ii) A a performance rating of three stars or higher for early literacy under division (D)(3)(e) of that section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (O) "Authorized private before and after school care program" means a child care program operated only for school children that is all of the following: (1) Operated by a nonprofit or for-profit private entity; (2) Operated under a contract with a school district board of education, community school, or eligible nonpublic school; (3) Conducted only outside of school hours and in a building owned or operated by the contracting board or school. Sec. 3301.85. (A) The department of education and workforce, in conjunction with the department of higher education and the department of children and youth, shall create, administer, and oversee the prenatal-to-five early childhood to post-secondary regional partnerships program to support existing and establish new early childhood to post-secondary regional partnerships throughout Ohio in regions that choose to participate. The department of education and workforce is the agency primarily responsible for implementation of the program. Each partnership may consist of prenatal-to-five early learning programs, primary and secondary schools, educational service centers, out-of-school time providers, post-secondary institutions, and workforce and community partners that are located in the same region and that are working collaboratively to increase educational attainment and economic mobility outcomes for children and adults. (B) The departments shall do all of the following: (1) Coordinate and convene a cohort of all existing and emerging regional partnerships at least quarterly to share best practices and assist in organizational development and growth; (2) Distribute grants, in a manner determined by the departments, to qualifying partnerships to support regional collaboration programs that align educational resources and community support with regional in-demand workforce skills, opportunities, and jobs; (3) Work to ensure that at least one regional partnership exists within each of the six different regions region of the state, as determined by JobsOhio, as defined in section 187.01 of the Revised Code; (4) Report the progress and outcomes of each regional partnership at least twice a year to the director of education and workforce, the chancellor of higher education, the director of children and youth, and annually to the governor and the general assembly. (C)(1) Qualifying partnerships eligible to apply for grants under this section shall demonstrate all of the following: (a) An identified theory of action and explicit commitment to address all areas of the education and workforce continuum over time, including a commitment to measure and report targeted attainment outcome metrics; (b) How it will integrate and align its work with business advisory councils created under section 3313.82 of the Revised Code within the region, the educational regional service system established under Chapter 3312. of the Revised Code, industry sector partnerships, and other regional educational attainment efforts as appropriate; (c) How it will work with local health care systems, service providers, and other stakeholders to better address the workforce readiness, mental health, and well-being skills children and young adults need to be successful in and beyond elementary and secondary school years. (2) Qualifying partnerships shall report all of the following performance metrics for their region to the department of education and workforce, the department of higher education, and the department of children and youth: (a) Kindergarten readiness; (b) Third-grade reading proficiency; (c) Middle grade math proficiency; (d) High school graduation rates; (e) Free application for federal student aid completion rates; (f) Post-secondary enrollment; (g) Post-secondary credential or degree completion; (h) Employment for their region that includes the following: (i) Percentage of recent graduates who found employment within one year of completing a post-secondary credential or degree; (ii) Percentage of recent graduates who completed some form of work-based learning while enrolled in a post-secondary institution. Sec. 3302.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Performance index score" means the average of the totals derived from calculations, for each subject area, of the weighted proportion of untested students and students scoring at each level of skill described in division (A)(2) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on the state achievement assessments, as follows: (1) For the assessments prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, the average for each of the subject areas of English language arts, mathematics, and science. (2) For the assessments assessment prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 and division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, the average for each of the subject areas of English language arts, mathematics, science, American history, and American government. The average also shall include any substitute examinations approved under division (B)(4) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in the subject areas of science, American history, and American government. The department of education and workforce shall assign weights such that students who do not take an assessment receive a weight of zero and students who take an assessment receive progressively larger weights dependent upon the level of skill attained on the assessment. The department shall assign additional weights to students who have been permitted to pass over a subject in accordance with a student acceleration policy adopted under section 3324.10 of the Revised Code. If such a student attains the proficient score prescribed under division (A)(2)(c) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or higher on an assessment, the department shall assign the student the weight prescribed for the next higher scoring level. If such a student attains the advanced score, prescribed under division (A)(2)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, on an assessment, the department shall assign to the student an additional proportional weight. For each school year that such a student's score is included in the performance index score and the student attains the proficient score on an assessment, that additional weight shall be assigned to the student on a subject-by-subject basis. Students shall be included in the "performance index score" in accordance with division (L)(2)(K)(2) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (B) "Subgroup" means a subset of the entire student population of the state, a school district, or a school building and includes each of the following: (1) Major racial and ethnic groups; (2) Students with disabilities; (3) Economically disadvantaged students; (4) English learners; (5) Students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code. For students who are gifted in specific academic ability fields, the department shall use data for those students with specific academic ability in math and reading. If any other academic field is assessed, the department shall also include data for students with specific academic ability in that field. (C) "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001" includes the statutes codified at 20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq. and any amendments, waivers, or both thereto, rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to those statutes, guidance documents, and any other policy directives regarding implementation of that act issued by the United States department of education. (D) "Adequate yearly progress" means a measure of annual academic performance as calculated in accordance with the "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001." (E) "Supplemental educational services" means additional academic assistance, such as tutoring, remediation, or other educational enrichment activities, that is conducted outside of the regular school day by a provider approved by the department in accordance with the "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001." (F) "Value-added progress dimension" means a measure of academic gain for a student or group of students over a specific period of time that is calculated by applying a statistical methodology to individual student achievement data derived from the achievement assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The "value-added progress dimension" shall be developed and implemented in accordance with section 3302.021 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) "Four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate" means the number of students who graduate in four years or less with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the graduating class. (2) "Five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate" means the number of students who graduate in five years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate. (H) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (I) "Annual measurable objectives" means a measure of student progress determined in accordance with an agreement between the department of education and workforce and the United States department of education. (J) "Community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. (K) "STEM school" means a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (L) "Entitled to attend school in the district" means entitled to attend school in a school district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3302.02. (A) Not later than one year after the adoption of rules under division (D) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code and at least every sixth year thereafter, the department of education and workforce shall establish all of the following: (1)(A) A set of performance indicators that considered as a unit will be used as one of the performance categories for the report cards required by section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. In establishing these indicators, the department shall consider inclusion of student performance on assessments prescribed under section 3301.0710 or 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, rates of student improvement on such assessments, the breadth of coursework available within the district, and other indicators of student success. Beginning with the report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the 2021-2022 school year, the The performance indicators prescribed under this division (A)(1) of this section regarding student performance on state assessments shall not require a school district or building to attain a proficiency percentage to meet an indicator. Rather, the performance indicators only shall report proficiency percentages, trends, and comparisons. (2)(B) A performance indicator that reflects the level of identification and services provided to, and the performance of, students identified as gifted under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code. The indicator shall be prescribed by rules adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code by the department. The department shall consult with the gifted advisory council regarding all rules adopted under this section. Consultation with the state gifted advisory council shall occur not less than every three years. The gifted performance indicator shall include: (a)(1) The performance of students on state assessments, as measured by a performance index score, disaggregated for students identified as gifted; (b)(2) Value-added growth measure under section 3302.021 of the Revised Code, disaggregated for students identified as gifted; (c)(3) The level of identification as measured by the percentage of students in each grade level identified as gifted and disaggregated by traditionally underrepresented and economically disadvantaged students; (d)(4) The level of services provided to students as measured by the percentage of students provided services in each grade level and disaggregated by traditionally underrepresented and economically disadvantaged students. (3)(C) A performance indicator that measures chronic absenteeism, as determined by the department, in a school district or school building. Beginning with the report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the 2021-2022 school year, the The performance indicators prescribed in divisions (A)(2) (B) and (3) (C) of this section shall not be part of the performance indicator unit under division (A)(1) (A) of this section. (B) For the 2013-2014 school year, except as otherwise provided in this section, for any indicator based on the percentage of students attaining a proficient score on the assessments prescribed by divisions (A) and (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, a school district or building shall be considered to have met the indicator if at least eighty per cent of the tested students attain a score of proficient or higher on the assessment. A school district or building shall be considered to have met the indicator for the assessments prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code and only as administered to eleventh grade students, if at least eighty-five per cent of the tested students attain a score of proficient or higher on the assessment. The department shall adopt rules, under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, to establish proficiency percentages to meet each indicator that is based on a state assessment, prescribed under section 3301.0710 or 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, for the 2014-2015, 2015-2016, 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, and 2020-2021 school years by the following dates: (1) Not later than December 31, 2015, for the 2014-2015 school year; (2) Not later than July 1, 2016, for the 2015-2016 school year; (3) Not later than July 1, 2017, for the 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, and 2020-2021 school years. Sec. 3302.021. (A) The department of education and workforce shall implement a value-added progress dimension for school districts and buildings and shall incorporate the value-added progress dimension into the report cards and performance ratings issued for districts and buildings under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. The department shall adopt rules, pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, for the implementation of the value-added progress dimension. The rules adopted under this division shall specify both of the following: (1) A scale for describing the levels of academic progress in reading and mathematics relative to a standard year of academic growth in those subjects for each of grades three through eight; (2) That the department shall maintain the confidentiality of individual student test scores and individual student reports in accordance with sections 3301.0711, 3301.0714, and 3319.321 of the Revised Code and federal law. The department may require school districts to use a unique identifier for each student for this purpose. Individual student test scores and individual student reports shall be made available only to a student's classroom teacher and other appropriate educational personnel and to the student's parent or guardian. (B) The department shall explore the feasibility of using the value-added gain index and effect size to improve differentiation and interpretation of the measure. If the department determines that it is feasible, it may update the rules adopted under division (A) of this section to implement the use of gain index and effect size. If rules are adopted under division (A) of this section that use the gain index and effect size, any prior method used to calculate letter grades or performance ratings under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code shall no longer apply. Rather, the department shall update its rules to determine how letter grades or performance ratings for each level of performance are calculated under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code using gain index and effect size. (C) The department shall use a system designed for collecting necessary data, calculating the value-added progress dimension, analyzing data, and generating reports, which system has been used previously by a nonprofit organization led by the Ohio business community for at least one year in the operation of a pilot program in cooperation with school districts to collect and report student achievement data via electronic means and to provide information to the districts regarding the academic performance of individual students, grade levels, school buildings, and the districts as a whole. (D) The department shall not pay more than two dollars per student for data analysis and reporting to implement the value-added progress dimension in the same manner and with the same services as under the pilot program described by division (B) of this section. However, nothing in this section shall preclude the department or any school district from entering into a contract for the provision of more services at a higher fee per student. Any data analysis conducted under this section by an entity under contract with the department shall be completed in accordance with timelines established by the director of education and workforce. (E) The department shall share any aggregate student data and any calculation, analysis, or report utilizing aggregate student data that is generated under this section with the chancellor of higher education. The department shall not share individual student test scores and individual student reports with the chancellor. (F) The department shall make individual student performance data reports available to districts and schools that have an overall score under the value-added progress dimension calculated under division (D)(1)(d) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. The reports shall include data regarding student level percentiles, normal curve equivalents, unique identifiers, and other data for each school year a district or school has an overall score calculated under that division. The department also shall make available the data used to calculate the district's or school's overall growth rating. The reports shall be made available in an electronic spreadsheet form, as soon as practicable each school year, to appropriate educational personnel in each district or school for all the individual students who are administered assessments by, or who are enrolled in, the district or school. Division (F) of this section is subject to section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 20 U.S.C. 1232g. Sec. 3302.03. Not later than the thirty-first day of July of each year, the department of education and workforce shall submit preliminary report card data for overall academic performance and for each separate performance measure for each school district, and each school building, in accordance with this section. Annually, not later than the fifteenth day of September or the preceding Friday when that day falls on a Saturday or Sunday, the department shall assign a letter grade or performance rating for overall academic performance and for each separate performance measure for each school district, and each school building in a district, in accordance with this section. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. The department's rules shall establish performance criteria for each letter grade or performance rating and prescribe a method by which the department assigns each letter grade or performance rating. For a school building to which any of the performance measures do not apply, due to grade levels served by the building, the department shall designate the performance measures that are applicable to the building and that must be calculated separately and used to calculate the building's overall grade or performance rating. The department shall issue annual report cards reflecting the performance of each school district, each building within each district, and for the state as a whole using the performance measures and letter grade or performance rating system described in this section. The department shall include on the report card for each district and each building within each district the most recent two-year trend data in student achievement for each subject and each grade. (A)(1) For the 2012-2013 school year, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the following performance measures: (a) Annual measurable objectives; (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as adopted by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.02 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(d), (B)(1)(d), or (C)(1)(d) of this section, the department shall designate a four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate of ninety-three per cent or higher for an "A" and a five-year cohort graduation rate of ninety-five per cent or higher for an "A." (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. The letter grade assigned for this growth measure shall be as follows: (i) A score that is at least one standard error of measure above the mean score shall be designated as an "A." (ii) A score that is less than one standard error of measure above but greater than one standard error of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "B." (iii) A score that is less than or equal to one standard error of measure below the mean score but greater than two standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "C." (iv) A score that is less than or equal to two standard errors of measure below the mean score but is greater than three standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "D." (v) A score that is less than or equal to three standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as an "F." Whenever the value-added progress dimension is used as a graded performance measure in this division and divisions (B) and (C) of this section, whether as an overall measure or as a measure of separate subgroups, the grades for the measure shall be calculated in the same manner as prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (f) The value-added progress dimension score for a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. (2) The department shall adopt a resolution describing the performance measures, benchmarks, and grading system for the 2012-2013 school year and shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (A)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, including performance benchmarks for each letter grade. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (A)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing such methods, including performance benchmarks. (3) There shall not be an overall letter grade for a school district or building for the 2012-2013 school year. (B)(1) For the 2013-2014 school year, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the following performance measures: (a) Annual measurable objectives; (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as created by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (B)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (B)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates; (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. (f) The value-added progress dimension score for a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. (g) Whether a school district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The department shall adopt rules to prescribe benchmarks and standards for assigning grades to districts and buildings for purposes of division (B)(1)(g) of this section. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under divisions (B)(1)(g) and (C)(1)(g) of this section, the department shall determine progress made based on the reduction in the total percentage of students scoring below grade level, or below proficient, compared from year to year on the reading diagnostic assessments administered under section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code and the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The department shall designate for a "C" grade a value that is not lower than the statewide average value for this measure. No grade shall be issued under divisions (B)(1)(g) and (C)(1)(g) of this section for a district or building in which less than five per cent of students have scored below grade level on the diagnostic assessment administered to students in kindergarten under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (h) For a high mobility school district or building, an additional value-added progress dimension score. For this measure, the department shall use value-added data from the most recent school year available and shall use assessment scores for only those students to whom the district or building has administered the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for each of the two most recent consecutive school years. As used in this division, "high mobility school district or building" means a school district or building where at least twenty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who have attended that school district or building for less than one year. (2) In addition to the graded measures in division (B)(1) of this section, the department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following without an assigned letter grade: (a) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building participating in advanced placement classes and the percentage of those students who received a score of three or better on advanced placement examinations; (b) The number of a district's or building's students who have earned at least three college credits through dual enrollment or advanced standing programs, such as the post-secondary enrollment options program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's transcript or other official document, either of which is issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit. The credits earned that are reported under divisions (B)(2)(b) and (C)(2)(c) of this section shall not include any that are remedial or developmental and shall include those that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree. (c) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who have taken a national standardized test used for college admission determinations and the percentage of those students who are determined to be remediation-free in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code; (d) The percentage of the district's or the building's students who receive industry-recognized credentials as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. (e) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who are participating in an international baccalaureate program and the percentage of those students who receive a score of four or better on the international baccalaureate examinations. (f) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive an honors diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code. (3) The department shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under divisions (B)(1)(f) and (B)(1)(g) of this section will be assessed and assigned a letter grade, including performance benchmarks for each grade. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (B)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing such methods, including performance benchmarks. (4) There shall not be an overall letter grade for a school district or building for the 2013-2014, 2014-2015, 2015-2016, and 2016-2017 school years. (C)(1) For the 2014-2015, 2015-2016, 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, and 2020-2021 school years, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the performance measures prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section. The graded measures are as follows: (a) Annual measurable objectives. For the 2017-2018 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than twenty-five students. For the 2018-2019 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than twenty students. Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than fifteen students. (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as created by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (C)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (C)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates; (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension, or another measure of student academic progress if adopted by the department, of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades for overall score on value-added progress dimension under division (C)(1)(e) of this section, the department shall prohibit the assigning of a grade of "A" for that measure unless the district's or building's grade assigned for value-added progress dimension for all subgroups under division (C)(1)(f) of this section is a "C" or higher. For the metric prescribed by division (C)(1)(e) of this section, the department may adopt a student academic progress measure to be used instead of the value-added progress dimension. If the department adopts such a measure, it also shall prescribe a method for assigning letter grades for the new measure that is comparable to the method prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (f) The value-added progress dimension score of a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis, as determined by a method prescribed by the department. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. The department may adopt student academic progress measures to be used instead of the value-added progress dimension. If the department adopts such measures, it also shall prescribe a method for assigning letter grades for the new measures that is comparable to the method prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (g) Whether a school district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The department shall adopt rules to prescribe benchmarks and standards for assigning grades to a district or building for purposes of division (C)(1)(g) of this section. The department shall designate for a "C" grade a value that is not lower than the statewide average value for this measure. No grade shall be issued under division (C)(1)(g) of this section for a district or building in which less than five per cent of students have scored below grade level on the kindergarten diagnostic assessment under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (h) For a high mobility school district or building, an additional value-added progress dimension score. For this measure, the department shall use value-added data from the most recent school year available and shall use assessment scores for only those students to whom the district or building has administered the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for each of the two most recent consecutive school years. As used in this division, "high mobility school district or building" means a school district or building where at least twenty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who have attended that school district or building for less than one year. (2) In addition to the graded measures in division (C)(1) of this section, the department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following without an assigned letter grade: (a) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who have taken a national standardized test used for college admission determinations and the percentage of those students who are determined to be remediation-free in accordance with the standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code; (b) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building participating in advanced placement classes and the percentage of those students who received a score of three or better on advanced placement examinations; (c) The percentage of a district's or building's students who have earned at least three college credits through advanced standing programs, such as the college credit plus program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's college transcript issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit. The credits earned that are reported under divisions (B)(2)(b) and (C)(2)(c) of this section shall not include any that are remedial or developmental and shall include those that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree. (d) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive an honor's diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code; (e) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive industry-recognized credentials as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code; (f) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who are participating in an international baccalaureate program and the percentage of those students who receive a score of four or better on the international baccalaureate examinations; (g) The results of the college and career-ready assessments administered under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (h) Whether the school district or building has implemented a positive behavior intervention and supports framework in compliance with the requirements of section 3319.46 of the Revised Code, notated as a "yes" or "no" answer. (3) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish a method to assign an overall grade for a school district or school building for the 2017-2018 school year and each school year thereafter. The rules shall group the performance measures in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section into the following components: (a) Gap closing, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(a) of this section; (b) Achievement, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(1)(b) and (c) of this section; (c) Progress, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(1)(e) and (f) of this section; (d) Graduation, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(d) of this section; (e) Kindergarten through third-grade literacy, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(g) of this section; (f) Prepared for success, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section. The department shall develop a method to determine a grade for the component in division (C)(3)(f) of this section using the performance measures in divisions (C)(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section. When available, the department may incorporate the performance measure under division (C)(2)(g) of this section into the component under division (C)(3)(f) of this section. When determining the overall grade for the prepared for success component prescribed by division (C)(3)(f) of this section, no individual student shall be counted in more than one performance measure. However, if a student qualifies for more than one performance measure in the component, the department may, in its method to determine a grade for the component, specify an additional weight for such a student that is not greater than or equal to 1.0. In determining the overall score under division (C)(3)(f) of this section, the department shall ensure that the pool of students included in the performance measures aggregated under that division are all of the students included in the four- and five-year adjusted graduation cohort. In the rules adopted under division (C)(3) of this section, the department shall adopt a method for determining a grade for each component in divisions (C)(3)(a) to (f) of this section. The department also shall establish a method to assign an overall grade of "A," "B," "C," "D," or "F" using the grades assigned for each component. The method the department adopts for assigning an overall grade shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (C)(3)(b) and (c) of this section. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods for calculating the overall grade for the report card, as required by this division, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing the format for the report card, weights that will be assigned to the components of the overall grade, and the method for calculating the overall grade. (D) For the 2021-2022 school year and each school year thereafter, all of the following apply: (1)(A) The department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following performance measures without an assigned performance rating: (a)(1) Whether the district or building meets the gifted performance indicator under division (A)(2)(B) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code and the extent to which the district or building meets gifted indicator performance benchmarks; (b)(2) The extent to which the district or building meets the chronic absenteeism indicator under division (A)(3)(C) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code; (c)(3) Performance index score percentage for a district or building, which shall be calculated by dividing the district's or building's performance index score according to the performance index system created by the department by the maximum performance index score for a district or building. The maximum performance index score shall be as follows: (i)(a) For a building, the average of the highest two per cent of performance index scores achieved by a building for the school year for which a report card is issued; (ii)(b) For a district, the average of the highest two per cent of performance index scores achieved by a district for the school year for which a report card is issued. (d)(4) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building, for which the department shall use three consecutive years of value-added data. In using three years of value-added data to calculate the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(d)(A)(4) of this section, the department shall assign a weight of fifty per cent to the most recent year's data and a weight of twenty-five per cent to the data of each of the other years. However, if three consecutive years of value-added data is not available, the department shall use prior years of value-added data to calculate the measure, as follows: (i)(a) If two consecutive years of value-added data is not available, the department shall use one year of value-added data to calculate the measure. (ii)(b) If two consecutive years of value-added data is available, the department shall use two consecutive years of value-added data to calculate the measure. In using two years of value-added data to calculate the measure, the department shall assign a weight of sixty-seven per cent to the most recent year's data and a weight of thirty-three per cent to the data of the other year. (e) The (5) A four-year adjusted cohort graduation measure, which the department shall calculate in the same manner as the four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate, except that the department shall include as graduates any students with an individualized education program, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, who have satisfied the conditions for a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code but opted not to receive a diploma at the time that the graduation requirements were met, but will receive a diploma prior to the student's twenty-second birthday, and are still receiving education services. (f) The (6) A five-year adjusted cohort graduation measure, which the department shall calculate in the same manner as the five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate, except that the department shall include as graduates any students with an individualized education program who have satisfied the conditions for a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code but opted not to receive a diploma at the time that the graduation requirements were met, but will receive a diploma prior to the student's twenty-second birthday, and are still receiving education services. (g)(7) The percentage of students in the district or building who score proficient or higher on the reading segment of the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. To the extent possible, the department shall include the results of the summer administration of the third grade reading assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in the performance measures prescribed under divisions (D)(1)(g)(A)(7) and (h)(8) of this section. (h)(8) Whether a district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The method shall determine progress made based on the reduction in the total percentage of students scoring below grade level, or below proficient, compared from year to year on the reading segments of the diagnostic assessments administered under division (A)(1) of section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code and the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The method shall not include a deduction for students who did not pass the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code and were not on a reading improvement and monitoring plan. The performance measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h)(A)(8) of this section shall not be included on the report card of a district or building in which less than ten per cent of students have scored below grade level on the diagnostic assessment administered to students in kindergarten under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (i)(9) The percentage of students in a district or building who are promoted to the fourth grade based on the student's score on the third grade English language arts assessment under division (A)(3) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or demonstrate competency on an alternative assessment under division (A)(2)(c) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code; (j)(10) A post-secondary readiness measure. This measure shall be calculated by dividing the number of students included in the four-year adjusted graduation rate cohort who demonstrate post-secondary readiness by the total number of students included in the denominator of the four-year adjusted graduation rate cohort. Demonstration of post-secondary readiness shall include a student doing any of the following: (i) Attaining (a) Achieving both of the following: (i) Attaining a remediation-free score in English language arts, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code or scoring either accomplished or advanced on the end-of-course examination in English language arts II prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (ii) Attaining a remediation-free score in mathematics, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code or scoring either accomplished or advanced on the end-of-course examinations in both Algebra I and geometry prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (ii)(b) Attaining required scores on three or more advanced placement, college-level examination program, or international baccalaureate examinations. The required score for an advanced placement examination shall be a three or better. The required score for a college-level examination program examination shall be a passing score, as determined by the department. The required score for an international baccalaureate examination shall be a four or better. A student may satisfy this condition with any combination of advanced placement, college-level examination program, or international baccalaureate examinations. (iii)(c) Earning at least twelve college credits through advanced any combination of the following: (i) Advanced standing programs, such as the college credit plus program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, an early college high school program under section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's college transcript issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit; (ii) Advanced placement or international baccalaureate examinations. Under this division, a score of three or better on an advanced placement examination or a score of four or more on an international baccalaureate examination shall equate to three college credits. Earned Earned credits reported under division (A)(10)(c) (D)(1)(j)(iii) of this section shall include credits that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree, but shall not include any remedial or developmental credits. (iv)(d) Meeting the additional criteria for an honors diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code; (v)(e) Earning an industry-recognized credential or license issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code; (vi) Satisfying any of the following conditions: (I)(f) Completing a pre-apprenticeship aligned with options established under section 3313.904 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field; (II)(g) Completing an apprenticeship registered with the apprenticeship council established under section 4139.02 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field; (III)(h) Providing evidence of acceptance into an apprenticeship program after high school that is restricted to participants eighteen years of age or older. (vii)(i) Earning a cumulative score of proficient or higher on three or more state technical assessments aligned with section 3313.903 of the Revised Code in a single career pathway; (viii)(j) Earning an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code and completing two hundred fifty hours of an internship or other work-based learning experience that is either: (I)(i) Approved by the business advisory council established under section 3313.82 of the Revised Code that represents the student's district; or (II)(ii) Aligned to the career-technical education pathway approved by the department in which the student is enrolled. (ix)(k) Providing evidence that the student has enlisted in a branch of the armed services of the United States as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. A student who satisfies more than one of the conditions prescribed under this division shall be counted as one student for the purposes of calculating the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(j)(A)(10) of this section. (2)(B) In addition to the performance measures under division (D)(1)(A) of this section, the department shall report on a district's or building's report card all of the following data without an assigned performance rating: (a)(1) The applicable performance indicators established by the department under division (A)(1)(A) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code; (b)(2) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building for the most recent school year; (c)(3) A composite of the overall scores under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building for the previous three school years or, if only two years of value-added data are available, for the previous two years; (d)(4) The percentage of students included in the four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates of a district or building who did not receive a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate that data according to the following categories: (i)(a) Students who are still enrolled in the district or building and receiving general education services; (ii)(b) Students with an individualized education program, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, who satisfied the conditions for a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code, but opted not to receive a diploma and are still receiving education services; (iii)(c) Students with an individualized education program who have not yet satisfied conditions for a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code and who are still receiving education services; (iv)(d) Students who are no longer enrolled in any district or building; (v)(e) Students who, upon enrollment in the district or building for the first time, had completed fewer units of high school instruction required under section 3313.603 of the Revised Code than other students in the four- or five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate. The department may disaggregate the data prescribed under division (D)(2)(d)(B)(4) of this section according to other categories that the department determines are appropriate. (e)(5) Post-graduate outcomes for students who were enrolled in a district or building and received a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code in the school year prior to the school year for which the report card is issued, including the percentage of students who: (i)(a) Enrolled in a post-secondary educational institution. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate that data according to whether the student enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education, a two-year institution of higher education, an Ohio technical center that provides adult technical education services and is recognized by the chancellor of higher education, or another type of post-secondary educational institution. (ii)(b) Entered an apprenticeship program registered with the apprenticeship council established under Chapter 4139. of the Revised Code. The department may include other job training programs with similar rigor and outcomes. (iii)(c) Attained gainful employment, as determined by the department; (iv)(d) Enlisted in a branch of the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. (f)(6) Whether the school district or building has implemented a positive behavior intervention and supports framework in compliance with the requirements of section 3319.46 of the Revised Code, notated with a "yes" or "no"; (g)(7) The number and percentage of high school seniors in each school year who completed the free application for federal student aid; (h) Beginning with the report card issued under this section for the 2022-2023 school year, a (8) A student opportunity profile measure that reports data regarding the opportunities provided to students by a district or building. To the extent possible, and when appropriate, the data shall be disaggregated by grade level and subgroup. The measure also shall include data regarding the statewide average, the average for similar school districts, and, for a building, the average for the district in which the building is located. The measure shall include all of the following data for the district or building: (i)(a) The average ratio of teachers of record to students in each grade level in a district or building; (ii)(b) The average ratio of school counselors to students in a district or building; (iii)(c) The average ratio of nurses to students in a district or building; (iv)(d) The average ratio of licensed librarians and library media specialists to students in a district or building; (v)(e) The average ratio of social workers to students in a district or building; (vi)(f) The average ratio of mental health professionals to students in a district or building; (vii)(g) The average ratio of paraprofessionals to students in a district or building; (viii)(h) The percentage of teachers with fewer than three years of experience teaching in any school; (ix)(i) The percentage of principals with fewer than three years of experience as a principal in any school; (x)(j) The percentage of teachers who are not teaching in the subject or field for which they are certified or licensed; (xi)(k) The percentage of kindergarten students who are enrolled in all-day kindergarten, as defined in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code; (xii)(l) The percentage of students enrolled in a performing or visual arts course; (xiii)(m) The percentage of students enrolled in a physical education or wellness course; (xiv)(n) The percentage of students enrolled in a world language course; (xv)(o) The percentage of students in grades seven through twelve who are enrolled in a career-technical education course; (xvi)(p) The percentage of students participating in one or more cocurricular activities; (xvii)(q) The percentage of students participating in advance placement courses, international baccalaureate courses, honors courses, or courses offered through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code; (xviii)(r) The percentage of students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code and receiving gifted services pursuant to that chapter; (xix)(s) The percentage of students participating in enrichment or support programs offered by the district or building outside of the normal school day; (xx)(t) The percentage of eligible students participating each school day in school breakfast programs offered by the district or building in accordance with section 3313.813 or 3313.818 of the Revised Code; (xxi)(u) The percentage of students who are transported by a school bus each school day; (xxii)(v) The ratio of portable technology devices that students may take home to the number of students. The department shall include only opportunity measures at the building level for which data for buildings is available, as determined by a school district. (i)(i)(9) The percentage of students included in the four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates of the district or building who completed all of grades nine through twelve while enrolled in the district or building; (ii)(10) The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate for only those students who were continuously enrolled in the same district or building for grades nine through twelve. (j)(11) Whether the district or building provides information about and promotes the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code to students in accordance with section 3365.04 of the Revised Code, notated with a "yes" or "no"; (k)(12) The percentage of students in the district or building to whom both of the following apply: (i)(a) The students are promoted to fourth grade and not subject to retention under division (A)(2) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (ii)(b) The students completed all of the grade levels offered prior to the fourth grade in the district or building. (13) The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate; (14) The five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate. (3)(C) Except as provided in division (D)(3)(f)(C)(6) of this section, the department shall use the method prescribed under rules adopted under division (D)(4)(D) of this section to assign performance ratings of "one star," "two stars," "three stars," "four stars," or "five stars," as described in division (F)(E) of this section, for a district or building for the individual components prescribed under this division (D)(3) of this section. The department also shall assign an overall performance rating for a district or building in accordance with division (D)(3)(g)(C)(7) of this section. The method shall use the performance measures prescribed under division (D)(1)(A) of this section to calculate performance ratings for components. The method may report data under division (D)(2)(B) of this section with corresponding components, but shall not use the data to calculate performance ratings for that component. The performance measures and reported data shall be grouped together into components as follows: (a)(1) Gap closing. In addition to other criteria determined appropriate by the department, performance ratings for the gap closing component shall reflect whether each of the following performance measures are met or not met: (i)(a) The gifted performance indicator as described in division (D)(1)(a)(A)(1) of this section; (ii)(b) The chronic absenteeism indicator as described in division (D)(1)(b)(A)(2) of this section; (iii)(c) For English learners, an English language proficiency improvement indicator established by the department; (iv)(d) The subgroup graduation targets; (v)(e) The subgroup achievement targets in both mathematics and English language arts; (vi)(f) The subgroup progress targets in both mathematics and English language arts. Achievement and progress targets under division (D)(3)(a)(C)(1) of this section shall be calculated individually, and districts and buildings shall receive a status of met or not met on each measure. The department shall not require a subgroup of a district or building to meet both the achievement and progress targets at the same time to receive a status of met. The department shall not include any subgroup data in this measure that includes data from fewer than fifteen students. Any penalty for failing to meet the required assessment participation rate must be partially in proportion to how close the district or building was to meeting the rate requirement. (b)(2) Achievement, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(c)(A)(3) of this section and the reported data in division (D)(2)(a)(B)(1) of this section. Performance ratings for the achievement component shall be awarded as a percentage of the maximum performance index score described in division (D)(1)(c)(A)(3) of this section. (c)(3) Progress, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(d)(A)(4) of this section and the reported data in divisions (D)(2)(b)(B)(2) and (c)(3) of this section; (d)(4) Graduation, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (D)(1)(e)(A)(5) and (f)(6) of this section and the reported data in divisions (D)(2)(d)(B)(4), (9), (13), and (j)(14) of this section. The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate measure shall be assigned a weight of sixty per cent and the five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate measure shall be assigned a weight of forty per cent. (e)(5) Early literacy, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (D)(1)(g), (h),(A)(7), (8), and (i)(9) of this section and the reported data in division (D)(2)(k)(B)(12) of this section. If the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h)(A)(8) of this section is included in a report card, performance ratings for the early literacy component shall give a weight of forty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(g)(A)(7) of this section, a weight of thirty-five per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(i)(A)(9) of this section, and a weight of twenty-five per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h)(A)(8) of this section. If the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h)(A)(8) of this section is not included in a report card of a district or building, performance ratings for the early literacy component shall give a weight of sixty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(g)(A)(7) of this section and a weight of forty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(i)(A)(9) of this section. (f)(6) College, career, workforce, and military readiness, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(j)(A)(10) of this section and the reported data in division (D)(2)(e)(B)(5) of this section. For the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, and 2023-2024 school years, the department only shall report the data for, and not assign a performance rating to, the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component. The reported data shall include the percentage of students who demonstrate post-secondary readiness using any of the options described in division (D)(1)(j) of this section. The department shall analyze the data included in the performance measure prescribed in division (D)(1)(j) of this section for the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, and 2023-2024 school years. Using that data, the The department shall develop and propose adopt rules for establishing a method to assign a performance rating to the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component based on that measure the performance measure prescribed in division (A)(10) of this section. The method to assign a performance rating shall not include a tiered structure or per student bonuses. The rules shall specify that a district or building shall not receive lower than a performance rating of three stars for the component if the district's or building's performance on the component meets or exceeds a level of improvement set by the department. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in division (D)(4)(b)(D) of this section, more than half of the total districts and buildings may earn a performance rating of three stars on this component to account for the districts and buildings that earned a performance rating of three stars because they met or exceeded the level of improvement set by the department. The department shall submit the rules to the joint committee on agency rule review. The committee shall conduct at least one public hearing on the proposed rules and approve or disapprove the rules. If the committee approves the rules, the department shall adopt the rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the rules are adopted, the department shall assign a performance rating to the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component under the rules beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, and for each school year thereafter. If the committee disapproves the rules, the component shall be included in the report card only as reported data for the 2024-2025 school year, and each school year thereafter. (g)(i) Except as provided for in division (D)(3)(g)(ii) of this section, beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, under (7) Under the method prescribed under rules adopted in division (D)(4)(D) of this section, the department shall use the performance ratings assigned for the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a)(C)(1) to (e)(6) of this section to determine and assign an overall performance rating of "one star," "one and one-half stars," "two stars," "two and one-half stars," "three stars," "three and one-half stars," "four stars," "four and one-half stars," or "five stars" for a district or building. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(b) and (c) of this section. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), and (e) of this section. The individual weights of each of the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), and (e) of this section shall be equal to one-half of the weight given to the component prescribed in division (D)(3)(b) of this section. (ii) If the joint committee on agency rule review approves the department's rules regarding the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component as described in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, for the 2024-2025 school year, and each school year thereafter, the The department's method shall use the components in divisions (D)(3)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f)(C)(1) to (6) of this section to calculate the overall performance rating. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(b)(C)(2) and (c)(3) of this section. The method shall give equal weight to the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), (e)(C)(1), (4), (5), and (f)(6) of this section. The individual weights of each of the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), (e)(C)(1), (4), (5), and (f)(6) of this section shall be equal to one-half the weight given to the component prescribed in division (D)(3)(b)(C)(2) of this section. If the joint committee on agency rule review disapproves the department's rules regarding the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component as described in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, division (D)(3)(g)(ii) of this section does not apply. (4)(a)(D) The department shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to establish the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system necessary to implement divisions (D) and (F) of this section, including the method for the department to assign performance ratings under division (D)(3)(C) of this section. (b) In establishing the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system, the department shall consult with stakeholder groups and advocates that represent parents, community members, students, business leaders, and educators from different school typology regions. The department shall use data from prior school years and simulations to ensure that there is meaningful differentiation among districts and buildings across all performance ratings and that, except as permitted in division (D)(3)(f)(C)(6) of this section, more than half of all districts or buildings do not earn the same performance rating in any component or overall performance rating. (c) The department shall adopt the rules prescribed by division (D)(4) of this section not later than March 31, 2022. However, the department shall notify districts and buildings of the changes to the report card prescribed in law not later than one week after September 30, 2021. (d) Prior to adopting or updating rules under this division (D)(4) of this section, the director of education and workforce and the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider primary and secondary education legislation describing the format for the report card and the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system, including the method to assign performance ratings under division (D)(3)(C) of this section. (E) The department may develop a measure of student academic progress for high school students using only data from assessments in English language arts and mathematics. If the department develops this measure, each school district and applicable school building shall be assigned a separate letter grade for it not sooner than the 2017-2018 school year. The district's or building's grade for that measure shall not be included in determining the district's or building's overall letter grade. (F)(1) The letter grades assigned to a school district or building under this section shall be as follows: (a) "A" for a district or school making excellent progress; (b) "B" for a district or school making above average progress; (c) "C" for a district or school making average progress; (d) "D" for a district or school making below average progress; (e) "F" for a district or school failing to meet minimum progress. (2)(E)(1) For the overall performance rating under division (D)(3)(C) of this section, the department shall include a descriptor for each performance rating as follows: (a) "Significantly exceeds state standards" for a performance rating of five stars; (b) "Exceeds state standards" for a performance rating of four stars or four and one-half stars; (c) "Meets state standards" for a performance rating of three stars or three and one-half stars; (d) "Needs support to meet state standards" for a performance rating of two stars or two and one-half stars; (e) "Needs significant support to meet state standards" for a performance rating of one star or one and one-half stars. (3)(2) For performance ratings for each component under divisions (D)(3)(a) to (f)division (C) of this section, the department shall include a description of each component and performance rating. The description shall include component-specific context to each performance rating earned, estimated comparisons to other school districts and buildings if appropriate, and any other information determined by the department. The descriptions shall be not longer than twenty-five words in length when possible. In addition to such descriptions, the department shall include the descriptors in division (F)(2)(E)(1) of this section for component performance ratings. (4)(3) Each report card issued under this section shall include all of the following: (a) A graphic that depicts the performance ratings of a district or school on a color scale. The color associated with a performance rating of three stars shall be green and the color associated with a performance rating of one star shall be red. (b) An arrow graphic that shows data trends for performance ratings for school districts or buildings. The department shall determine the data to be used for this graphic, which shall include at least the three most recent years of data. (c) A description regarding the weights that are assigned to each component and used to determine an overall performance rating, as prescribed under division (D)(3)(g)(C)(7) of this section, which shall be included in the presentation of the overall performance rating on each report card. (G)(F) When reporting data on student achievement and progress, the department shall disaggregate that data according to the following categories: (1) Performance of students by grade-level; (2) Performance of students by race and ethnic group; (3) Performance of students by gender; (4) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for three or more years; (5) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for more than one year and less than three years; (6) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for one year or less; (7) Performance of students grouped by those who are economically disadvantaged; (8) Performance of students grouped by those who are enrolled in a conversion community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (9) Performance of students grouped by those who are classified as English learners; (10) Performance of students grouped by those who have disabilities; (11) Performance of students grouped by those who are classified as migrants; (12) Performance of students grouped by those who are identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and the specific academic ability fields of reading and math pursuant to Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code. In disaggregating specific academic ability fields for gifted students, the department shall use data for those students with specific academic ability in math and reading. If any other academic field is assessed, the department shall also include data for students with specific academic ability in that field as well. (13) Performance of students grouped by those who perform in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis, as determined by a method prescribed by the department. The department may disaggregate data on student performance according to other categories that the department determines are appropriate. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate data on student performance according to any combinations of two or more of the categories listed in divisions (G)(1)(F)(1) to (13) of this section that it deems relevant. In reporting data pursuant to division (G)(F) of this section, the department shall not include in the report cards any data statistical in nature that is statistically unreliable or that could result in the identification of individual students. For this purpose, the department shall not report student performance data for any group identified in division (G)(F) of this section that contains less than ten students. If the department does not report student performance data for a group because it contains less than ten students, the department shall indicate on the report card that is why data was not reported. (H)(G) The department may include with the report cards any additional education and fiscal performance data it deems valuable. (I)(H) The department shall include on each report card a list of additional information collected by the department that is available regarding the district or building for which the report card is issued. When available, such additional information shall include student mobility data disaggregated by race and socioeconomic status, college enrollment data, and the reports prepared under section 3302.031 of the Revised Code. The department shall maintain a site on the world wide web. The report card shall include the address of the site and shall specify that such additional information is available to the public at that site. The department shall also provide a copy of each item on the list to the superintendent of each school district. The district superintendent shall provide a copy of any item on the list to anyone who requests it. (J)(1)(a)(I)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (J)(1)(b)(I)(1)(b) of this section, for any district that sponsors a conversion community school under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, the department shall combine data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in the community school with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the report card issued for the district under this section or section 3302.033 of the Revised Code. (b) The department shall not combine data from any conversion community school that a district sponsors if the conversion community school is a dropout prevention and recovery community school, as defined in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. The department shall include as an addendum to the district's report card the ratings and performance measures that are required under section 3314.017 of the Revised Code for any community school to which division (J)(1)(b)(I)(1)(b) of this section applies. This addendum shall include, at a minimum, the data specified in divisions (C)(1)(a), (C)(2), and (C)(3) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. (2) Any district that leases a building to a community school located in the district or that enters into an agreement with a community school located in the district whereby the district and the school endorse each other's programs may elect to have data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in the community school combined with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the district report card. Any district that so elects shall annually file a copy of the lease or agreement with the department. (3) Any municipal school district, as defined in section 3311.71 of the Revised Code, that sponsors a community school located within the district's territory, or that enters into an agreement with a community school located within the district's territory whereby the district and the community school endorse each other's programs, may exercise either or both of the following elections: (a) To have data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in that community school combined with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the district's report card; (b) To have the number of students attending that community school noted separately on the district's report card. The election authorized under division (J)(3)(a)(I)(3)(a) of this section is subject to approval by the governing authority of the community school. Any municipal school district that exercises an election to combine or include data under division (J)(3)(I)(3) of this section, by the first day of October of each year, shall file with the department documentation indicating eligibility for that election, as required by the department. (K)(J) The department shall include on each report card the percentage of teachers in the district or building who are properly certified or licensed teachers, as defined in section 3319.074 of the Revised Code, and a comparison of that percentage with the percentages of such teachers in similar districts and buildings. (L)(1)(K)(1) In calculating English language arts, mathematics, science, American history, or American government assessment passage rates used to determine school district or building performance under this section, the department shall include all students taking an assessment with accommodation or to whom an alternate assessment is administered pursuant to division (C)(1) or (3) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code and all students who take substitute examinations approved under division (B)(4) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in the subject areas of science, American history and American government. (2) In calculating performance index scores, rates of achievement on the performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.02 of the Revised Code, and annual measurable objectives for determining adequate yearly progress for school districts and buildings under this section, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Include for each district or building only those students who are included in the ADM certified for the first full school week of October and are continuously enrolled in the district or building through the time of the spring administration of any assessment prescribed by division (A)(1) or (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 or division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code that is administered to the student's grade level; (b) Include cumulative totals from both the fall and spring administrations of the third grade English language arts achievement assessment and, to the extent possible, the summer administration of that assessment; (c) Include for each district or building any English learner in accordance with the department's plan, as approved by the United States secretary of education, to comply with the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339. As used in this section, "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (M)(L) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year and at least once every three years thereafter, the department shall review and may adjust the benchmarks for assigning letter grades or performance ratings to the performance measures and components prescribed under divisions (C)(3), (D), and (E) (A), (B), and (C) of this section. Sec. 3302.034. (A) The department of education and workforce shall adopt and specify measures in addition to those included on the report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. The measures adopted under this section shall be reported separately, as specified under division (B) of this section, for each school district, each building in a district, each community school established under Chapter 3314., and each STEM school established under Chapter 3326., and each college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. The measures shall include at least the following: (1) Data for students who have passed over a grade or subject area under an acceleration policy prescribed under section 3324.10 of the Revised Code; (2) The number of students who are economically disadvantaged as determined by the department; (3) The number of lead teachers employed by each district and each building once the data is available through the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code; (4) The amount of students screened and identified as gifted under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code; (5) Postgraduate student outcome data, including postsecondary credit earned, nationally recognized career or technical certification, military enlistment, job placement, and attendance rate; (6) Availability of courses in fine arts; (7) Participation with other school districts to provide career-technical education services to students. (B) The department shall report this information annually beginning with the 2013-2014 school year and make this information available on its web site for comparison purposes. Sec. 3302.035. (A) Not later than October 1, 2015, and not later than the first day of October each year thereafter, the department of education and workforce shall report for each school district, each community school established under Chapter 3314., and each STEM school established under Chapter 3326., and each college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, the following measures for students with disabilities enrolled in that school district or community, or STEM, or college-preparatory boarding school: (1) The value-added progress dimension score disaggregated for that subgroup, as determined by the department; (2) The performance index score for that subgroup, as defined under division (A) of section 3302.01 of the Revised Code; (3) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates, as defined under divisions (G)(1) and (2) of section 3302.01 of the Revised Code, for that subgroup. (B) The department shall make each report completed pursuant to division (A) of this section available on its web site for comparison purposes. Sec. 3302.04. (A) The department of education and workforce shall establish a system of intensive, ongoing support for the improvement of school districts and school buildings. In accordance with the model of differentiated accountability described in section 3302.041 of the Revised Code, the system shall give priority to districts and buildings in the manner prescribed by any agreement currently in force between the department of education and workforce and the United States department of education. The department of education and workforce shall endeavor to include schools and buildings that receive grades or performance ratings under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code that the department considers to be low performing. The system shall include services provided to districts and buildings through regional service providers, such as educational service centers. The system may include the appointment of an improvement coordinator for any of the lowest performing districts, as determined by the department of education and workforce, to coordinate the district's academic improvement efforts and to build support among the community for those efforts. (B) A district or building that meets the conditions for intervention prescribed by the agreement described in division (A) of this section shall be subject to any rules establishing such intervention. (C) The department of education and workforce may initiate a site evaluation of a building or school district that meets the conditions for a site evaluation prescribed by the agreement described in division (A) of this section. (D) This division applies only to school districts that operate a school building that fails to make adequate yearly progress for two or more consecutive school years. It does not apply to any such district after June 30, 2008, except as provided in division (D)(2) of section 3313.97 of the Revised Code. (1) For any school building that fails to make adequate yearly progress for two consecutive school years, the district shall do all of the following: (a) Provide written notification of the academic issues that resulted in the building's failure to make adequate yearly progress to the parent or guardian of each student enrolled in the building. The notification shall also describe the actions being taken by the district or building to improve the academic performance of the building and any progress achieved toward that goal in the immediately preceding school year. (b) If the building receives funds under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, from the district, in accordance with section 3313.97 of the Revised Code, offer all students enrolled in the building the opportunity to enroll in an alternative building within the district that is not in school improvement status as defined by the "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001." Notwithstanding Chapter 3327. of the Revised Code, the district shall spend an amount equal to twenty per cent of the funds it receives under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, to provide transportation for students who enroll in alternative buildings under this division, unless the district can satisfy all demand for transportation with a lesser amount. If an amount equal to twenty per cent of the funds the district receives under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, is insufficient to satisfy all demand for transportation, the district shall grant priority over all other students to the lowest achieving students among the subgroup described in division (B)(3) of section 3302.01 of the Revised Code in providing transportation. Any district that does not receive funds under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, shall not be required to provide transportation to any student who enrolls in an alternative building under this division. (2) For any school building that fails to make adequate yearly progress for three consecutive school years, the district shall do both of the following: (a) If the building receives funds under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, from the district, in accordance with section 3313.97 of the Revised Code, provide all students enrolled in the building the opportunity to enroll in an alternative building within the district that is not in school improvement status as defined by the "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001." Notwithstanding Chapter 3327. of the Revised Code, the district shall provide transportation for students who enroll in alternative buildings under this division to the extent required under division (D)(2) of this section. (b) If the building receives funds under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, from the district, offer supplemental educational services to students who are enrolled in the building and who are in the subgroup described in division (B)(3) of section 3302.01 of the Revised Code. The district shall spend a combined total of an amount equal to twenty per cent of the funds it receives under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, to provide transportation for students who enroll in alternative buildings under division (D)(1)(b) or (D)(2)(a) of this section and to pay the costs of the supplemental educational services provided to students under division (D)(2)(b) of this section, unless the district can satisfy all demand for transportation and pay the costs of supplemental educational services for those students who request them with a lesser amount. In allocating funds between the requirements of divisions (D)(1)(b) and (D)(2)(a) and (b) of this section, the district shall spend at least an amount equal to five per cent of the funds it receives under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, to provide transportation for students who enroll in alternative buildings under division (D)(1)(b) or (D)(2)(a) of this section, unless the district can satisfy all demand for transportation with a lesser amount, and at least an amount equal to five per cent of the funds it receives under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, to pay the costs of the supplemental educational services provided to students under division (D)(2)(b) of this section, unless the district can pay the costs of such services for all students requesting them with a lesser amount. If an amount equal to twenty per cent of the funds the district receives under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, is insufficient to satisfy all demand for transportation under divisions (D)(1)(b) and (D)(2)(a) of this section and to pay the costs of all of the supplemental educational services provided to students under division (D)(2)(b) of this section, the district shall grant priority over all other students in providing transportation and in paying the costs of supplemental educational services to the lowest achieving students among the subgroup described in division (B)(3) of section 3302.01 of the Revised Code. Any district that does not receive funds under Title I, Part A of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339, shall not be required to provide transportation to any student who enrolls in an alternative building under division (D)(2)(a) of this section or to pay the costs of supplemental educational services provided to any student under division (D)(2)(b) of this section. No student who enrolls in an alternative building under division (D)(2)(a) of this section shall be eligible for supplemental educational services under division (D)(2)(b) of this section. (3) For any school building that fails to make adequate yearly progress for four consecutive school years, the district shall continue to comply with division (D)(2) of this section and shall implement at least one of the following options with respect to the building: (a) Institute a new curriculum that is consistent with the statewide academic standards adopted pursuant to division (A) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code; (b) Decrease the degree of authority the building has to manage its internal operations; (c) Appoint an outside expert to make recommendations for improving the academic performance of the building. The district may request the department to establish a state intervention team for this purpose pursuant to division (E) of this section. (d) Extend the length of the school day or year; (e) Replace the building principal or other key personnel; (f) Reorganize the administrative structure of the building. (4) For any school building that fails to make adequate yearly progress for five consecutive school years, the district shall continue to comply with division (D)(2) of this section and shall develop a plan during the next succeeding school year to improve the academic performance of the building, which shall include at least one of the following options: (a) Reopen the school as a community school under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (b) Replace personnel; (c) Contract with a nonprofit or for-profit entity to operate the building; (d) Turn operation of the building over to the department; (e) Other significant restructuring of the building's governance. (5) For any school building that fails to make adequate yearly progress for six consecutive school years, the district shall continue to comply with division (D)(2) of this section and shall implement the plan developed pursuant to division (D)(4) of this section. (6) A district shall continue to comply with division (D)(1)(b) or (D)(2) of this section, whichever was most recently applicable, with respect to any building formerly subject to one of those divisions until the building makes adequate yearly progress for two consecutive school years. (E) The department may establish a state intervention team to evaluate all aspects of a school district or building, including management, curriculum, instructional methods, resource allocation, and scheduling. Any such intervention team shall be appointed by the department and shall include teachers and administrators recognized as outstanding in their fields. The intervention team shall make recommendations regarding methods for improving the performance of the district or building. The department shall not approve a district's request for an intervention team under division (D)(3) of this section if the department cannot adequately fund the work of the team, unless the district agrees to pay for the expenses of the team. (F) The department shall conduct individual audits of a sampling of community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code to determine compliance with this section. (G) A school district in which the pilot project scholarship program is operating under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code shall report the use of funding for tutorial assistance grants under that program in the district's three-year continuous improvement plan under this section in a manner approved by the department. (H) The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules for implementing this section. Sec. 3302.05. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules freeing school districts from specified state mandates if one of the following applies: (A) For the 2011-2012 school year, the school district was declared to be excellent under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to March 22, 2013, and had above expected growth in the overall value-added measure. (B) For the 2012-2013 school year, the school district received a grade of "A" for the number of performance indicators met under division (A)(1)(c) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and for the value-added dimension under division (A)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (C) For the 2013-2014, 2014-2015, or 2015-2016 school year, the school district received a grade of "A" for the number of performance indicators met under division (B)(1)(c) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and for the value-added dimension under division (B)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (D) For the 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, or 2020-2021 school year, the school district received an overall grade of "A" under division (C)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (E) For the 2021-2022 school year and for each school year thereafter, the school district received an overall performance rating of five stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. Any mandates included in the rules shall be only those statutes or rules pertaining to state education requirements. The rules shall not exempt districts from any operating standard adopted under division (D)(3) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3302.07. (A) The board of education of any school district, the governing board of any educational service center, the governing authority of any community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, the governing authority of any STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or the administrative authority of any chartered nonpublic school may submit to the department of education and workforce an application proposing an innovative education pilot program the implementation of which requires exemptions from specific statutory provisions or rules. If a district or service center board employs teachers under a collective bargaining agreement adopted pursuant to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, any application submitted under this division shall include the written consent of the teachers' employee representative designated under division (B) of section 4117.04 of the Revised Code. The exemptions requested in the application shall be limited to any requirement of Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or of any rule of the department adopted pursuant to that title except that the application may not propose an exemption from any requirement of or rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 3307. or 3309., section 3302.41 or 3302.42, sections 3319.07 to 3319.21, section 3313.6028, 3319.2310, or Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. Furthermore, an exemption from any operating standard adopted under division (B)(2) or (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code shall be granted only pursuant to a waiver granted by the director of education and workforce under division (O)(N) of that section. (B) The department shall accept any application submitted in accordance with division (A) of this section. The director shall approve or disapprove the application in accordance with standards for approval, which shall be adopted by the department. (C) The director shall exempt each district or, service center, community school, or STEM school board or chartered nonpublic school administrative authority with an application approved under division (B) of this section for a specified period from the statutory provisions or rules specified in the approved application. The period of exemption shall not exceed the period during which the pilot program proposed in the application is being implemented and a reasonable period to allow for evaluation of the effectiveness of the program. (D) The department shall promote innovative educational programs designed to increase student achievement and engagement, improve student wellness, and prepare students for the workforce and post-secondary education. The department shall do all of the following: (1) Provide technical assistance and support to districts and schools in designing and implementing innovative ideas for education; (2) Publicize model projects of educational innovation, including projects that use artificial intelligence in instruction; (3) Promote the availability of waivers from education laws and rules under this section to implement innovative educational programs. Sec. 3302.10. (A) The department of education and workforce shall establish an academic distress commission for any school district that meets one of the following conditions: (1) The district has for three consecutive years received either of the following: (a) An overall grade of "F" under division (C)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (b) An an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (2) An academic distress commission established for the district under former section 3302.10 of the Revised Code was still in existence on October 15, 2015, and has been in existence for at least four years. (B)(1) The academic distress commission shall consist of five members as follows: (a) Three members appointed by the director of education and workforce, one of whom is a resident in the county in which a majority of the district's territory is located; (b) One member appointed by the president of the district board of education, who shall be a teacher employed by the district; (c) One member appointed by the mayor of the municipality in which a majority of the district's territory is located or, if no such municipality exists, by the mayor of a municipality selected by the director of education and workforce in which the district has territory. Appointments to the commission shall be made within thirty days after the district is notified that it is subject to this section. Members of the commission shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority. The director shall designate a chairperson for the commission from among the members appointed by the director. The chairperson shall call and conduct meetings, set meeting agendas, and serve as a liaison between the commission and the chief executive officer appointed under division (C)(1) of this section. (2) In the case of a school district that meets the condition in division (A)(2) of this section, the academic distress commission established for the district under former section 3302.10 of the Revised Code shall be abolished and a new academic distress commission shall be appointed for the district pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section. (C)(1) Within sixty days after the director has designated a chairperson for the academic distress commission, the commission shall appoint a chief executive officer for the district, who shall be paid by the department of education and workforce and shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. The individual appointed as chief executive officer shall have high-level management experience in the public or private sector. The chief executive officer shall exercise complete operational, managerial, and instructional control of the district, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following powers and duties, but the chief executive officer may delegate, in writing, specific powers or duties to the district board or district superintendent: (a) Replacing school administrators and central office staff; (b) Assigning employees to schools and approving transfers; (c) Hiring new employees; (d) Defining employee responsibilities and job descriptions; (e) Establishing employee compensation; (f) Allocating teacher class loads; (g) Conducting employee evaluations; (h) Making reductions in staff under section 3319.17, 3319.171, or 3319.172 of the Revised Code; (i) Setting the school calendar; (j) Creating a budget for the district; (k) Contracting for services for the district; (l) Modifying policies and procedures established by the district board; (m) Establishing grade configurations of schools; (n) Determining the school curriculum; (o) Selecting instructional materials and assessments; (p) Setting class sizes; (q) Providing for staff professional development. (2) If an improvement coordinator was previously appointed for the district pursuant to division (A) of section 3302.04 of the Revised Code, that position shall be terminated. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit the chief executive officer from employing the same individual or other staff to perform duties or functions previously performed by the improvement coordinator. (D) The academic distress commission, in consultation with the director of education and workforce and the chief executive officer, shall be responsible for expanding high-quality school choice options in the district. The commission, in consultation with the director, may create an entity to act as a high-quality school accelerator for schools not operated by the district. The accelerator shall promote high-quality schools in the district, lead improvement efforts for underperforming schools, recruit high-quality sponsors for community schools, attract new high-quality schools to the district, and increase the overall capacity of schools to deliver a high-quality education for students. Any accelerator shall be an independent entity and the chief executive officer shall have no authority over the accelerator. (E)(1) Within thirty days after the chief executive officer is appointed, the chief executive officer shall convene a group of community stakeholders. The purpose of the group shall be to develop expectations for academic improvement in the district and to assist the district in building relationships with organizations in the community that can provide needed services to students. Members of the group shall include, but shall not be limited to, educators, civic and business leaders, and representatives of institutions of higher education and government service agencies. Within ninety days after the chief executive officer is appointed, the chief executive officer also shall convene a smaller group of community stakeholders for each school operated by the district to develop expectations for academic improvement in that school. The group convened for each school shall have teachers employed in the school and parents of students enrolled in the school among its members. (2) The chief executive officer shall create a plan to improve the district's academic performance. In creating the plan, the chief executive officer shall consult with the groups convened under division (E)(1) of this section. The chief executive officer also shall consider the availability of funding to ensure sustainability of the plan. The plan shall establish clear, measurable performance goals for the district and for each school operated by the district. The performance goals shall include, but not be limited to, the performance measures prescribed for report cards issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. Within ninety days after the chief executive officer is appointed, the chief executive officer shall submit the plan to the academic distress commission for approval. Within thirty days after the submission of the plan, the commission shall approve the plan or suggest modifications to the plan that will render it acceptable. If the commission suggests modifications, the chief executive officer may revise the plan before resubmitting it to the commission. The chief executive officer shall resubmit the plan, whether revised or not, within fifteen days after the commission suggests modifications. The commission shall approve the plan within thirty days after the plan is resubmitted. Upon approval of the plan by the commission, the chief executive officer shall implement the plan. (F) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, if the district board has entered into, modified, renewed, or extended a collective bargaining agreement on or after October 15, 2015, that contains provisions relinquishing one or more of the rights or responsibilities listed in division (C) of section 4117.08 of the Revised Code, those provisions are not enforceable and the chief executive officer and the district board shall resume holding those rights or responsibilities as if the district board had not relinquished them in that agreement until such time as both the academic distress commission ceases to exist and the district board agrees to relinquish those rights or responsibilities in a new collective bargaining agreement. For purposes of this section, "collective bargaining agreement" shall include any labor contract or agreement in effect with any applicable bargaining representative. The chief executive officer and the district board are not required to bargain on subjects reserved to the management and direction of the school district, including, but not limited to, the rights or responsibilities listed in division (C) of section 4117.08 of the Revised Code. The way in which these subjects and these rights or responsibilities may affect the wages, hours, terms and conditions of employment, or the continuation, modification, or deletion of an existing provision of a collective bargaining agreement is not subject to collective bargaining or effects bargaining under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. The provisions of this paragraph apply to a collective bargaining agreement entered into, modified, renewed, or extended on or after October 15, 2015, and those provisions are deemed to be part of that agreement regardless of whether the district satisfied the conditions prescribed in division (A) of this section at the time the district entered into that agreement. If the district board relinquished one or more of the rights or responsibilities listed in division (C) of section 4117.08 of the Revised Code in a collective bargaining agreement entered into prior to October 15, 2015, and had resumed holding those rights or responsibilities pursuant to division (K) of former section 3302.10 of the Revised Code, as it existed prior to that date, the district board shall continue to hold those rights or responsibilities until such time as both the new academic distress commission appointed under this section ceases to exist upon completion of the transition period specified in division (N)(1) of this section and the district board agrees to relinquish those rights or responsibilities in a new collective bargaining agreement. (G) In each school year that the district is subject to this section, the following shall apply: (1) The chief executive officer shall implement the improvement plan approved under division (E)(2) of this section and shall review the plan annually to determine if changes are needed. The chief executive officer may modify the plan upon the approval of the modifications by the academic distress commission. (2) The chief executive officer may implement innovative education programs to do any of the following: (a) Address the physical and mental well-being of students and their families; (b) Provide mentoring; (c) Provide job resources; (d) Disseminate higher education information; (e) Offer recreational or cultural activities; (f) Provide any other services that will contribute to a successful learning environment. The chief executive officer shall establish a separate fund to support innovative education programs and shall deposit any moneys appropriated by the general assembly for the purposes of division (G)(2) of this section in the fund. The chief executive officer shall have sole authority to disburse moneys from the fund until the district is no longer subject to this section. All disbursements shall support the improvement plan approved under division (E)(2) of this section. (3) If the district is not a school district in which the pilot project scholarship program is operating under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, each student who is entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code and is enrolled in a school operated by the district or in a community school, or will be both enrolling in any of grades kindergarten through twelve in this state for the first time and at least five years of age by the first day of January of the following school year, shall be eligible to participate in the educational choice scholarship pilot program established under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code and an application for the student may be submitted during the next application period. (4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Revised Code, the chief executive officer may limit, suspend, or alter any contract with an administrator that is entered into, modified, renewed, or extended by the district board on or after October 15, 2015, provided that the chief executive officer shall not reduce any salary or base hourly rate of pay unless such salary or base hourly rate reductions are part of a uniform plan affecting all district employees and shall not reduce any insurance benefits unless such insurance benefit reductions are also applicable generally to other employees of the district. (5) The chief executive officer shall represent the district board during any negotiations to modify, renew, or extend a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the board under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. (H) If the report card for the district has been issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the first school year that the district is subject to this section and the district does not meet the qualification in division (N)(1) of this section, the following shall apply: (1) The chief executive officer may reconstitute any school operated by the district. The chief executive officer shall present to the academic distress commission a plan that lists each school designated for reconstitution and explains how the chief executive officer plans to reconstitute the school. The chief executive officer may take any of the following actions to reconstitute a school: (a) Change the mission of the school or the focus of its curriculum; (b) Replace the school's principal and/or administrative staff; (c) Replace a majority of the school's staff, including teaching and nonteaching employees; (d) Contract with a nonprofit or for-profit entity to manage the operations of the school. The contract may provide for the entity to supply all or some of the staff for the school. (e) Reopen the school as a community school under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (f) Permanently close the school. If the chief executive officer plans to reconstitute a school under division (H)(1)(e) or (f) of this section, the commission shall review the plan for that school and either approve or reject it by the thirtieth day of June of the school year. Upon approval of the plan by the commission, the chief executive officer shall reconstitute the school as outlined in the plan. (2) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, the chief executive officer, in consultation with the chairperson of the academic distress commission, may reopen any collective bargaining agreement entered into, modified, renewed, or extended on or after October 15, 2015, for the purpose of renegotiating its terms. The chief executive officer shall have the sole discretion to designate any provisions of a collective bargaining agreement as subject to reopening by providing written notice to the bargaining representative. Any provisions designated for reopening by the chief executive officer shall be subject to collective bargaining as set forth in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. Any changes to the provisions subject to reopening shall take effect on the following first day of July or another date agreed to by the parties. The chief executive officer may reopen a collective bargaining agreement under division (H)(2) of this section as necessary to reconstitute a school under division (H)(1) of this section. (I) If the report card for the district has been issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the second school year that the district is subject to this section and the district does not meet the qualification in division (N)(1) of this section, the following shall apply: (1) The chief executive officer may exercise any of the powers authorized under division (H) of this section. (2) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, the chief executive officer may limit, suspend, or alter any provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into, modified, renewed, or extended on or after October 15, 2015, provided that the chief executive officer shall not reduce any base hourly rate of pay and shall not reduce any insurance benefits. The decision to limit, suspend, or alter any provision of a collective bargaining agreement under this division is not subject to bargaining under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code; however, the chief executive officer shall have the discretion to engage in effects bargaining on the way any such decision may affect wages, hours, or terms and conditions of employment. The chief executive officer may limit, suspend, or alter a provision of a collective bargaining agreement under division (I)(2) of this section as necessary to reconstitute a school under division (H)(1) of this section. (J) If the report card for the district has been issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the third school year that the district is subject to this section and the district does not meet the qualification in division (N)(1) of this section, the following shall apply: (1) The chief executive officer may exercise any of the powers authorized under division (H) or (I) of this section. (2) The chief executive officer may continue in effect a limitation, suspension, or alteration of a provision of a collective bargaining agreement issued under division (I)(2) of this section. Any such continuation shall be subject to the requirements and restrictions of that division. (K) If the report card for the district has been issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the fourth school year that the district is subject to this section and the district does not meet the qualification in division (N)(1) of this section, the following shall apply: (1) The chief executive officer may exercise any of the powers authorized under division (H), (I), or (J) of this section. (2) A new board of education shall be appointed for the district in accordance with section 3302.11 of the Revised Code. However, the chief executive officer shall retain complete operational, managerial, and instructional control of the district until the chief executive officer relinquishes that control to the district board under division (N)(1) of this section. (L) If the report card for the district has been issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the fifth school year, or any subsequent school year, that the district is subject to this section and the district does not meet the qualification in division (N)(1) of this section, the chief executive officer may exercise any of the powers authorized under division (H), (I), (J), or (K)(1) of this section. (M) If division (I), (J), (K), or (L) of this section applies to a district, community schools, STEM schools, chartered nonpublic schools, and other school districts that enroll students residing in the district and meet academic accountability standards shall be eligible to be paid an academic performance bonus in each fiscal year for which the general assembly appropriates funds for that purpose. The academic performance bonus is intended to give students residing in the district access to a high-quality education by encouraging high-quality schools to enroll those students. (N)(1) When a district subject to this section receives either an overall grade of "C" or higher under division (C)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or an overall performance rating of three stars or higher under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, the district shall begin its transition out of being subject to this section. Except as provided in division (N)(2) of this section, the transition period shall last until the district has received either an overall grade higher than "F" under division (C)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or an overall performance rating of two stars or higher under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for two consecutive school years after the transition period begins. The overall grade of "C" or higher or overall performance rating of three stars or higher that qualify the district to begin the transition period shall not count as one of the two consecutive school years. During the transition period, the conditions described in divisions (F) to (L) of this section for the school year prior to the school year in which the transition period begins shall continue to apply and the chief executive officer shall work closely with the district board and district superintendent to increase their ability to resume control of the district and sustain the district's academic improvement over time. Upon completion of the transition period, the chief executive officer shall relinquish all operational, managerial, and instructional control of the district to the district board and district superintendent and the academic distress commission shall cease to exist. (2) If the district receives either an overall grade of "F" under division (C)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code at any time during the transition period, the transition period shall end and the district shall be fully subject to this section again. The district shall resume being fully subject to this section at the point it began its transition out of being subject to this section and the division in divisions (H) to (L) of this section that would have applied to the district had the district not qualified to begin its transition under division (N)(1) of this section shall apply to the district. (O) If at any time there are no longer any schools operated by the district due to reconstitution or other closure of the district's schools under this section, the academic distress commission shall cease to exist and the chief executive officer shall cease to exercise any powers with respect to the district. (P) Beginning on October 15, 2015, each collective bargaining agreement entered into by a school district board of education under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code shall incorporate the provisions of this section. (Q) The chief executive officer, the members of the academic distress commission, the director of education and workforce, and any person authorized to act on behalf of or assist them shall not be personally liable or subject to any suit, judgment, or claim for damages resulting from the exercise of or failure to exercise the powers, duties, and functions granted to them in regard to their functioning under this section, but the chief executive officer, commission, director, and such other persons shall be subject to mandamus proceedings to compel performance of their duties under this section. (R) The department of education and workforce shall not exempt any district from this section by approving an application for an innovative education pilot program submitted by the district under section 3302.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3302.12. (A)(1) Except as provided in divisions (C) and (D) of this section, this section applies to a school building that is ranked according to performance index score under section 3302.21 of the Revised Code in the lowest five per cent of public school buildings statewide for three consecutive years and that meets any combination of the following for three consecutive years: (a) The school building has received a grade of "F" for the value-added progress dimension under division (A)(1)(e), (B)(1)(e), or (C)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (b) The school building has received an overall grade of "F" under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (c) The school building has received a performance rating of one star for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (d) (b) The school building has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (2) In the case of a building to which this section applies, the district board of education in control of that building shall do one of the following at the conclusion of the school year in which the building first becomes subject to this section: (a) Close the school and direct the district superintendent to reassign the students enrolled in the school to other school buildings that demonstrate higher academic achievement; (b) Contract with another school district or a nonprofit or for-profit entity with a demonstrated record of effectiveness to operate the school; (c) Replace the principal and all teaching staff of the school and, upon request from the new principal, exempt the school from all requested policies and regulations of the board regarding curriculum and instruction. The board also shall distribute funding to the school in an amount that is at least equal to the product of the per pupil amount of state and local revenues received by the district multiplied by the student population of the school. (d) Reopen the school as a conversion community school under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. (B) If an action taken by the board under division (A)(2) of this section causes the district to no longer maintain all grades kindergarten through twelve, as required by section 3311.29 of the Revised Code, the board shall enter into a contract with another school district pursuant to section 3327.04 of the Revised Code for enrollment of students in the schools of that other district to the extent necessary to comply with the requirement of section 3311.29 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, if the board enters into and maintains a contract under section 3327.04 of the Revised Code, the district shall not be considered to have failed to comply with the requirement of section 3311.29 of the Revised Code. If, however, the district board fails to or is unable to enter into or maintain such a contract, the state board of education shall take all necessary actions to dissolve the district as provided in division (A) of section 3311.29 of the Revised Code. (C) If a particular school is required to restructure under this section and a petition with respect to that same school has been filed and verified under divisions (B) and (C) of section 3302.042 of the Revised Code, the provisions of that section and the petition filed and verified under it shall prevail over the provisions of this section and the school shall be restructured under that section. However, if division (D)(1), (2), or (3) of section 3302.042 of the Revised Code also applies to the school, the school shall be subject to restructuring under this section and not section 3302.042 of the Revised Code. If the provisions of this section conflict in any way with the requirements of federal law, federal law shall prevail over the provisions of this section. (D)(C) If a school is restructured under this section, section 3302.042 or section 3302.10 of the Revised Code, or federal law, the school shall not be required to restructure again under state law for three consecutive years after the implementation of that prior restructuring. Sec. 3302.13. (A) This section applies to any school district or community school that meets both of the following criteria, as reported on the past two consecutive report cards issued for that district or school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code: (1) The district or school received either of the following: (a) A grade of "D" or "F" on the kindergarten through third-grade literacy progress measure under division (C)(3)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (b) A a performance rating of less than three stars for early literacy under division (D)(3)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (2) Fifty-one per cent or less of the district's students who took the third grade English language arts assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for that school year attained at least a proficient score on that assessment. (B) By the thirty-first day of December of each year, any school district or community school that meets the criteria set forth in division (A) of this section shall submit to the department of education and workforce a school or district reading achievement improvement plan, which shall include all requirements prescribed by the department pursuant to division (C) of this section. (C) The department shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing the content of and deadlines for the reading achievement improvement plans required under division (B) of this section. The rules shall prescribe that each plan include, at a minimum, an analysis of relevant student performance data, measurable student performance goals, strategies to meet specific student needs, a staffing and professional development plan, and instructional strategies for improving literacy. (D) Any school district or community school to which this section applies shall no longer be required to submit an improvement plan pursuant to division (B) of this section when that district or school meets either of the following criteria, as reported on the most recent report card issued for that district or school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code: (1) The district or school received either of the following: (a) A grade of "C" or higher on the kindergarten through third-grade literacy progress measure under division (C)(3)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (b) A a performance rating of three stars or higher for early literacy under division (D)(3)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (2) Not less than fifty-one per cent of the district's students who took the third grade English language arts assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for that school year attained at least a proficient score on that assessment. (E) The department shall post in a prominent location on its web site all plans submitted pursuant to this section. Sec. 3302.151. (A) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Revised Code, a school district that qualifies under division (D) of this section shall be exempt from all of the following: (1) The mentoring component of the Ohio teacher residency program established under division (A)(1) of section 3319.223 of the Revised Code, so long as the district utilizes a local approach to train and support new teachers; (2) Any provision of the Revised Code or rule or standard of the department of education and workforce prescribing a minimum or maximum class size; (3) Any provision of the Revised Code or rule or standard of the department requiring teachers to be licensed specifically in the grade level in which they are teaching, except unless otherwise prescribed by federal law. This exemption does not apply to special education teachers. Nor does this exemption relieve a teacher from holding a valid Ohio license in the subject area in which that teacher is teaching and at least some grade level determined appropriate by the district board. (B)(1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Revised Code, including sections 3319.30 and 3319.36 of the Revised Code, the superintendent of a school district that qualifies under division (D) of this section may employ an individual who is not licensed as required by sections 3319.22 to 3319.30 of the Revised Code, but who is otherwise qualified based on experience, to teach classes in the district, so long as the board of education of the school district approves the individual's employment and provides mentoring and professional development opportunities to that individual, as determined necessary by the board. (2) As a condition of employment under this section, an individual shall be subject to a criminal records check as prescribed by section 3319.391 of the Revised Code. In the manner prescribed by the state board of education, the individual shall submit the criminal records check to the state board and shall register with the state board during the period in which the individual is employed by the district. The state board shall use the information submitted to enroll the individual in the retained applicant fingerprint database, established under section 109.5721 of the Revised Code, in the same manner as any teacher licensed under sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code. (3) An individual employed pursuant to this division is subject to Chapter 3307. of the Revised Code. If the state board receives notification of the arrest or conviction of an individual employed under division (B) of this section, the state board shall promptly notify the employing district and may take any action authorized under sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code that it considers appropriate. No district shall employ any individual under division (B) of this section if the district learns that the individual has plead guilty to, has been found guilty by a jury or court of, or has been convicted of any of the offenses listed in division (C) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Revised Code, noncompliance with any of the requirements listed in divisions (A) or (B) of this section shall not disqualify a school district that qualifies under division (D) of this section from receiving funds under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. (D) In order for a city, local, or exempted village school district to qualify for the exemptions described in this section, the school district shall meet both of the following benchmarks on the most recent report card issued for that district under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code: (1) The district received either of the following: (a) At least eighty-five per cent of the total possible points for the performance index score calculated under division (C)(1)(b) or (D)(1)(c)(A)(3) of that section; (b) A performance rating of five stars for progress under division (D)(3)(c)(C)(3) of that section. (2) The district has a four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate measure of at least ninety-three per cent and a five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate measure of at least ninety-five per cent, as calculated under division (C)(1)(d) or divisions (D)(1)(e)(A)(5) and (D)(1)(f)(6) of that section. (E)(1) A school district that meets the requirements prescribed by division (D) of this section shall be qualified for the exemptions prescribed by this section for three school years, beginning with the school year in which the qualifying report card is issued. (2) The exemption prescribed under this division may be renewed every three school years if the school district continues to meet the requirements prescribed in division (D) of this section. (3) The department of education and workforce, by the thirtieth day of September in each school year, shall notify each district that becomes eligible for the exemptions under this section that the district is eligible and that such exemptions exist. (F) As used in this section, "license" has the same meaning as in section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3302.17. (A) Any school building operated by a city, exempted village, or local school district, or a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code is eligible to initiate the community learning center process as prescribed by this section. (B) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year, each district board of education or community school governing authority may initiate a community learning center process for any school building to which this section applies. First, the board or governing authority shall conduct a public information hearing at each school building to which this section applies to inform the community of the community learning center process. The board or governing authority may do all of the following with regard to the public information hearing: (1) Announce the meeting not less than forty-five days in advance at the school and on the school's or district's web sites and using tools to ensure effective communication with individuals with disabilities; (2) Schedule the meeting for an evening or weekend time; (3) Provide interpretation services and written materials in all languages spoken by five per cent or more of the students enrolled in the school; (4) Provide child care services for parents attending the meeting; (5) Provide parents, students, teachers, nonteaching employees, and community members with the opportunity to speak at the meeting; (6) Comply with section 149.43 of the Revised Code. In preparing for the public information hearing, the board or governing authority shall ensure that information about the hearing is broadly distributed throughout the community. The board or governing authority may enter into an agreement with any civic engagement organizations, community organizations, or employee organizations to support the implementation of the community learning center process. The board or governing authority shall conduct a follow-up hearing at least once annually until action is further taken under the section with respect to the school building or until the conditions described in division (A) of this section no longer apply to the school building. (C) Not sooner than forty-five days after the first public information hearing, the board or governing authority shall conduct an election, by paper ballot, to initiate the process to become a community learning center. Only parents or guardians of students enrolled in the school and students enrolled in a different school operated by a joint vocational school district but are otherwise entitled to attend the school, and teachers and nonteaching employees who are assigned to the school may vote in the election. The board or governing authority shall distribute the ballots by mail and shall make copies available at the school and on the web site of the school. The board or governing authority also may distribute the ballots by directly giving ballots to teachers and nonteaching employees and sending home ballots with every student enrolled in the school building. (D) The board or governing authority shall initiate the transition of the building to a community learning center if the results of the election held under division (C) of this section are as follows: (1) At least fifty per cent of parents and guardians of students enrolled in the eligible school building and students enrolled in a different building operated by a joint vocational school district but who are entitled to attend the school cast ballots by a date set by the board or governing authority, and of those ballots at least sixty-seven per cent are in favor of initiating the process; and (2) At least fifty per cent of teachers and nonteaching employees who are assigned to the school cast ballots by a date set by the board or governing authority, and of those ballots at least sixty-seven per cent are in favor of initiating the process. (E) If a community learning center process is initiated under this section, the board or governing authority shall create a school action team under section 3302.18 of the Revised Code. Within four months upon selection, the school action team shall conduct and complete, in consultation with community partners, a performance audit of the school and review, with parental input, the needs of the school with regard to restructuring under section 3302.10, or 3302.12, or 3302.042 of the Revised Code, or federal law. The school action team shall provide quarterly updates of its work in a public hearing that complies with the same specifications prescribed in division (B) of this section. (F) Upon completion of the audit and review, the school action team shall present its findings at a public hearing that complies with the same specifications prescribed in division (B) of this section. After the school action team presents its findings at the public hearing, it shall create a community learning center improvement plan that designates appropriate interventions, which may be based on the recommendations developed by the department under division (H)(1)(b) of this section. If there is a federally mandated school improvement planning process, the team shall coordinate its work with that plan. The school action team shall approve the plan by a majority vote. (G) Upon approval of the plan by the school action team, the team shall submit the community learning center improvement plan to the same individuals described in division (C) of this section. Ballots shall be distributed and an election shall be conducted in the same manner as indicated under that division. The school action team shall submit the plan to the district board of education or community school governing authority, if the results of the election under division (G) of this section are as follows: (1) At least thirty per cent of parents and guardians of students enrolled in the eligible school building and students enrolled in a different building operated by a joint vocational school district but who are entitled to attend the school cast ballots by a date set by the board or governing authority, and of those ballots at least fifty per cent are in favor of initiating the process; and (2) At least thirty per cent of teachers and nonteaching employees who are assigned to the school cast ballots by a date set by the board or governing authority, and of those ballots at least fifty per cent are in favor of initiating the process. The board or governing authority shall evaluate the plan and determine whether to adopt it. The board or governing authority shall adopt the plan in full or adopt portions of the plan. If the board or governing authority does not adopt the plan in full, it shall provide a written explanation of why portions of the plan were rejected. (H)(1) The department shall do all of the following with respect to this section: (a) Adopt rules regarding the elections required under this section; (b) Develop appropriate interventions for a community learning center improvement plan that may be used by a school action team under division (F) of this section; (c) Publish a menu of programs and services that may be offered by community learning centers. The information shall be posted on the department's web site. To compile this information the department shall solicit input from resource coordinators of existing community learning centers. (d) Provide information regarding implementation of comprehensive community-based programs and supportive services including the community learning center model to school buildings meeting any of the following conditions: (i) The building is in improvement status as defined by the "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001" or under an agreement between the Ohio department of education and workforce and the United States secretary of education. (ii) The building is a secondary school that is among the lowest achieving fifteen per cent of secondary schools statewide, as determined by the department. (iii) The building is a secondary school with a graduation rate of sixty per cent or lower for three or more consecutive years. (iv) The building is a school that the department determines is persistently low-performing. (2) The department may do the following with respect to this section: (a) Provide assistance, facilitation, and training to school action teams in the conducting of the audit required under this section; (b) Provide opportunities for members of school action teams from different schools to share school improvement strategies with parents, teachers, and other relevant stakeholders in higher performing schools; (c) Provide financial support in a school action team's planning process and create a grant program to assist in the implementation of a qualified community learning center plan. (I) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, the requirements of this section prevail over any conflicting provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into on or after October 15, 2015. However, the board or governing authority and the teachers' labor organization may negotiate additional factors to be considered in the adoption of a community learning center plan. Sec. 3302.21. (A) The department of education and workforce shall develop a system to rank order all city, exempted village, and local school districts, community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code except those community schools to which section 3314.017 of the Revised Code applies, and STEM schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code according to the following measures: (1) Performance index score for each school district, community school, and STEM school and for each separate building of a district, community school, or STEM school. For districts, schools, or buildings to which the performance index score does not apply, the department may develop another measure of student academic performance based on similar data and performance measures if appropriate and use that measure to include those buildings in the ranking so that districts, schools, and buildings may be reliably compared to each other. (2) Student performance growth from year to year, using the value-added progress dimension, if applicable, and other measures of student performance growth designated by the department for subjects and grades not covered by the value-added progress dimension or the alternative student academic progress measure if adopted under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (3) Current operating expenditure per equivalent pupils as defined in section 3302.26 of the Revised Code; (4)(3) Of total current operating expenditures, percentage spent for classroom instruction as determined under standards adopted by the state board department under section 3302.20 of the Revised Code; (5)(4) Performance of, and opportunities provided to, students identified as gifted using value-added progress dimensions, if applicable, and other relevant measures as designated by the department. The department shall rank each district, each community school except a community school to which section 3314.017 of the Revised Code applies, and each STEM school annually in accordance with the system developed under this section. (B) In addition to the reports required by sections 3302.03 and 3302.031 of the Revised Code, not later than the first day of September each year, the department shall issue a report for each city, exempted village, and local school district, each community school except a community school to which section 3314.017 of the Revised Code applies, and each STEM school indicating the district's or school's rank on each measure described in divisions (A)(1) to (4)(3) of this section, including each separate building's rank among all public school buildings according to performance index score under division (A)(1) of this section. Sec. 3302.41. As used in this section, "blended learning" has the same meaning as in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. (A) Any local, city, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or chartered nonpublic school may operate all or part of a school using a blended learning model. If a school is operated using a blended learning model or is to cease operating using a blended learning model, the superintendent of the school or district or director of the school shall notify the department of education and workforce of that fact not later than the first day of July of the school year for which the change is effective. If any school district school, community school, or STEM school is already operated using a blended learning model on September 24, 2012, the superintendent of the school or district may notify the department within ninety days after September 24, 2012, of that fact and request that the school be classified as a blended learning school. (B) The department shall revise any operating standards for school districts and chartered nonpublic schools adopted under section 3301.07 of the Revised Code to include standards for the operation of blended learning under this section. The blended learning operation standards shall provide for all of the following: (1) Student-to-teacher ratios whereby no school or classroom is required to have more than one teacher for every one hundred twenty-five students in blended learning classrooms; (2) The extent to which the school is or is not obligated to provide students with access to digital learning tools; (3) The ability of all students, at any grade level, to earn credits or advance grade levels upon demonstrating mastery of knowledge or skills through competency-based learning models. Credits or grade level advancement shall not be based on a minimum number of days or hours in a classroom. (4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3313.48 of the Revised Code, a requirement that the school have an annual instructional calendar of not less than nine hundred ten hours; (5) Adequate provisions for: the licensing of teachers, administrators, and other professional personnel and their assignment according to training and qualifications; efficient and effective instructional materials and equipment, including library facilities; the proper organization, administration, and supervision of each school, including regulations for preparing all necessary records and reports and the preparation of a statement of policies and objectives for each school; buildings, grounds, and health and sanitary facilities and services; admission of pupils, and such requirements for their promotion from grade to grade as will ensure that they are capable and prepared for the level of study to which they are certified; requirements for graduation; and such other factors as the board finds necessary. (C) An internet- or computer-based community school, as defined in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code, is not a blended learning school authorized under this section. Nor does this section affect any provisions for the operation of and payments to an internet- or computer-based community school prescribed in Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3307.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Employer" means the board of education, school district, governing authority of any community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college, university, institution, or other agency within the state by which a teacher is employed and paid. (B)(1) "Teacher" means all of the following: (a) Any person paid from public funds and employed in the public schools of the state under any type of contract described in section 3311.77 or 3319.08 of the Revised Code in a position for which the person is required to have a license or registration issued pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code; (b) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(b) or (c) of this section, any person employed as a teacher or faculty member in a community school or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school pursuant to Chapter 3314. or 3326. of the Revised Code; (c) Any person having a license or registration issued pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code and employed in a public school in this state in an educational position, as determined by the department of education and workforce, under programs provided for by federal acts or regulations and financed in whole or in part from federal funds, but for which no licensure requirements for the position can be made under the provisions of such federal acts or regulations; (d) Any other teacher or faculty member employed in any school, college, university, institution, or other agency wholly controlled and managed, and supported in whole or in part, by the state or any political subdivision thereof, including Central state university, Cleveland state university, and the university of Toledo; (e) The educational employees of the state board of education, as determined by the state superintendent of public instruction, and the educational employees of the department of education and workforce, as determined by the director of education and workforce; (f) Any person having a registration issued pursuant to section 3301.28 of the Revised Code and employed as a tutor by the coordinating service center as defined in that section; (g) Any person having a license issued pursuant to Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code and employed as a school psychologist in a public school; (h)(g) Any person having a pre-service teacher permit issued pursuant to section 3319.0812 of the Revised Code and employed as a substitute teacher by a school district or school. In all cases of doubt, the state teachers retirement board shall determine whether any person is a teacher, and its decision shall be final. (2) "Teacher" does not include any of the following: (a) Any eligible employee of a public institution of higher education, as defined in section 3305.01 of the Revised Code, who elects to participate in an alternative retirement plan established under Chapter 3305. of the Revised Code; (b) Any person employed by a community school operator, as defined in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code, if on or before February 1, 2016, the school's operator was withholding and paying employee and employer taxes pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 3101(a) and 3111(a) for persons employed in the school as teachers, unless the person had contributing service in a community school in the state within one year prior to the later of February 1, 2016, or the date on which the operator for the first time withholds and pays employee and employer taxes pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 3101(a) and 3111(a) for that person; (c) Any person who would otherwise be a teacher under division (B)(2)(b) of this section who terminates employment with a community school operator and has no contributing service in a community school in the state for a period of at least one year from the date of termination of employment. (C) "Member" means any person included in the membership of the state teachers retirement system, which shall consist of all teachers and contributors as defined in divisions (B) and (D) of this section and all disability benefit recipients, as defined in section 3307.50 of the Revised Code. However, for purposes of this chapter, the following persons shall not be considered members: (1) A student, intern, or resident who is not a member while employed part-time by a school, college, or university at which the student, intern, or resident is regularly attending classes; (2) A person denied membership pursuant to section 3307.24 of the Revised Code; (3) An other system retirant, as defined in section 3307.35 of the Revised Code, or a superannuate; (4) An individual employed in a program established pursuant to the "Job Training Partnership Act," 96 Stat. 1322 (1982), 29 U.S.C.A. 1501; (5) The surviving spouse of a member or retirant if the surviving spouse's only connection to the retirement system is an account in an STRS defined contribution plan. (D) "Contributor" means any person who has an account in the teachers' savings fund or defined contribution fund, except that "contributor" does not mean a member or retirant's surviving spouse with an account in an STRS defined contribution plan. (E) "Beneficiary" means any person eligible to receive, or in receipt of, a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter. (F) "Year" means the year beginning the first day of July and ending with the thirtieth day of June next following, except that for the purpose of determining final average salary under the plan described in sections 3307.50 to 3307.79 of the Revised Code, "year" may mean the contract year. (G) "Local district pension system" means any school teachers pension fund created in any school district of the state in accordance with the laws of the state prior to September 1, 1920. (H) "Employer contribution" means the amount paid by an employer, as determined by the employer rate, including the normal and deficiency rates, contributions, and funds wherever used in this chapter. (I) "Five years of service credit" means employment covered under this chapter and employment covered under a former retirement plan operated, recognized, or endorsed by a college, institute, university, or political subdivision of this state prior to coverage under this chapter. (J) "Actuary" means an actuarial professional contracted with or employed by the state teachers retirement board, who shall be either of the following: (1) A member of the American academy of actuaries; (2) A firm, partnership, or corporation of which at least one person is a member of the American academy of actuaries. (K) "Fiduciary" means a person who does any of the following: (1) Exercises any discretionary authority or control with respect to the management of the system, or with respect to the management or disposition of its assets; (2) Renders investment advice for a fee, direct or indirect, with respect to money or property of the system; (3) Has any discretionary authority or responsibility in the administration of the system. (L)(1)(a) Except as provided in this division, "compensation" means all salary, wages, and other earnings paid to a teacher by reason of the teacher's employment, including compensation paid pursuant to a supplemental contract. The salary, wages, and other earnings shall be determined prior to determination of the amount required to be contributed to the teachers' savings fund or defined contribution fund under section 3307.26 of the Revised Code and without regard to whether any of the salary, wages, or other earnings are treated as deferred income for federal income tax purposes. (b) Except as provided in division (L)(1)(c) of this section, "compensation" includes amounts paid by an employer as a retroactive payment of earnings, damages, or back pay pursuant to a court order, court-adopted settlement agreement, or other settlement agreement if the retirement system receives both of the following: (i) Teacher and employer contributions under sections 3307.26 and 3307.28 of the Revised Code, plus interest compounded annually at a rate determined by the state teachers retirement board, for each year or portion of a year for which amounts are paid under the order or agreement; (ii) Teacher and employer contributions under sections 3307.26 and 3307.28 of the Revised Code, plus interest compounded annually at a rate determined by the board, for each year or portion of a year not subject to division (L)(1)(b)(i) of this section for which the board determines the teacher was improperly paid, regardless of the teacher's ability to recover on such amounts improperly paid. (c) If any portion of an amount paid by an employer as a retroactive payment of earnings, damages, or back pay is for an amount, benefit, or payment described in division (L)(2) of this section, that portion of the amount is not compensation under this section. (2) Compensation does not include any of the following: (a) Payments for accrued but unused sick leave or personal leave, including payments made under a plan established pursuant to section 124.39 of the Revised Code or any other plan established by the employer; (b) Payments made for accrued but unused vacation leave, including payments made pursuant to section 124.13 of the Revised Code or a plan established by the employer; (c) Payments made for vacation pay covering concurrent periods for which other salary, compensation, or benefits under this chapter or Chapter 145. or 3309. of the Revised Code are paid; (d) Amounts paid by the employer to provide life insurance, sickness, accident, endowment, health, medical, hospital, dental, or surgical coverage, or other insurance for the teacher or the teacher's family, or amounts paid by the employer to the teacher in lieu of providing the insurance; (e) Incidental benefits, including lodging, food, laundry, parking, or services furnished by the employer, use of the employer's property or equipment, and reimbursement for job-related expenses authorized by the employer, including moving and travel expenses and expenses related to professional development; (f) Payments made by the employer in exchange for a member's waiver of a right to receive any payment, amount, or benefit described in division (L)(2) of this section; (g) Payments by the employer for services not actually rendered; (h) Any amount paid by the employer as a retroactive increase in salary, wages, or other earnings, unless the increase is one of the following: (i) A retroactive increase paid to a member employed by a school district board of education in a position that requires a license designated for teaching and not designated for being an administrator issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code that is paid in accordance with uniform criteria applicable to all members employed by the board in positions requiring the licenses; (ii) A retroactive increase paid to a member employed by a school district board of education in a position that requires a license designated for being an administrator issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code that is paid in accordance with uniform criteria applicable to all members employed by the board in positions requiring the licenses; (iii) A retroactive increase paid to a member employed by a school district board of education as a superintendent that is also paid as described in division (L)(2)(h)(i) of this section; (iv) A retroactive increase paid to a member employed by an employer other than a school district board of education in accordance with uniform criteria applicable to all members employed by the employer. (i) Payments made to or on behalf of a teacher that are in excess of the annual compensation that may be taken into account by the retirement system under division (a)(17) of section 401 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 401(a)(17), as amended. For a teacher who first establishes membership before July 1, 1996, the annual compensation that may be taken into account by the retirement system shall be determined under division (d)(3) of section 13212 of the "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993," Pub. L. No. 103-66, 107 Stat. 472. (j) Payments made under division (B), (C), or (E) of section 5923.05 of the Revised Code, Section 4 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 3 of the 119th general assembly, Section 3 of Amended Substitute Senate Bill No. 164 of the 124th general assembly, or Amended Substitute House Bill No. 405 of the 124th general assembly; (k) Anything of value received by the teacher that is based on or attributable to retirement or an agreement to retire. (3) The retirement board shall determine both of the following: (a) Whether particular forms of earnings are included in any of the categories enumerated in this division; (b) Whether any form of earnings not enumerated in this division is to be included in compensation. Decisions of the board made under this division shall be final. (M) "Superannuate" means both of the following: (1) A former teacher receiving from the system a retirement allowance under section 3307.58 or 3307.59 of the Revised Code; (2) A former teacher receiving a benefit from the system under a plan established under section 3307.81 of the Revised Code, except that "superannuate" does not include a former teacher who is receiving a benefit based on disability under a plan established under section 3307.81 of the Revised Code. For purposes of sections 3307.35 and 3307.353 of the Revised Code, "superannuate" also means a former teacher receiving from the system a combined service retirement benefit paid in accordance with section 3307.57 of the Revised Code, regardless of which retirement system is paying the benefit. (N) "STRS defined benefit plan" means the plan described in sections 3307.50 to 3307.79 of the Revised Code. (O) "STRS defined contribution plan" means the plans established under section 3307.81 of the Revised Code and includes the STRS combined plan under that section. (P) "Faculty" means the teaching staff of a university, college, or school, including any academic administrators. Sec. 3309.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Employer" or "public employer" means boards of education, school districts, joint vocational districts, governing authorities of community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, educational institutions, technical colleges, state, municipal, and community colleges, community college branches, universities, university branches, other educational institutions, or other agencies within the state by which an employee is employed and paid, including any organization using federal funds, provided the federal funds are disbursed by an employer as determined by the above. In all cases of doubt, the school employees retirement board shall determine whether any employer is an employer as defined in this chapter, and its decision shall be final. (B) "Employee" means all of the following: (1) Any person employed by a public employer in a position for which the person is not required to have a registration, certificate, or license issued pursuant to section 3301.28 or sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code or a permit issued under section 3319.0812 of the Revised Code; (2) Any person who performs a service common to the normal daily operation of an educational unit even though the person is employed and paid by one who has contracted with an employer to perform the service, and the contracting board or educational unit shall be the employer for the purposes of administering the provisions of this chapter; (3) Any person, not a faculty member, employed in any school or college or other institution wholly controlled and managed, and wholly or partly supported by the state or any political subdivision thereof, the board of trustees, or other managing body of which shall accept the requirements and obligations of this chapter. In all cases of doubt, the school employees retirement board shall determine whether any person is an employee, as defined in this division, and its decision is final. (C) "Prior service" means all service rendered prior to September 1, 1937: (1) As an employee as defined in division (B) of this section; (2) As an employee in a capacity covered by the public employees retirement system or the state teachers retirement system; (3) As an employee of an institution in another state, service credit for which was procured by a member under the provisions of section 3309.31 of the Revised Code. Prior service, for service as an employee in a capacity covered by the public employees retirement system or the state teachers retirement system, shall be granted a member under qualifications identical to the laws and rules applicable to service credit in those systems. Prior service shall not be granted any member for service rendered in a capacity covered by the public employees retirement system, the state teachers retirement system, and this system in the event the service credit has, in the respective systems, been received, waived by exemption, or forfeited by withdrawal of contributions, except as provided in this chapter. If a member who has been granted prior service should, subsequent to September 16, 1957, and before retirement, establish three years of contributing service in the public employees retirement system, or one year in the state teachers retirement system, then the prior service granted shall become, at retirement, the liability of the other system, if the prior service or employment was in a capacity that is covered by that system. The provisions of this division shall not cancel any prior service granted a member by the school employees retirement board prior to August 1, 1959. (D) "Total service," "total service credit," or "Ohio service credit" means all contributing service of a member of the school employees retirement system, and all prior service, computed as provided in this chapter, and all service established pursuant to sections 3309.31, 3309.311, and 3309.33 of the Revised Code. In addition, "total service" includes any period, not in excess of three years, during which a member was out of service and receiving benefits from the state insurance fund, provided the injury or incapacitation was the direct result of school employment. (E) "Member" means any employee, except an SERS retirant or other system retirant as defined in section 3309.341 of the Revised Code, who has established membership in the school employees retirement system. "Member" includes a disability benefit recipient. (F) "Contributor" means any person who has an account in the employees' savings fund. When used in the sections listed in division (B) of section 3309.82 of the Revised Code, "contributor" includes any person participating in a plan established under section 3309.81 of the Revised Code. (G) "Retirant" means any former member who retired and is receiving a retirement allowance under section 3309.36 or 3309.381 or former section 3309.38 of the Revised Code. (H) "Beneficiary" or "beneficiaries" means the estate or a person or persons who, as the result of the death of a contributor or retirant, qualifies for or is receiving some right or benefit under this chapter. (I) "Interest," as specified in division (E) of section 3309.60 of the Revised Code, means interest at the rates for the respective funds and accounts as the school employees retirement board may determine from time to time. (J) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all amounts credited to a contributor's account in the employees' savings fund together with any regular interest credited thereon at the rates approved by the retirement board prior to retirement. (K) "Final average salary" means the sum of the annual compensation for the three highest years of compensation for which contributions were made by the member, divided by three. If the member has a partial year of contributing service in the year in which the member terminates employment and the partial year is at a rate of compensation that is higher than the rate of compensation for any one of the highest three years of annual earnings, the board shall substitute the compensation earned for the partial year for the compensation earned for a similar fractional portion in the lowest of the three high years of annual compensation before dividing by three. If a member has less than three years of contributing membership, the final average salary shall be the total compensation divided by the total number of years, including any fraction of a year, of contributing service. (L) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from contributions made by a contributor and paid from the annuity and pension reserve fund as provided in this chapter. All annuities shall be paid in twelve equal monthly installments. (M)(1) "Pension" means annual payments for life derived from appropriations made by an employer and paid from the employers' trust fund or the annuity and pension reserve fund. All pensions shall be paid in twelve equal monthly installments. (2) "Disability retirement" means retirement as provided in section 3309.40 of the Revised Code. (N) "Retirement allowance" means the pension plus the annuity. (O)(1) "Benefit" means a payment, other than a retirement allowance or the annuity paid under section 3309.344 of the Revised Code, payable from the accumulated contributions of the member or the employer, or both, under this chapter and includes a disability allowance or disability benefit. (2) "Disability allowance" means an allowance paid on account of disability under section 3309.401 of the Revised Code. (3) "Disability benefit" means a benefit paid as disability retirement under section 3309.40 of the Revised Code, as a disability allowance under section 3309.401 of the Revised Code, or as a disability benefit under section 3309.35 of the Revised Code. (P) "Annuity reserve" means the present value, computed upon the basis of mortality tables adopted by the school employees retirement board, of all payments to be made on account of any annuity, or benefit in lieu of any annuity, granted to a retirant. (Q) "Pension reserve" means the present value, computed upon the basis of mortality tables adopted by the school employees retirement board, of all payments to be made on account of any pension, or benefit in lieu of any pension, granted to a retirant or a beneficiary. (R) "Year" means the year beginning the first day of July and ending with the thirtieth day of June next following. (S) "Local district pension system" means any school employees' pension fund created in any school district of the state prior to September 1, 1937. (T) "Employer contribution" means the amount paid by an employer as determined under section 3309.49 of the Revised Code. (U) "Fiduciary" means a person who does any of the following: (1) Exercises any discretionary authority or control with respect to the management of the system, or with respect to the management or disposition of its assets; (2) Renders investment advice for a fee, direct or indirect, with respect to money or property of the system; (3) Has any discretionary authority or responsibility in the administration of the system. (V)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, "compensation" means all salary, wages, and other earnings paid to a contributor by reason of employment. The salary, wages, and other earnings shall be determined prior to determination of the amount required to be contributed to the employees' savings fund under section 3309.47 of the Revised Code and without regard to whether any of the salary, wages, or other earnings are treated as deferred income for federal income tax purposes. (2) Compensation does not include any of the following: (a) Payments for accrued but unused sick leave or personal leave, including payments made under a plan established pursuant to section 124.39 of the Revised Code or any other plan established by the employer; (b) Payments made for accrued but unused vacation leave, including payments made pursuant to section 124.13 of the Revised Code or a plan established by the employer; (c) Payments made for vacation pay covering concurrent periods for which other salary or compensation is also paid or during which benefits are paid under this chapter; (d) Amounts paid by the employer to provide life insurance, sickness, accident, endowment, health, medical, hospital, dental, or surgical coverage, or other insurance for the contributor or the contributor's family, or amounts paid by the employer to the contributor in lieu of providing the insurance; (e) Incidental benefits, including lodging, food, laundry, parking, or services furnished by the employer, use of the employer's property or equipment, and reimbursement for job-related expenses authorized by the employer, including moving and travel expenses and expenses related to professional development; (f) Payments made to or on behalf of a contributor that are in excess of the annual compensation that may be taken into account by the retirement system under division (a)(17) of section 401 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 401(a)(17), as amended. For a contributor who first establishes membership before July 1, 1996, the annual compensation that may be taken into account by the retirement system shall be determined under division (d)(3) of section 13212 of the "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993," Pub. L. No. 103-66, 107 Stat. 472; (g) Payments made under division (B), (C), or (E) of section 5923.05 of the Revised Code, Section 4 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 3 of the 119th general assembly, Section 3 of Amended Substitute Senate Bill No. 164 of the 124th general assembly, or Amended Substitute House Bill No. 405 of the 124th general assembly; (h) Anything of value received by the contributor that is based on or attributable to retirement or an agreement to retire, except that payments made on or before January 1, 1989, that are based on or attributable to an agreement to retire shall be included in compensation if both of the following apply: (i) The payments are made in accordance with contract provisions that were in effect prior to January 1, 1986. (ii) The employer pays the retirement system an amount specified by the retirement board equal to the additional liability from the payments. (3) The retirement board shall determine by rule whether any form of earnings not enumerated in this division is to be included in compensation, and its decision shall be final. (W) "Disability benefit recipient" means a member who is receiving a disability benefit. (X) "Actuary" means an individual who satisfies all of the following requirements: (1) Is a member of the American academy of actuaries; (2) Is an associate or fellow of the society of actuaries; (3) Has a minimum of five years' experience in providing actuarial services to public retirement plans. Sec. 3309.011. "Employee" as defined in division (B) of section 3309.01 of the Revised Code, does not include any of the following: (A) Any person having a license or registration issued pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code and employed in a public school in this state in an educational position, as determined by the department of education and workforce, under programs provided for by federal acts or regulations and financed in whole or in part from federal funds, but for which no licensure requirements for the position can be made under the provisions of such federal acts or regulations; (B) Any person who participates in an alternative retirement plan established under Chapter 3305. of the Revised Code; (C) Any person who elects to transfer from the school employees retirement system to the public employees retirement system under section 3309.312 of the Revised Code; (D) Any person whose full-time employment by the university of Akron as a state university law enforcement officer pursuant to section 3345.04 of the Revised Code commences on or after September 16, 1998; (E) Any person described in division (B) of section 3309.013 of the Revised Code; (F) Any person described in division (D) of section 145.011 of the Revised Code; (G) Any person described in division (B)(1)(b) or (g)(f) of section 3307.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3310.03. For the 2021-2022 school year and each school year thereafter, subject Subject to division (G) of this section, a student is an "eligible student" for purposes of the educational choice scholarship pilot program if the student's resident district is not a school district in which the pilot project scholarship program is operating under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, the student satisfies one of the conditions in division (A), (B), or (C) of this section, and the student maintains eligibility to receive a scholarship under division (D) of this section. However, any student who received a scholarship for the 2020-2021 school year under this section, as it existed prior to March 2, 2021, shall continue to receive that scholarship until the student completes grade twelve, as long as the student maintains eligibility to receive a scholarship under division (D) of this section. (A)(1) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student is enrolled in a school building operated by the student's resident district and to which both of the following apply: (a) The building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of all buildings operated by city, local, and exempted village school districts according to performance index score, as determined by the department of education and workforce, as follows: (i) For a scholarship sought for the 2021-2022 or 2022-2023 school year, the building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of buildings for each of the 2017-2018 and 2018-2019 school years. (ii) For a scholarship sought for the 2023-2024 school year, the building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of buildings for each of the 2018-2019 and 2021-2022 school years. (iii) For a scholarship sought for the 2024-2025 school year, the building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of buildings for each of the 2021-2022 and 2022-2023 school years. (iv) For a scholarship sought for the 2025-2026 school year or any school year thereafter, the building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of buildings for at least two of the three most recent consecutive rankings issued prior to the first day of July of the school year for which a scholarship is sought. (b) The building is operated by a school district in which, for the three consecutive school years prior to the school year for which a scholarship is sought, an average of twenty per cent or more of the students entitled to attend school in the district, under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code, were qualified to be included in the formula to distribute funds under Title I of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq. When ranking school buildings under division (A)(1) of this section, the department shall not include buildings operated by a school district in which the pilot project scholarship program is operating in accordance with sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (2) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student will be enrolling in any of grades kindergarten through twelve in this state for the first time in the school year for which a scholarship is sought, will be at least five years of age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, by the first day of January of the school year for which a scholarship is sought, and otherwise would be assigned under section 3319.01 of the Revised Code in the school year for which a scholarship is sought, to a school building described in division (A)(1) of this section. (3) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student is enrolled in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code but otherwise would be assigned under section 3319.01 of the Revised Code to a building described in division (A)(1) of this section. (4) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student is enrolled in a school building operated by the student's resident district or in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and otherwise would be assigned under section 3319.01 of the Revised Code to a school building described in division (A)(1) of this section in the school year for which the scholarship is sought. (5) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student was enrolled in a public or nonpublic school or was homeschooled in the prior school year and completed any of grades eight through eleven in that school year and otherwise would be assigned under section 3319.01 of the Revised Code to a school building described in division (A)(1) of this section in the school year for which the scholarship is sought. (B) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student is enrolled in a nonpublic school at the time the school is granted a charter by the director of education and workforce under section 3301.16 of the Revised Code and the student meets the standards of division (B) of section 3310.031 of the Revised Code. (C) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student's resident district is subject to section 3302.10 of the Revised Code and the student either: (1) Is enrolled in a school building operated by the resident district or in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (2) Will be both enrolling in any of grades kindergarten through twelve in this state for the first time and at least five years of age by the first day of January of the school year for which a scholarship is sought. (D) A student who receives a scholarship under the educational choice scholarship pilot program remains an eligible student and may continue to receive scholarships in subsequent school years until the student completes grade twelve, so long as all of the following apply: (1) The student's resident district remains the same, or the student transfers to a new resident district and otherwise would be assigned in the new resident district to a school building described in division (A)(1) or (C) of this section. (2) The student takes each assessment prescribed for the student's grade level under section 3301.0710, 3301.0712, or 3313.619 of the Revised Code while enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school, unless one of the following applies to the student: (a) The student is excused from taking that assessment under federal law, the student's individualized education program, or division (C)(1)(c)(i) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (b) The student is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that meets the conditions specified in division (K)(2) or (L)(4) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (c) The student is enrolled in any of grades three to eight and takes an alternative standardized assessment under division (K)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (d) The student is excused from taking the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (C)(1)(c)(ii) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (3) In each school year that the student is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school, the student is absent from school for not more than twenty days that the school is open for instruction, not including excused absences. (E)(1) The department shall cease awarding first-time scholarships pursuant to divisions (A)(1) to (5) of this section with respect to a school building that, in the most recent ratings of school buildings under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code prior to the first day of July of the school year, ceases to meet the criteria in division (A)(1) of this section. (2) The department shall cease awarding first-time scholarships pursuant to division (C) of this section with respect to a school district subject to section 3302.10 of the Revised Code when the academic distress commission established for the district ceases to exist. (3) However, students who have received scholarships in the prior school year remain eligible students pursuant to division (D) of this section. (F) The department shall adopt rules defining excused absences for purposes of division (D)(3) of this section. (G) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3310.031 of the Revised Code, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through twelve shall not be required to be enrolled or enrolling in a school building operated by the student's resident district or a community school in order to be eligible for a scholarship, as follows: (1) For a scholarship sought for the 2021-2022 school year, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through two; (2) For a scholarship sought for the 2022-2023 school year, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through four; (3) For a scholarship sought for the 2023-2024 school year, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through six; (4) For a scholarship sought for the 2024-2025 school year, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through eight; (5) For a scholarship sought for the 2025-2026 school year, and each school year thereafter, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through twelve. (H) Except as provided for in section 3310.13 of the Revised Code and in division (C)(2) of section 3365.07 of the Revised Code, the department shall not require the parent of a student who applies for or receives a scholarship under this section or section 3310.033, 3310.034, or 3310.035 of the Revised Code to complete any kind of income verification regarding the student's family income. Sec. 3310.14. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, each chartered nonpublic school that is not subject to division (K)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code and enrolls students awarded scholarships under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code annually shall administer the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710, 3301.0712, or 3313.619 of the Revised Code, as applicable, to each scholarship student enrolled in the school in accordance with section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. Each chartered nonpublic school that is subject to this section shall report to the department of education and workforce the results of each assessment administered to each scholarship student under this section. Nothing in this section requires a chartered nonpublic school to administer any achievement assessment, except for an Ohio graduation test prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 or the college and work ready assessment system prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code to any student enrolled in the school who is not a scholarship student. (B) A chartered nonpublic school that meets the conditions specified in division (K)(2) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code shall not be required to administer the elementary assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3310.522. (A) In order to maintain eligibility for a scholarship, a student shall take each assessment prescribed by section 3301.0710, 3301.0712, or 3313.619 of the Revised Code, as applicable, in accordance with section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, unless one of the following applies to the student: (1) The student is excused from taking that assessment under federal law, the student's individualized education program, or division (C)(1)(c)(i) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (2) The student is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that meets the conditions specified in division (K)(2) or (L)(4) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (3) The student is enrolled in any of grades three to eight and takes an alternative standardized assessment under division (K)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code or division (B)(3) of this section. (4) The student is excused from taking the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (C)(1)(c)(ii) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (B) Each registered private provider that is not subject to division (K)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code and enrolls a student who is awarded a scholarship shall administer each assessment prescribed by section 3301.0710, 3301.0712, or 3313.619 of the Revised Code, as applicable, to that student in accordance with section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, unless one of the following applies to the student: (1) The student is excused from taking that assessment under division (A)(1) of this section. (2) The student is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that meets the conditions specified in division (K)(2) or (L)(4) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (3) The student is enrolled in any of grades three to eight and the registered private provider administers an alternative standardized assessment determined by the department of education and workforce under division (K)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code to the student. (4) The student is excused from taking the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (C)(1)(c)(ii) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. The registered private provider shall report to the department the results of each assessment so administered under division (B) of this section. (C) Nothing in this section requires any chartered nonpublic school that is a registered private provider to administer any achievement assessment, except for an Ohio graduation test prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 or the college and work ready assessment system prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code to any student enrolled in the school who is not a scholarship student. Sec. 3311.242. In the case of a proposed transfer of school district territory filed under section 3311.24 of the Revised Code, the state board of education shall approve a proposed transfer that satisfies all of the following conditions: (A) The territory is being transferred to an adjacent school district. (B) The district from which the territory is being transferred has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D)(3)(C) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for two or more consecutive school years. (C) No party opposing the proposed transfer has presented to the state board clear and convincing evidence that any information used to facilitate the transfer under section 3311.24 of the Revised Code is incorrect or inaccurate. Sec. 3311.741. (A) This section applies only to a municipal school district in existence on July 1, 2012. (B) Not later than December 1, 2012, the board of education of each municipal school district to which this section applies shall submit to the director of education and workforce an array of measures to be used in evaluating the performance of the district. The measures shall assess at least overall student achievement, student progress over time, the achievement and progress over time of each of the applicable categories of students described in division (G)(F) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, and college and career readiness. The director shall approve or disapprove the measures by January 15, 2013. If the measures are disapproved, the director shall recommend modifications that will make the measures acceptable. (C) Beginning with the 2012-2013 school year, the board annually shall establish goals for improvement on each of the measures approved under division (B) of this section. The school district's performance data for the 2011-2012 school year shall be used as a baseline for determining improvement. (D) Not later than October 1, 2013, and by the first day of October each year thereafter, the board shall issue a report describing the school district's performance for the previous school year on each of the measures approved under division (B) of this section and whether the district has met each of the improvement goals established for that year under division (C) of this section. The board shall provide the report to the governor, the director of education and workforce, and, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, the general assembly. Sec. 3311.80. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, a municipal school district shall be subject to this section instead of section 3319.111 of the Revised Code. (A) The board of education of each municipal school district and the teachers' labor organization shall develop and adopt standards-based teacher evaluation procedures that shall either conform with the framework for evaluation of teachers developed under section 3319.112 of the Revised Code or a framework developed or adopted by the district. The evaluation procedures shall include at least one formal observation and classroom walk-through, which may be announced or unannounced; examinations of samples of work, such as lesson plans or assessments designed by a teacher; and multiple measures of student academic growth. The board of education and teachers' labor organization shall endeavor to include in the evaluation procedures the development of a professional growth plan or improvement plan and a final summative conference to discuss the results of the evaluation. (B) When using measures of student academic growth as a component of a teacher's evaluation, those measures shall include the value-added progress dimension prescribed by section 3302.021 of the Revised Code or the alternative student academic progress measure if adopted under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. For teachers of grade levels and subjects for which the value-added progress dimension or alternative student academic achievement measure is not applicable, the board shall administer assessments on the list developed under division (B)(2) of section 3319.112 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Each teacher employed by the board shall be evaluated at least once each school year, except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section. The composite evaluation shall be completed not later than the first day of June and the teacher shall receive a written report of the results of the composite evaluation not later than ten days after its completion or the last teacher work day of the school year, whichever is earlier. (2) Each teacher who received a rating of accomplished on the teacher's most recent evaluation conducted under this section may be evaluated once every two school years, except that the teacher shall be evaluated in any school year in which the teacher's contract is due to expire. The biennial composite evaluation shall be completed not later than the first day of June of the applicable school year, and the teacher shall receive a written report of the results of the composite evaluation not later than ten days after its completion or the last teacher work day of the school year, whichever is earlier. (D) Each evaluation conducted pursuant to this section shall be conducted by one or more of the following persons who have been trained to conduct evaluations in accordance with criteria that shall be developed jointly by the chief executive officer of the district, or the chief executive officer's designee, and the teachers' labor organization: (1) The chief executive officer or a subordinate officer of the district with responsibility for instruction or academic affairs; (2) A person who is under contract with the board pursuant to section 3319.02 of the Revised Code and holds a license designated for being a principal issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code; (3) A person who is under contract with the board pursuant to section 3319.02 of the Revised Code and holds a license designated for being a vocational director or a supervisor in any educational area issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code; (4) A person designated to conduct evaluations under an agreement providing for peer assistance and review entered into by the board and the teachers' labor organization. (E) The evaluation procedures shall describe how the evaluation results will be used for decisions regarding compensation, retention, promotion, and reductions in force and for removal of poorly performing teachers. (F) A teacher may challenge any violations of the evaluation procedures in accordance with the grievance procedure specified in any applicable collective bargaining agreement. A challenge under this division is limited to the determination of procedural errors that have resulted in substantive harm to the teacher and to ordering the correction of procedural errors. The failure of the board or a person conducting an evaluation to strictly comply with any deadline or evaluation forms established as part of the evaluation process shall not be cause for an arbitrator to determine that a procedural error occurred, unless the arbitrator finds that the failure resulted in substantive harm to the teacher. The arbitrator shall have no jurisdiction to modify the evaluation results, but the arbitrator may stay any decision taken pursuant to division (E) of this section pending the board's correction of any procedural error. The board shall correct any procedural error within fifteen business days after the arbitrator's determination that a procedural error occurred. (G) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, the requirements of this section prevail over any conflicting provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into on or after October 1, 2012. However, the board and the teachers' labor organization may negotiate additional evaluation procedures, including an evaluation process incorporating peer assistance and review, provided the procedures are consistent with this section. (H) This section does not apply to administrators appointed by the chief executive officer of a municipal school district under section 3311.72 of the Revised Code, administrators subject to evaluation procedures under section 3311.84 or 3319.02 of the Revised Code, or to any teacher employed as a substitute for less than one hundred twenty days during a school year pursuant to section 3319.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.11. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.19 and division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, this section does not apply to any joint vocational or cooperative education school district. A vacancy in any school district board of education or governing board of an educational service center may be caused by death, nonresidence, resignation, removal from office, failure of a person elected or appointed to qualify within ten days after the organization of the board or of appointment or election, removal from the district, or absence from meetings of the board for a period of ninety days, if such absence is caused by reasons declared insufficient by a two-thirds vote of the remaining members of the board, which vote must be taken and entered upon the records of the board not less more than thirty forty-five days after such absence. The board shall not consider a person's reason for absence insufficient if the reason is that the person is an active or reserve member of the armed forces of the United States or the Ohio national guard and is deployed outside the territory of the district or the educational service center, as applicable. As used in this paragraph, "armed forces of the United States" has the same meaning as in section 5907.01 of the Revised Code. If the board members are selected by appointment pursuant to division (B) or (F) of section 3311.71 of the Revised Code, the appointing authority responsible for the appointment shall fill any such vacancy by appointment of an individual to serve the remainder of the unexpired term from a slate of at least three persons proposed by the municipal school district nominating panel established under that section. If the member creating the vacancy resides in a municipal school district but not in the municipal corporation containing the greatest portion of the district's territory, the individuals included on such slate shall also reside in the municipal school district but not in the municipal corporation containing the greatest portion of the district's territory. If the board members are selected by election, the board shall fill any such vacancy at its next any regular or special meeting, not earlier than ten days within forty-five days after such the vacancy occurs. A majority vote of all the remaining members of the board may fill any such vacancy. Immediately after such a vote, the treasurer of the board of education or governing board shall give written notice to the board of elections responsible for conducting elections for that school district or educational service center that a vacancy has been filled, and the name of the person appointed to fill the vacancy. Each If the board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district or the governing board of any educational service center fails to fill a vacancy in that board within a period of forty-five days after the vacancy occurs, the probate court of the county in which the district or service center is located, upon being advised and satisfied of that failure, shall act as that board to fill any vacancy as promptly as possible. Each person selected by the board or probate court to fill a vacancy shall hold office for the shorter of the following periods: until the completion of the unexpired term, or until the first day of January immediately following the next regular board of education or governing board election taking place more than ninety days after a person is selected by the board or probate court to fill the vacancy. At that election, a special election to fill the vacancy shall be held in accordance with laws controlling regular elections for board of education or governing board members, except that no such special election shall be held if the unexpired term ends on or before the first day of January immediately following that regular board of education or governing board election. The term of a person chosen at a special election under this section shall begin on the first day of January immediately following the election, and the person shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. Whenever the need for a special election under this section becomes known, the board of education or governing board shall immediately give written notice of this fact to the board of elections responsible for conducting the regular board of education or governing board election for that school district. The term of a board of education or governing board member shall not be lengthened by the member's resignation and subsequent selection by the board or probate court under this section. Sec. 3313.411. (A) As used in this section: (1) "College-preparatory boarding school" means a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (2) "Community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. (3)(2) "High-performing community school" has the same meaning as in section 3313.413 of the Revised Code. (4)(3) "STEM school" means a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (5)(4) "Unused school facilities" means either: (a) Any real property that has been used by a school district for school operations, including, but not limited to, academic instruction or administration, since July 1, 1998, but has not been used in that capacity for one year; (b) Any school building that has been used for direct academic instruction but less than sixty per cent of the building was used for that purpose in the preceding school year. (B)(1) Except as provided in section 3313.412 of the Revised Code, on and after June 30, 2011, any school district board of education shall offer any unused school facilities it owns in its corporate capacity for lease or sale to the governing authorities of community schools, the boards of trustees of any college-preparatory boarding schools, and the governing bodies of any STEM schools, that are located within the territory of the district. Not later than sixty days after the district board makes the offer, interested governing authorities, boards of trustees, and governing bodies shall notify the district treasurer in writing of the intention to lease or purchase the property. The district board shall give priority to the governing authorities of high-performing community schools that are located within the territory of the district. (2) At the same time that a district board makes the offer required under division (B)(1) of this section, the board also may, but shall not be required to, offer that property for sale or lease to the governing authorities of community schools with plans, stipulated in their contracts entered into under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code, either to relocate their operations to the territory of the district or to add facilities, as authorized by division (B)(3) or (4) of section 3314.05 of the Revised Code, to be located within the territory of the district. (C)(1) If, not later than sixty days after the district board makes the offer, only one governing authority of a high-performing community school offered the property under division (B) of this section notifies the district treasurer in writing of the intention to purchase the property pursuant to that division, the district board shall sell the property to that party for the appraised fair market value of the property as determined in an appraisal of the property that is not more than one year old. If, not later than sixty days after the district board makes the offer, more than one governing authority of a high-performing community school offered the property under division (B) of this section notifies the district treasurer in writing of the intention to purchase the property pursuant to that division, the board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the governing authorities of high-performing community schools that notified the district treasurer of the intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. The district board is not obligated to accept any bid for the property that is lower than the appraised fair market value of the property as determined in an appraisal that is not more than one year old. (2) If, not later than sixty days after the district board makes the offer, no governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall then proceed with the offers from all other start-up community schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and STEM schools made pursuant to that division. If more than one such entity notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the entities that notified the district treasurer pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. (3) If more than one governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer in writing of the intention to lease the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the district board shall conduct a lottery to select from among those governing authorities the one qualified governing authority to which the district board shall lease the property. If no such governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer of its intention to lease the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall then proceed with the offers from all other start-up community schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and STEM schools made pursuant to that division. If more than one other start-up community school, college-preparatory boarding school, or STEM school notified the district treasurer of its intention to lease the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the district board shall conduct a lottery to select from among those parties the one qualified party to which the district board shall lease the property. (4) The lease price offered by a district board to a community school, college-preparatory boarding school, or STEM school under this section shall not be higher than the fair market value for such a leasehold as determined in an appraisal that is not more than one year old. (5) If no qualified party offered the property under division (B) of this section accepts the offer to lease or buy the property within sixty days after the offer is made, the district board may offer the property to any other entity in accordance with divisions (A) to (F) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. (D) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, a school district board may renew any agreement it originally entered into prior to June 30, 2011, to lease real property to an entity other than a community school, college-preparatory boarding school, or STEM school. Nothing in this section shall affect the leasehold arrangements between the district board and that other entity. (E)(1) Except as provided in division (E)(2) of this section, the governing authority of a community school, board of trustees of a college-preparatory boarding school, or governing body of a STEM school shall not sell any property purchased under division (B) of this section within five years of purchasing that property. (2) The governing authority, board of trustees, or governing body may sell a property purchased under division (B) of this section within five years of the purchase, only if the governing authority, board of trustees, or governing body sells or transfers that property to another entity described in that division. Sec. 3313.413. (A) As used in this section, "high-performing community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revise Revised Code that meets any of the following conditions: (1) Except as provided for in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, the community school does both of the following: (a) The school has a higher performance index score than the school district in which the school is located on the two most recent report cards issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (b) The school either has a performance rating of four stars or higher for progress on the most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or is a school described under division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code and did not receive a rating for progress on the most recent report card. (2) If the community school serves only grades kindergarten through three, the school received a performance rating of four stars or higher for early literacy on its most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (3) If the community school has not commenced operations or has been in operation for less than one school year, the school meets the following conditions: (a) The school is replicating an operational and instructional model used by a community school described in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. (b) The school either: (i) Has an operator that received an overall rating of three stars or higher, or a "C" or higher, on its most recent performance report published under section 3314.031 of the Revised Code; (ii) Does not have an operator and is sponsored by a sponsor that was rated "exemplary" or "effective" on its most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (B) When a school district board of education decides to dispose of real property it owns in its corporate capacity under section 3313.41 of the Revised Code, the board shall first offer that property to the governing authorities of all start-up community schools, the boards of trustees of any college-preparatory boarding schools, and the governing bodies of any STEM schools that are located within the territory of the district. Not later than sixty days after the district board makes the offer, interested governing authorities, boards of trustees, and governing bodies shall notify the district treasurer in writing of the intention to purchase the property. The district board shall give priority to the governing authorities of high-performing community schools that are located within the territory of the district. (1) If more than one governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the governing authorities of high-performing community schools that notified the district treasurer pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. (2) If no governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall then proceed with the offers from all other start-up community schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and STEM schools made pursuant to that division. If more than one such entity notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the entities that notified the district treasurer pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. (3) If no governing authority, board of trustees, or governing body notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the district may then offer the property for sale in the manner prescribed under divisions (A) to (F) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in sections 3313.41 and 3313.411 of the Revised Code, the purchase price of any real property sold to any of the entities in accordance with division (B) of this section shall not be more than the appraised fair market value of that property as determined in an appraisal of the property that is not more than one year old. (D) Not later than the first day of October of each year, the department of education and workforce shall post in a prominent location on its web site a list of schools that qualify as high-performing community schools for purposes of this section and section 3313.411 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.483. (A) A board of education, upon the adoption of a resolution stating that it may be financially unable to open on the day or to remain open for instruction on all days set forth in its adopted school calendar and pay all obligated expenses, or the director of education and workforce upon the issuance of written notification under division (B) of section 3313.489 of the Revised Code, shall request the auditor of state to determine whether such situation exists. The auditor shall deliver a copy of each request from a board of education to the director. In the case of a school district not under a fiscal emergency pursuant to Chapter 3316. of the Revised Code the auditor shall not issue a finding under this section until written notification is received from the director pursuant to section 3313.487 of the Revised Code. (B) If the auditor of state finds that the board of education has attempted to avail itself to the fullest extent authorized by law of all lawful revenue sources available to it except those authorized by section 5705.21 of the Revised Code, the auditor shall certify that finding to the department of education and workforce and shall certify the operating deficit the district will have at the end of the fiscal year if it commences or continues operating its instructional program in accordance with its adopted school calendar and pays all obligated expenses. (C) No board of education may delay the opening of its schools or close its schools for financial reasons. Upon the request of the director of education and workforce, the attorney general shall seek injunctive relief and any other relief required to enforce this prohibition in the court of common pleas of Franklin county. The court of common pleas of Franklin county has exclusive original jurisdiction over all such actions. (D) Upon the receipt of any certification of an operating deficit from the auditor of state, a board of education shall make application to a commercial bank, underwriter, or other prospective lender or purchaser of its obligations for a loan in an amount sufficient to enable the district to open or remain open for instruction on all days set forth in its adopted school calendar but not to exceed the amount of the deficit certified. (E)(1) Any board of education that has applied for and been denied a loan from a commercial bank, underwriter, or other prospective lender or purchaser of its obligations pursuant to division (D) of this section shall submit to the director of education and workforce a plan for implementing reductions in the school district's budget; apply for a loan from a commercial bank, underwriter, or other prospective lender or purchaser of its obligations in an amount not to exceed its certified deficit; and provide the director such information as the director requires concerning its application for such a loan. The board of education of a school district declared to be under a fiscal watch pursuant to division (A) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code may, upon approval of the director, utilize the financial plan required by section 3316.04 of the Revised Code, or applicable parts thereof, as the plan required under this division. The board of education of a school district declared to be under a fiscal emergency pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code may utilize the financial recovery plan for the district, or applicable parts thereof, as the plan required under this division. Except for the plan of a school district under a fiscal emergency, the director shall evaluate, make recommendations concerning, and approve or disapprove each plan. When a plan is submitted, the director shall immediately notify the members of the general assembly whose legislative districts include any or all of the territory of the school district submitting the plan. (2) The director shall submit to the controlling board a copy of each plan the director approves, or each plan submitted by a district under a fiscal emergency pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, and the general terms of each proposed loan, and shall make recommendations regarding the plan and whether a proposed loan to the board of education should be approved for payment as provided in division (E)(3) of this section. The controlling board shall approve or disapprove the plan and the proposed loan presented to it by the director. In the case of a district not under a fiscal emergency pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, the controlling board may require a board of education to implement the director's recommendations for expenditure reductions or impose other requirements. Loan repayments shall be in accordance with a schedule approved by the director, except that the principal amount of the loan shall be payable in monthly, semiannual, or annual installments of principal and interest that are substantially equal principal and interest installments. Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(2) of this section, repayment shall be made no later than the fifteenth day of June of the second fiscal year following the approval of the loan. A school district with a certified deficit in excess of either twenty-five million dollars or fifteen per cent of the general fund expenditures of the district during the fiscal year shall repay the loan no later than the fifteenth day of June of the tenth fiscal year following the approval of the loan. In deciding whether to approve or disapprove a proposed loan, the controlling board shall consider the deficit certified by the auditor of state pursuant to this section. A board of education that has an outstanding loan approved pursuant to this section with a repayment date of more than two fiscal years after the date of approval of such loan may not apply for another loan with such a repayment date until the outstanding loan has been repaid. (3) If a board of education has submitted and received controlling board approval of a plan and proposed loan in accordance with this section, the director of education and workforce shall report to the controlling board the actual amounts loaned to the board of education. Such board of education shall request the director to pay any funds the board of education would otherwise receive pursuant to Chapter 3306. of the Revised Code first directly to the holders of the board of education's notes, or an agent thereof, such amounts as are specified under the terms of the loan. Such payments shall be made only from and to the extent of money appropriated by the general assembly for purposes of such sections. No note or other obligation of the board of education under the loan constitutes an obligation nor a debt or a pledge of the faith, credit, or taxing power of the state, and the holder or owner of such note or obligation has no right to have taxes levied by the general assembly for the payment of such note or obligation, and such note or obligation shall contain a statement to that effect. (4) Pursuant to the terms of such a loan, a board of education may issue its notes in anticipation of the collection of its voted levies for current expenses or its receipt of such state funds or both. Such notes shall be issued in accordance with division (E) of section 133.10 of the Revised Code and constitute Chapter 133. securities to the extent such division and the otherwise applicable provisions of Chapter 133. of the Revised Code are not inconsistent with this section, provided that in any event sections 133.24 and 5705.21 and divisions (A), (B), (C), and (E)(2) of section 133.10 of the Revised Code do not apply to such notes. (5) Notwithstanding section 133.36 or 3313.17, any other section of the Revised Code, or any other provision of law, a board of education that has received a loan under this section may not declare bankruptcy, so long as any portion of such loan remains unpaid. (F) Under this section and section 3313.4810, "board of education" or "district board" includes the financial planning and supervision commission of a school district under a fiscal emergency pursuant to Chapter 3316. of the Revised Code where such commission chooses to exercise the powers and duties otherwise required of the district board of education under this section and section 3313.4810 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.603. (A) As used in this section: (1) "One unit" means a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of course instruction, except that for a laboratory course, "one unit" means a minimum of one hundred fifty hours of course instruction. (2) "One-half unit" means a minimum of sixty hours of course instruction, except that for physical education courses, "one-half unit" means a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of course instruction. (B) Beginning September 15, 2001, except as required in division (C) of this section and division (C) of section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, the requirements for graduation from every high school shall include twenty units earned in grades nine through twelve and shall be distributed as follows: (1) English language arts, four units; (2) Health, one-half unit; (3) Mathematics, three units; (4) Physical education, one-half unit; (5) Science, two units until September 15, 2003, and three units thereafter, which at all times shall include both of the following: (a) Biological sciences, one unit; (b) Physical sciences, one unit. (6) History and government, one unit, which shall comply with division (M) of this section and shall include both of the following: (a) American history, one-half unit; (b) American government, one-half unit. (7) Social studies, two units. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2017, the two units of instruction prescribed by division (B)(7) of this section shall include at least one-half unit of instruction in the study of world history and civilizations. (8) Elective units, seven units until September 15, 2003, and six units thereafter. Each student's electives shall include at least one unit, or two half units, chosen from among the areas of business/technology, fine arts, and/or foreign language. (C) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, except as provided in divisions (D) to (F) of this section, the requirements for graduation from every public and chartered nonpublic high school shall include twenty units that are designed to prepare students for the workforce and college. The units shall be distributed as follows: (1) English language arts, four units; (2) Health, one-half unit, which shall include instruction in nutrition and the benefits of nutritious foods and physical activity for overall health; (3) Mathematics, four units, which shall include one unit of algebra II or the equivalent of algebra II, or one unit of advanced computer science as described in the standards adopted pursuant to division (A)(4) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. However, students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2015, and who are pursuing a career-technical instructional track shall not be required to take algebra II or advanced computer science, and instead may complete a career-based pathway mathematics course approved by the department of education and workforce as an alternative. For students who choose to take advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II under division (C)(3) of this section, the school shall communicate to those students that some institutions of higher education may require algebra II for the purpose of college admission. Also, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of each student who chooses to take advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II shall sign and submit to the school a document containing a statement acknowledging that not taking algebra II may have an adverse effect on college admission decisions. A student may fulfill one unit of mathematics under division (C)(3) of this section by completing one-half unit of financial literacy instruction to satisfy the requirement prescribed under division (C)(9) of this section and one-half unit of a mathematics course. The one-half unit course in mathematics shall not be in algebra II, or its equivalent, or a course for which the department requires an end-of-course examination under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. Students who choose to take one unit of advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II, as described in division (C)(3) of this section, shall not be permitted to complete one-half unit of financial literacy instruction to satisfy the mathematics unit requirements of that division. Instead, those students shall be required to complete the one-half unit of financial literacy instruction under division (C)(8) of this section. (4) Physical education, one-half unit; (5) Science, three units with inquiry-based laboratory experience that engages students in asking valid scientific questions and gathering and analyzing information, which shall include the following, or their equivalent: (a) Physical sciences, one unit; (b) Life sciences, one unit; (c) Advanced study in one or more of the following sciences, one unit: (i) Chemistry, physics, or other physical science; (ii) Advanced biology or other life science; (iii) Astronomy, physical geology, or other earth or space science; (iv) Computer science. No student shall substitute a computer science course for a life sciences or biology course under division (C)(5) of this section. (6) History and government, one unit, which shall comply with division (M) of this section and shall include both of the following: (a) American history, one-half unit; (b) American government, one-half unit. (7) Social studies, two units. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2017, the two units of instruction prescribed by division (C)(7) of this section shall include at least one-half unit of instruction in the study of world history and civilizations. (8) Five units consisting of one or any combination of foreign language, fine arts, business, career-technical education, family and consumer sciences, technology which may include computer science, agricultural education, a junior reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code, or English language arts, mathematics, science, or social studies courses not otherwise required under division (C) of this section. One-half unit of instruction under division (C)(8) of this section may be instruction in financial literacy to satisfy the requirement under division (C)(9) of this section. (9)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(9)(b) of this section, for students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2022, financial literacy, one-half unit. Each student shall elect to complete the one-half unit of instruction in financial literacy either in lieu of one-half unit of instruction in mathematics under division (C)(3) of this section or an elective under division (C)(8) of this section. A student may fulfill the financial literacy instruction requirement under division (C)(9) of this section through the successful completion of an advanced placement course in microeconomics or macroeconomics. (b) A student attending a nonpublic school accredited through the independent schools association of the central states or any other chartered nonpublic school shall not be required to complete the one-half unit of financial literacy instruction prescribed in division (C)(9)(a) of this section, unless that student is attending the school under a state scholarship program as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. The study and instruction of financial literacy required under division (C)(9) of this section shall align with the academic content standards for financial literacy and entrepreneurship adopted under division (A)(2) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. The instruction provided under an advanced placement course in microeconomics or macroeconomics shall be considered to be aligned with those academic content standards. In developing the curriculum for the study and instruction of financial literacy, schools may use available public-private partnerships and resources and materials that exist in business, industry, and through the centers for economics education at institutions of higher education. Ohioans must be prepared to apply increased knowledge and skills in the workplace and to adapt their knowledge and skills quickly to meet the rapidly changing conditions of the twenty-first century. National studies indicate that all high school graduates need the same academic foundation, regardless of the opportunities they pursue after graduation. The goal of Ohio's system of elementary and secondary education is to prepare all students for and seamlessly connect all students to success in life beyond high school graduation, regardless of whether the next step is entering the workforce, beginning an apprenticeship, engaging in post-secondary training, serving in the military, or pursuing a college degree. The requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section are the standard expectation for all students entering ninth grade for the first time at a public or chartered nonpublic high school on or after July 1, 2010. A student may satisfy this expectation through a variety of methods, including, but not limited to, integrated, applied, career-technical, and traditional coursework. Stronger coordination between high schools and institutions of higher education is necessary to prepare students for more challenging academic endeavors and to lessen the need for academic remediation in college, thereby reducing the costs of higher education for Ohio's students, families, and the state. The department and the chancellor of higher education shall develop policies to ensure that only in rare instances will students who complete the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section require academic remediation after high school. School districts, community schools, and chartered nonpublic schools shall integrate technology into learning experiences across the curriculum in order to maximize efficiency, enhance learning, and prepare students for success in the technology-driven twenty-first century. Districts and schools shall use distance and web-based course delivery as a method of providing or augmenting all instruction required under this division, including laboratory experience in science. Districts and schools shall utilize technology access and electronic learning opportunities provided by the broadcast educational media commission, chancellor, the Ohio learning network, education technology centers, public television stations, and other public and private providers. (D) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, a student who enters ninth grade on or after July 1, 2010, and before July 1, 2016, may qualify for graduation from a public or chartered nonpublic high school even though the student has not completed the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) During the student's third year of attending high school, as determined by the school, the student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian sign and file with the school a written statement asserting the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's consent to the student's graduating without completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section and acknowledging that one consequence of not completing those requirements is ineligibility to enroll in most state universities in Ohio without further coursework. (2) The student and parent, guardian, or custodian fulfill any procedural requirements the school stipulates to ensure the student's and parent's, guardian's, or custodian's informed consent and to facilitate orderly filing of statements under division (D)(1) of this section. Annually, each district or school shall notify the department of the number of students who choose to qualify for graduation under division (D) of this section and the number of students who complete the student's success plan and graduate from high school. (3) The student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian and a representative of the student's high school jointly develop a student success plan for the student in the manner described in division (C)(1) of section 3313.6020 of the Revised Code that specifies the student matriculating to a two-year degree program, acquiring a business and industry-recognized credential, or entering an apprenticeship. (4) The student's high school provides counseling and support for the student related to the plan developed under division (D)(3) of this section during the remainder of the student's high school experience. (5)(a) Except as provided in division (D)(5)(b) of this section, the student successfully completes, at a minimum, the curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section. (b) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, a student shall be required to complete successfully, at the minimum, the curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section, except as follows: (i) Mathematics, four units, one unit which shall be one of the following: (I) Probability and statistics; (II) Computer science; (III) Applied mathematics or quantitative reasoning; (IV) Any other course approved by the department using standards established by the superintendent not later than October 1, 2014. (ii) Elective units, five units; (iii) Science, three units as prescribed by division (B) of this section which shall include inquiry-based laboratory experience that engages students in asking valid scientific questions and gathering and analyzing information. (E) Each school district and chartered nonpublic school retains the authority to require an even more challenging minimum curriculum for high school graduation than specified in division (B) or (C) of this section. A school district board of education, through the adoption of a resolution, or the governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may stipulate any of the following: (1) A minimum high school curriculum that requires more than twenty units of academic credit to graduate; (2) An exception to the district's or school's minimum high school curriculum that is comparable to the exception provided in division (D) of this section but with additional requirements, which may include a requirement that the student successfully complete more than the minimum curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section; (3) That no exception comparable to that provided in division (D) of this section is available. If a school district or chartered nonpublic school requires a foreign language as an additional graduation requirement under division (E) of this section, a student may apply one unit of instruction in computer coding to satisfy one unit of foreign language. If a student applies more than one computer coding course to satisfy the foreign language requirement, the courses shall be sequential and progressively more difficult. (F) A student enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program, which program has received a waiver from the department, may qualify for graduation from high school by successfully completing a competency-based instructional program administered by the dropout prevention and recovery program in lieu of completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section. The department shall grant a waiver to a dropout prevention and recovery program, within sixty days after the program applies for the waiver, if the program meets all of the following conditions: (1) The program serves only students not younger than sixteen years of age and not older than twenty-one years of age. (2) The program enrolls students who, at the time of their initial enrollment, either, or both, are at least one grade level behind their cohort age groups or experience crises that significantly interfere with their academic progress such that they are prevented from continuing their traditional programs. (3) The program requires students to attain at least the applicable score designated for each of the assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or, to the extent prescribed by rule of the department under division (D)(5) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, under division (B)(2) of that section. (4) The program develops a student success plan for the student in the manner described in division (C)(1) of section 3313.6020 of the Revised Code that specifies the student's matriculating to a two-year degree program, acquiring a business and industry-recognized credential, or entering an apprenticeship. (5) The program provides counseling and support for the student related to the plan developed under division (F)(4) of this section during the remainder of the student's high school experience. (6) The program requires the student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian to sign and file, in accordance with procedural requirements stipulated by the program, a written statement asserting the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's consent to the student's graduating without completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section and acknowledging that one consequence of not completing those requirements is ineligibility to enroll in most state universities in Ohio without further coursework. (7) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department an instructional plan that demonstrates how the academic content standards adopted by the department under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code will be taught and assessed. (8) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department a policy on career advising that satisfies the requirements of section 3313.6020 of the Revised Code, with an emphasis on how every student will receive career advising. (9) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department a written agreement outlining the future cooperation between the program and any combination of local job training, postsecondary education, nonprofit, and health and social service organizations to provide services for students in the program and their families. Divisions (F)(8) and (9) of this section apply only to waivers granted on or after July 1, 2015. If the department does not act either to grant the waiver or to reject the program application for the waiver within sixty days as required under this section, the waiver shall be considered to be granted. (G) Every high school may permit students below the ninth grade to take advanced work. If a high school so permits, it shall award high school credit for successful completion of the advanced work and shall count such advanced work toward the graduation requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section if the advanced work was both: (1) Taught by a person who possesses a license or certificate issued under section 3301.071, 3319.22, or 3319.222 of the Revised Code that is valid for teaching high school; (2) Designated by the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district, the board of the cooperative education school district, or the governing authority of the chartered nonpublic school as meeting the high school curriculum requirements. Each high school shall record on the student's high school transcript all high school credit awarded under division (G) of this section. In addition, if the student completed a seventh- or eighth-grade fine arts course described in division (K) of this section and the course qualified for high school credit under that division, the high school shall record that course on the student's high school transcript. (H) The department shall make its individual academic career plan available through its Ohio career information system web site for districts and schools to use as a tool for communicating with and providing guidance to students and families in selecting high school courses. (I) A school district or chartered nonpublic school may integrate academic content in a subject area for which the department has adopted standards under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code into a course in a different subject area, including a career-technical education course, in accordance with guidance for integrated coursework developed by the department. Upon successful completion of an integrated course, a student may receive credit for both subject areas that were integrated into the course. Units earned for subject area content delivered through integrated academic and career-technical instruction are eligible to meet the graduation requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section. For purposes of meeting graduation requirements, if an end-of-course examination has been prescribed under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code for the subject area delivered through integrated instruction, the school district or school may administer the related subject area examinations upon the student's completion of the integrated course. Nothing in division (I) of this section shall be construed to excuse any school district, chartered nonpublic school, or student from any requirement in the Revised Code related to curriculum, assessments, or the awarding of a high school diploma. (J)(1) The department, in consultation with the chancellor, shall adopt a statewide plan implementing methods for students to earn units of high school credit based on a demonstration of subject area competency, instead of or in combination with completing hours of classroom instruction. The plan shall include a standard method for recording demonstrated proficiency on high school transcripts. Each school district and community school shall comply with the department's plan adopted under this division and award units of high school credit in accordance with the plan. The department may adopt existing methods for earning high school credit based on a demonstration of subject area competency as necessary prior to the 2009-2010 school year. (2) The department shall update the statewide plan adopted pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section to also include methods for students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on a demonstration of subject area competency, instead of or in combination with completing hours of classroom instruction. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, each school district and community school also shall comply with the updated plan adopted pursuant to this division and permit students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency in accordance with the plan. (3) The department shall develop a framework for school districts and community schools to use in granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, each district and community school shall comply with the framework. Each district and community school also shall review any policy it has adopted regarding the demonstration of subject area competency to identify ways to incorporate work-based learning experiences, internships, and cooperative education into the policy in order to increase student engagement and opportunities to earn units of high school credit. (K) This division does not apply to students who qualify for graduation from high school under division (D) or (F) of this section, or to students pursuing a career-technical instructional track as determined by the school district board of education or the chartered nonpublic school's governing authority. Nevertheless, the general assembly encourages such students to consider enrolling in a fine arts course as an elective. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, each student enrolled in a public or chartered nonpublic high school shall complete two semesters or the equivalent of fine arts to graduate from high school. The coursework may be completed in any of grades seven to twelve. Each student who completes a fine arts course in grade seven or eight may elect to count that course toward the five units of electives required for graduation under division (C)(8) of this section, if the course satisfied the requirements of division (G) of this section. In that case, the high school shall award the student high school credit for the course and count the course toward the five units required under division (C)(8) of this section. If the course in grade seven or eight did not satisfy the requirements of division (G) of this section, the high school shall not award the student high school credit for the course but shall count the course toward the two semesters or the equivalent of fine arts required by this division. (L) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the board of education of each school district and the governing authority of each chartered nonpublic school may adopt a policy to excuse from the high school physical education requirement each student who, during high school, has participated in interscholastic athletics, marching band, show choir, or cheerleading for at least two full seasons or in the junior reserve officer training corps for at least two full school years. If the board or authority adopts such a policy, the board or authority shall not require the student to complete any physical education course as a condition to graduate. However, the student shall be required to complete one-half unit, consisting of at least sixty hours of instruction, in another course of study. In the case of a student who has participated in the junior reserve officer training corps for at least two full school years, credit received for that participation may be used to satisfy the requirement to complete one-half unit in another course of study. (M) It is important that high school students learn and understand United States history and the governments of both the United States and the state of Ohio. Therefore, beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2012, the study of American history and American government required by divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of this section shall include the study of all of the following documents: (1) The Declaration of Independence; (2) The Northwest Ordinance; (3) The Constitution of the United States with emphasis on the Bill of Rights; (4) The Ohio Constitution. The study of each of the documents prescribed in divisions (M)(1) to (4) of this section shall include study of that document in its original context. The study of American history and government required by divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of this section shall include the historical evidence of the role of documents such as the Federalist Papers and the Anti-Federalist Papers to firmly establish the historical background leading to the establishment of the provisions of the Constitution and Bill of Rights. (N) A student may apply one unit of instruction in computer science to satisfy one unit of mathematics or one unit of science under division (C) of this section as the student chooses, regardless of the field of certification of the teacher who teaches the course, so long as that teacher meets the licensure requirements prescribed by section 3319.236 of the Revised Code and, prior to teaching the course, completes a professional development program determined to be appropriate by the district board. If a student applies more than one computer science course to satisfy curriculum requirements under that division, the courses shall be sequential and progressively more difficult or cover different subject areas within computer science. (O) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the board of education of each school district and the governing authority of each chartered nonpublic school may adopt a policy to excuse from the financial literacy instruction requirement under division (C)(9) of this section each student who, during high school, participates in a financial literacy program offered through a student branch, as defined in section 1733.04 of the Revised Code, or by a bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code. The policy shall require the financial literacy program to meet or exceed the academic content standards and model curriculum for financial literacy and entrepreneurship instruction adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. The policy shall require a student to participate in the program for the equivalent of at least one-half unit of instruction to qualify for an exemption under this division. Not later than July 1, 2026, the department shall develop and post on its web site a model policy and guidelines for districts and schools to use in developing a policy under this division. Sec. 3313.6026. (A) As used in this section, "school governing authority" means any of the following: (1) The governing authority of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (2) The governing body of a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (3) The board of trustees of a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (4) The governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school. (B) Each school district board of education and each school governing authority that operates a high school shall enter into a data sharing agreement with the chancellor of higher education for the purposes of operating the free application for federal student aid data system established under section 3333.301 of the Revised Code. Each school district or school shall provide principals and school counselors with access to the data system to assist with efforts to support and encourage students to complete the free application for federal student aid form. Sec. 3313.6028. (A)(1) As used in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code, "science of reading" means an interdisciplinary body of scientific evidence that: (a) Informs how students learn to read and write proficiently; (b) Explains why some students have difficulty with reading and writing; (c) Indicates that all students benefit from explicit and systematic instruction in phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, comprehension, and writing to become effective readers; (d) Does not rely on any model of teaching students to read based on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues, including a three-cueing approach. (2) As used in this section, "three-cueing approach" means any model of teaching students to read based on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues. (B) The department of education and workforce shall establish a list of high-quality core curriculum and instructional materials in English language arts, and a list of evidence-based reading intervention programs, that are aligned with the science of reading and strategies for effective literacy instruction. (C) Beginning not later than the 2024-2025 school year, each school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, shall use core curriculum and instructional materials in English language arts in each of grades pre-kindergarten to five and evidence-based reading intervention programs in each of grades pre-kindergarten to twelve only from the lists established under division (B) of this section. Except as provided in division (D) of this section, no district or school shall use any core curriculum, instructional materials, or intervention program in grades pre-kindergarten to five that use the three-cueing approach to teach students to read. (D) A district or school may apply to the department for a waiver on an individual student basis to use curriculum, instructional materials, or an intervention program in grades pre-kindergarten through five that uses the three-cueing approach to teach students to read, except as follows: (1) No student for whom a reading improvement and monitoring plan has been developed under division (C) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code shall be eligible for a waiver. (2) If a student has an individualized education program that explicitly indicates the three-cueing approach is appropriate for the student's learning needs, the student shall not be required to have a waiver. In determining whether to approve a waiver requested under this section, the department shall consider the performance of the student's district or school on the state report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, including on the early literacy component prescribed under division (D)(3)(e) of that section. (E)(1) The department shall identify vendors that provide professional development to educators, including pre-service teachers and faculty employed by educator preparation programs, on the use of high-quality core curriculum and instructional materials and reading intervention programs on the lists established under division (B) of this section. (2) A professional development committee established under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code shall qualify any completed professional development coursework provided by a vendor described in division (E)(1) of this section to count towards professional development coursework requirements for teacher licensure renewal. (3) A professional development committee shall permit a teacher to apply any hours earned over the minimum amount of hours required for professional development coursework for teacher licensure renewal under division (E)(2) of this section to the next renewal period for that license. (F) Not later than the thirtieth day of June of each year, the department shall prepare and issue a report regarding the implementation of this section, including by districts and schools. The department shall provide the report to the governor, and, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, to the general assembly. Sec. 3313.61. (A) A diploma shall be granted by the board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district that operates a high school to any person to whom all of the following apply: (1) The person has successfully completed the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the person by any high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code, or has qualified under division (D) or (F) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, provided that no school district shall require a student to remain in school for any specific number of semesters or other terms if the student completes the required curriculum early; (2) Subject to section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, the person has met the assessment requirements of division (A)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. (a) If the person entered the ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014, the person either: (i) Has attained at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments required by that division unless the person was excused from taking any such assessment pursuant to section 3313.532 of the Revised Code or unless division (H) or (L) of this section applies to the person; (ii) Has satisfied the alternative conditions prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. (b) If the person entered the ninth grade on or after July 1, 2014, the person has met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code, except to the extent that the person is excused from an assessment prescribed by that section pursuant to section 3313.532 of the Revised Code or division (H) (G) or (L)(K) of this section. (3) The person is not eligible to receive an honors diploma granted pursuant to division (B) of this section. Except as provided in divisions (C), (E)(D), (J)(I), and (L)(K) of this section, no diploma shall be granted under this division to anyone except as provided under this division. (B) In lieu of a diploma granted under division (A) of this section, an honors diploma shall be granted, in accordance with rules of the department of education and workforce, by any such district board to anyone who accomplishes all of the following: (1) Successfully completes the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the person by any high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code; (2) Subject to section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, has met the assessment requirements of division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. (a) If the person entered the ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014, the person either: (i) Has attained at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments required by that division; (ii) Has satisfied the alternative conditions prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. (b) If the person entered the ninth grade on or after July 1, 2014, the person has met the requirement prescribed under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. (3) Has met additional criteria established by the department for the granting of such a diploma. An honors diploma shall not be granted to a student who is subject to the requirements prescribed in division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code but elects the option of division (D) or (F) of that section. Except as provided in divisions (C), (E),(D) and (J)(I) of this section, no honors diploma shall be granted to anyone failing to comply with this division and no more than one honors diploma shall be granted to any student under this division. The department shall adopt rules prescribing the granting of honors diplomas under this division. These rules may prescribe the granting of honors diplomas that recognize a student's achievement as a whole or that recognize a student's achievement in one or more specific subjects or both. The rules may prescribe the granting of an honors diploma recognizing technical expertise for a career-technical student. In any case, the rules shall designate two or more criteria for the granting of each type of honors diploma the board establishes under this division and the number of such criteria that must be met for the granting of that type of diploma. The number of such criteria for any type of honors diploma shall be at least one less than the total number of criteria designated for that type and no one or more particular criteria shall be required of all persons who are to be granted that type of diploma. (C) Any district board administering any of the assessments required by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to any person requesting to take such assessment pursuant to division (B)(8)(b) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code shall award a diploma to such person if the person attains at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments administered and if the person has previously attained the applicable scores on all the other assessments required by division (B)(1) of that section or has been exempted or excused from attaining the applicable score on any such assessment pursuant to division (H) or (L) of this section or from taking any such assessment pursuant to section 3313.532 of the Revised Code. (D) Each diploma awarded under this section shall be signed by the president and treasurer of the issuing board, the superintendent of schools, and the principal of the high school. Each diploma shall bear the date of its issue, be in such form as the district board prescribes, and be paid for out of the district's general fund. (E)(D) A person who is a resident of Ohio and is eligible under the minimum standards of the director of education and workforce to receive a high school diploma based in whole or in part on credits earned while an inmate of a correctional institution operated by the state or any political subdivision thereof, shall be granted such diploma by the correctional institution operating the programs in which such credits were earned, and by the board of education of the school district in which the inmate resided immediately prior to the inmate's placement in the institution. The diploma granted by the correctional institution shall be signed by the director of the institution, and by the person serving as principal of the institution's high school and shall bear the date of issue. (F)(E) Persons who are not residents of Ohio but who are inmates of correctional institutions operated by the state or any political subdivision thereof, and who are eligible under the minimum standards of the director to receive a high school diploma based in whole or in part on credits earned while an inmate of the correctional institution, shall be granted a diploma by the correctional institution offering the program in which the credits were earned. The diploma granted by the correctional institution shall be signed by the director of the institution and by the person serving as principal of the institution's high school and shall bear the date of issue. (G)(F) The department shall provide by rule for the administration of the assessments required by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code to inmates of correctional institutions. (H) (G) Any person to whom all of the following apply shall be exempted from attaining the applicable score on the assessment in social studies designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, any American history end-of-course examination and any American government end-of-course examination required under division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code if such an exemption is prescribed by rule of the department under division (D)(3) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, or the test in citizenship designated under former division (B) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to September 11, 2001: (1) The person is not a citizen of the United States; (2) The person is not a permanent resident of the United States; (3) The person indicates no intention to reside in the United States after the completion of high school. (I)(H) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.19 and division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, this section and section 3313.611 of the Revised Code do not apply to the board of education of any joint vocational school district or any cooperative education school district established pursuant to divisions (A) to (C) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code. (J)(I) Upon receipt of a notice under division (D) of section 3325.08 or division (D) of section 3328.25 of the Revised Code that a student has received a diploma under either that section, the board of education receiving the notice may grant a high school diploma under this section to the student, except that such board shall grant the student a diploma if the student meets the graduation requirements that the student would otherwise have had to meet to receive a diploma from the district. The diploma granted under this section shall be of the same type the notice indicates the student received under section 3325.08 or 3328.25 of the Revised Code. (K)(J) As used in this division, "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding division (C)(3) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, no English learner who has not either attained the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments required by that division, or met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code, shall be awarded a diploma under this section. (L)(1)(K)(1) Any student described by division (A)(1) of this section who is subject to divisions (A)(1) to (3) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code may be awarded a diploma without meeting the requirements prescribed by those divisions provided an individualized education program specifically exempts the student from meeting such requirement. This division does not negate the requirement for a student to take the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 or under division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, or alternate assessments required by division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, for the purpose of assessing student progress as required by federal law. (2) Any student described by division (A)(1) of this section who is subject to division (B) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code may be awarded a diploma without meeting the requirement prescribed by division (B)(1) of that section provided the student's individualized education program specifically exempts the student from meeting that requirement and either division (L)(2)(a)(K)(2)(a) or (b) of this section applies to the student, as follows: (a)(i) The student took an alternate assessment in mathematics and English language arts administered to the student in accordance with division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code and failed to attain a score established by the department on one or both assessments. (ii) The school district offered remedial support to the student in each subject area in which the student did not attain the established score and the student received that support. (iii) The student retook each alternate assessment in which the student did not attain the established score and the student did not attain the established score on the retake assessment. (b)(i) The student took the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations and failed to attain the competency score as determined under division (B)(10)(B)(9) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on one or both examinations. (ii) The school district offered remedial support to the student in each subject area in which the student did not attain the competency score and the student received that support. (iii) The student retook each examination in which the student did not attain the competency score and the student did not attain the competency score on the retake examination. Sec. 3313.611. (A) The department of education and workforce shall adopt, by rule, standards for awarding high school credit equivalent to credit for completion of high school academic and vocational education courses to applicants for diplomas under this section. The standards may permit high school credit to be granted to an applicant for any of the following: (1) Work experiences or experiences as a volunteer; (2) Completion of academic, vocational, or self-improvement courses offered to persons over the age of twenty-one by a chartered public or nonpublic school; (3) Completion of academic, vocational, or self-improvement courses offered by an organization, individual, or educational institution other than a chartered public or nonpublic school; (4) Other life experiences considered by the board to provide knowledge and learning experiences comparable to that gained in a classroom setting. (B) The board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district that operates a high school shall grant a diploma of adult education to any applicant if all of the following apply: (1) The applicant is a resident of the district; (2) The applicant is over the age of twenty-one and has not been issued a diploma as provided in section 3313.61 of the Revised Code; (3) Subject to section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, the applicant has met the assessment requirements of division (B)(3)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. (a) Prior to July 1, 2014, the applicant either: (i) Has attained the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all of the assessments required by that division or was excused or exempted from any such assessment pursuant to section 3313.532 or was exempted from attaining the applicable score on any such assessment pursuant to division (H) or (L) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code; (ii) Has satisfied the alternative conditions prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. (b) On or after July 1, 2014, has met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code, except and only to the extent that the applicant is excused from some portion of that section pursuant to section 3313.532 of the Revised Code or division (H) (G) or (L)(K) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code. (4) The district board determines, in accordance with the standards adopted under division (A) of this section, that the applicant has attained sufficient high school credits, including equivalent credits awarded under such standards, to qualify as having successfully completed the curriculum required by the district for graduation. (C) If a district board determines that an applicant is not eligible for a diploma under division (B) of this section, it shall inform the applicant of the reason the applicant is ineligible and shall provide a list of any courses required for the diploma for which the applicant has not received credit. An applicant may reapply for a diploma under this section at any time. (D) If a district board awards an adult education diploma under this section, the president and treasurer of the board and the superintendent of schools shall sign it. Each diploma shall bear the date of its issuance, be in such form as the district board prescribes, and be paid for from the district's general fund, except that the department may by rule prescribe standard language to be included on each diploma. (E) As used in this division, "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding division (C)(3) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, no English learner who has not either attained the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments required by that division, or has not met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code, shall be awarded a diploma under this section. Sec. 3313.612. (A) No nonpublic school chartered by the director of education and workforce shall grant a high school diploma to any person unless, subject to section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, the person has met the assessment requirements of division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, as applicable. (1) If the person entered the ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014, the person has attained at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments required by that division, or has satisfied the alternative conditions prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. (2) If the person entered the ninth grade on or after July 1, 2014, the person has met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (B) This section does not apply to any of the following: (1) Any person with regard to any assessment from which the person was excused pursuant to division (C)(1)(c) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code; (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, any person who attends a nonpublic school accredited through the independent schools association of the central states, except for a student attending the school under a state scholarship program as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code; (3) Any person with regard to the social studies assessment under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, any American history end-of-course examination and any American government end-of-course examination required under division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code if such an exemption is prescribed by rule of the department of education and workforce under division (D)(3) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, or the citizenship test under former division (B) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to September 11, 2001, if all of the following apply: (a) The person is not a citizen of the United States; (b) The person is not a permanent resident of the United States; (c) The person indicates no intention to reside in the United States after completion of high school. (4) Any person who attends a chartered nonpublic school that satisfies the requirements of division (L)(4) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. In the case of such a student, the student's chartered nonpublic school shall determine the student's eligibility for graduation based on the standards of the school's accrediting body. (C) As used in this division, "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding division (C)(3) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, no English learner who has not either attained the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments required by that division, or met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code, shall be awarded a diploma under this section. (D) The department shall not impose additional requirements or assessments for the granting of a high school diploma under this section that are not prescribed by this section. (E) The department shall furnish the assessment administered by a nonpublic school pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.614. (A) As used in this section, a person "fulfills the curriculum requirement for a diploma" at the time one of the following conditions is satisfied: (1) The person successfully completes the high school curriculum of a school district, a community school, a chartered nonpublic school, or a correctional institution. (2) The person successfully completes the individualized education program developed for the person under section 3323.08 of the Revised Code. (3) A board of education issues its determination under section 3313.611 of the Revised Code that the person qualifies as having successfully completed the curriculum required by the district. (B) This division specifies the assessment requirements that must be fulfilled as a condition toward granting high school diplomas under sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.612, and 3325.08 of the Revised Code. (1) A person who fulfills the curriculum requirement for a diploma before September 15, 2000, is not required to pass any proficiency test or achievement test in science as a condition to receiving a diploma. (2) A person who began ninth grade for the first time prior to July 1, 2003, is not required to pass the Ohio graduation test prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 or any assessment prescribed under division (B)(2) of that section in any subject as a condition to receiving a diploma once the person has passed the ninth grade proficiency test in the same subject, so long as the person passed the ninth grade proficiency test prior to September 15, 2008. However, any such person who passes the Ohio graduation test in any subject prior to passing the ninth grade proficiency test in the same subject shall be deemed to have passed the ninth grade proficiency test in that subject as a condition to receiving a diploma. For this purpose, the ninth grade proficiency test in citizenship substitutes for the Ohio graduation test in social studies. If a person began ninth grade prior to July 1, 2003, but does not pass a ninth grade proficiency test or the Ohio graduation test in a particular subject before September 15, 2008, and passage of a test in that subject is a condition for the person to receive a diploma, the person must pass the Ohio graduation test instead of the ninth grade proficiency test in that subject to receive a diploma. (3)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(3)(b) of this section, a person who begins ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2003, in a school district, community school, or chartered nonpublic school is not eligible to receive a diploma based on passage of ninth grade proficiency tests. Each such person who begins ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014, must pass Ohio graduation tests to meet the assessment requirements applicable to that person as a condition to receiving a diploma or satisfy one of the conditions prescribed in division (B)(3)(b) of this section. (b) A person who began ninth grade for the first time prior to July 1, 2014, shall be eligible to receive a diploma if the person meets the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (c) A person who began ninth grade for the first time prior to July 1, 2014, and who has not attained at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments required by that division shall be eligible to receive a diploma if the person meets the requirement prescribed by rule of the department of education and workforce as prescribed under division (B)(3)(d) of this section. (d) The department shall adopt rules prescribing the manner in which a person who began ninth grade for the first time prior to July 1, 2014, may be eligible for a high school diploma by combining the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code and the requirement to attain at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on the assessments required by that division. The rules shall ensure that the combined requirements require a demonstration of mastery that is equivalent or greater to the expectations of the assessments prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The rules shall include the following: (i) The date by which a person who began ninth grade for the first time prior to July 1, 2014, may be eligible for a high school diploma under division (B)(3)(c) of this section; (ii) Methods of replacing individual assessments prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code; (iii) Methods of integrating the pathways prescribed by division (A) of section 3313.618 or section 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (4) Except as provided in division (B)(3)(b) of this section, a A person who begins ninth grade on or after July 1, 2014, is not eligible to receive a diploma based on passage of the Ohio graduation tests. Each such person must meet the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (C) This division specifies the curriculum requirement that shall be completed as a condition toward granting high school diplomas under sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.612, and 3325.08 of the Revised Code. (1) A person who is under twenty-two years of age when the person fulfills the curriculum requirement for a diploma shall complete the curriculum required by the school district or school issuing the diploma for the first year that the person originally enrolled in high school, except for a person who qualifies for graduation from high school under either division (D) or (F) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (2) Once a person fulfills the curriculum requirement for a diploma, the person is never required, as a condition of receiving a diploma, to meet any different curriculum requirements that take effect pending the person's passage of proficiency tests or achievement tests or assessments, including changes mandated by section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, the department, a school district board of education, or a governing authority of a community school or chartered nonpublic school. Sec. 3313.618. (A) In addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the board of education of a school district or governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school, each student entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2019, shall satisfy at least one of the following conditions or the conditions prescribed under division (B) of this section in order to qualify for a high school diploma: (1) Be remediation-free, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on each of the nationally standardized assessments in English, mathematics, and reading; (2) Attain a score specified under division (B)(5)(c) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (3) Attain a score that demonstrates workforce readiness and employability on a nationally recognized job skills assessment selected by the department of education and workforce under division (F) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code and obtain either an industry-recognized credential or a license issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license. For the purposes of this division, the industry-recognized credentials and licenses shall be as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. A student may choose to qualify for a high school diploma by satisfying any of the separate requirements prescribed by divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section. If the student's school district or school does not administer the examination prescribed by one of those divisions that the student chooses to take to satisfy the requirements of this section, the school district or school may require that student to arrange for the applicable scores to be sent directly to the district or school by the company or organization that administers the examination. (B) In addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the district board or school governing authority, each student entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, shall satisfy the following conditions in order to qualify for a high school diploma: (1) Attain a competency score as determined under division (B)(10)(B)(9) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on each of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. School districts and chartered nonpublic schools shall offer remedial support to any student who fails to attain a competency score on one or both of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations. Following the first administration of the exam, if a student fails to attain a competency score on one or both of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations that student must retake the respective examination at least once. If a student fails to attain a competency score on a retake examination, the student may demonstrate competency in the failed subject area through one of the following options: (a) Earn course credit taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code in the failed subject area; (b) Complete two of the following options, one of which must be foundational: (i) Foundational options to demonstrate competency, which include earning a cumulative score of proficient or higher on three or more state technical assessments aligned with section 3313.903 of the Revised Code in a single career pathway, obtaining an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that meet the criteria established under that section to qualify for a high school diploma, obtaining a license approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that is issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license, completing a pre-apprenticeship aligned with options established under section 3313.904 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field, completing an apprenticeship registered with the apprenticeship council established under section 4139.02 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field, or providing evidence of acceptance into an apprenticeship program after high school that is restricted to participants eighteen years of age or older; (ii) Supporting options to demonstrate competency, which include completing two hundred fifty hours of a work-based learning experience with evidence of positive evaluations, obtaining an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code, or attaining a workforce readiness score, as determined by the department, on the nationally recognized job skills assessment selected by the department under division (F) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (c) Provide evidence that the student has enlisted in a branch of the armed services of the United States as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. (d) Be remediation-free, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, in the failed subject area on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. For English language arts II, a student must be remediation-free in the subjects of English and reading on the nationally standardized assessment. Subject to division (L)(2)(K)(2) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code, for any students receiving special education and related services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the individualized education program developed for the student under that chapter shall specify the manner in which the student will participate in the assessments administered under this division or an alternate assessment in accordance with division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (2) Earn at least two of the state diploma seals prescribed under division (A) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, at least one of which shall be any of the following: (a) The state seal of biliteracy established under section 3313.6111 of the Revised Code; (b) The OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code; (c) One of the state diploma seals established under divisions (C)(1) to (7) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) A student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or enrolls in such a high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year shall meet the requirements of division (B) or (D) of this section, as applicable, in order to qualify for a high school diploma. However, any student subject to division (B) of this section who transfers or enrolls after the start of the student's twelfth grade year and fails to attain a competency score on the Algebra I or English language arts II end-of-course examination shall not be required to retake the applicable examination prior to demonstrating competency in the failed subject area under the options prescribed in divisions (B)(1)(a) to (d) of this section. (2) The department shall prescribe standards that allow a transfer student who, prior to the student's transfer, took an assessment described in division (B)(1) or (2) of section 3301.0712 or section 3313.619 of the Revised Code to apply the score from that assessment towards graduation requirements at the student's new public or chartered nonpublic school. (D) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, in addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the school governing authority, a chartered nonpublic school student subject to division (L)(3)(a)(ii) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, shall qualify for a high school diploma if the student earns a remediation-free score in the areas of English, mathematics, and reading, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. No such student shall be required to take the Algebra I or English language arts II end-of-course examination or earn diploma seals under this section. (E) The department shall not create or require any additional assessment for the granting of any type of high school diploma other than as prescribed by this section. Except as provided in sections 3313.6111, 3313.6112, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, the department or the director of education and workforce shall not create any endorsement or designation that may be affiliated with a high school diploma. Sec. 3313.6110. (A) A person who has completed the final year of education at home, as authorized under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, and has successfully fulfilled the high school curriculum applicable to that person may be granted a high school diploma by the person's parent, guardian, or other person having charge or care of a child, as defined in division (A)(1) of section 3321.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A person who has graduated from a nonchartered nonpublic school in Ohio and who has successfully fulfilled that school's high school curriculum may be granted a high school diploma by the governing authority of that school. (C) Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, a diploma granted under this section shall serve as proof of the successful completion of that person's applicable high school curriculum and satisfactory to fulfill any legal requirement to show such proof. (D) For the purposes of an application for employment, a diploma granted under this section shall be considered proof of completion of a high school education, regardless of whether the person to which the diploma was granted participated in the assessments prescribed by division (A)(1) or (B)(1) or (2) of section sections 3301.0710 and section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (E) A diploma granted under division (A) of this section may include a state seal of biliteracy, an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal, or a state diploma seal that may be assigned to the student's diploma, by the parent, guardian, or other person having charge or care of the student, in the same manner as prescribed for diplomas and transcripts issued by school districts and chartered nonpublic schools under sections 3313.6111, 3113.6112, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.6111. (A) The department of education and workforce shall establish the state seal of biliteracy, which may be attached or affixed to the high school transcript of a student enrolled in a public or chartered nonpublic school. The state seal of biliteracy shall demonstrate the attainment of a high level of proficiency by a graduate of a public or chartered nonpublic high school in one or more languages in addition to English, sufficient for meaningful use in college and a career. The purpose of the state seal of biliteracy shall be to: (1) Encourage students to study languages; (2) Certify the attainment of biliteracy; (3) Provide employers with a method of identifying individuals with language and biliteracy skills; (4) Provide institutions of higher education with an additional method to recognize applicants for admission; (5) Prepare students with twenty-first century skills; (6) Recognize the value of foreign language and native language instruction in public schools; and (7) Strengthen inter-group relationships, affirm the value of diversity, and honor the multiple cultures and languages of a community. (B)(1) A school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or chartered nonpublic school may attach or affix the state seal of biliteracy to the transcript of a student enrolled in the school who meets the requirements prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section. A district or school shall not be required to attach or affix the state seal of biliteracy on the transcript of a student enrolled in the school. (2) Each school district, community school, STEM school, college-preparatory boarding school, and chartered nonpublic school shall maintain appropriate records to identify students who have completed the requirements for earning a state seal of biliteracy as prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and if the district or school has a policy of attaching or affixing the state seal of biliteracy to student transcripts, the district or school shall make the appropriate designation on the transcript of a student who completes the requirements. (C) The department shall do the following: (1) Establish the requirements and criteria for earning a state seal of biliteracy, including assessments of foreign language and English proficiency.; (2) Prepare and deliver to participating school districts, community schools, STEM schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and chartered nonpublic schools an appropriate mechanism for assigning a state seal of biliteracy on a student's transcript indicating that the student has been assigned the seal; (3) Provide any other information it considers necessary for school districts, community schools, STEM schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and chartered nonpublic schools to participate in the assigning of a state seal of biliteracy; (4) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement the provisions of this section. (D) A student shall not be charged a fee to be assigned a state seal of biliteracy on their transcript. A student may be required to pay a fee to demonstrate proficiency in a language, including the cost of a standardized test to determine proficiency in a language. (E) As used in this section, "foreign language" refers to any language other than English, including modern languages, Latin, American sign language, native American languages, and native languages. Sec. 3313.6112. (A) The department of education and workforce, in consultation with the chancellor of higher education and the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall establish the OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal, which may be attached or affixed to the high school diploma and transcript of a student enrolled in a public or chartered nonpublic school. (B) A school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or chartered nonpublic school shall attach or affix the OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal to the diploma and transcript of a student enrolled in the school who meets the requirements prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section. (C) The department of education and workforce, in consultation with the chancellor and the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall do the following: (1) Establish the requirements and criteria for earning an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal, including demonstration of work-readiness and work ethic competencies such as teamwork, problem-solving, reliability, punctuality, and computer technology competency; (2) Develop a standardized form for students to complete and have validated prior to graduation by at least three individuals, each of whom must be an employer, teacher, business mentor, community leader, faith-based leader, school leader, or coach of the student; (3) Prepare and deliver to all school districts, community schools, STEM schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and chartered nonpublic schools an appropriate mechanism for assigning an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal on a student's diploma and transcript indicating that the student has been assigned the seal; (4) Provide any other information the department considers necessary for school districts, community schools, STEM schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and chartered nonpublic schools to assign an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal. (D) A student shall not be charged a fee to be assigned an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal on the student's diploma and transcript. Sec. 3313.6113. (A) The director of education and workforce, in collaboration with the governor's office of workforce transformation and representatives of business organizations, shall establish a committee to develop a list of industry-recognized credentials and licenses that may be used to qualify for a high school diploma under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code and shall be used for state report card purposes under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (B) The committee shall do the following: (1) Establish criteria for acceptable industry-recognized credentials and licenses aligned with the in-demand jobs list published by the department of job and family services and other relevant demand data; (2) Review and update the list of industry-recognized credentials and licenses at least biennially; (3) Establish the criteria under which a student may use industry-recognized credentials to help qualify for a high school diploma under sections 3313.618 and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code; (4) Update the list of industry-recognized credentials to include a driver's license obtained by a student through a driver education course offered by a school district in accordance with section 3301.17 of the Revised Code. (C) For purposes of divisions (B)(2)(d), (C)(2)(e), and (D)(1)(j)(v) division (A)(10) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, the department of education and workforce shall include only those students who earn an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, that meet the criteria established by the committee under this section to qualify for a high school diploma. Sec. 3313.6114. (A) The department of education and workforce shall establish a system of state diploma seals for the purposes of allowing a student to qualify for graduation under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. State diploma seals may be attached or affixed to the high school diploma of a student enrolled in a public or chartered nonpublic school. The system of state diploma seals shall consist of all of the following: (1) The state seal of biliteracy established under section 3313.6111 of the Revised Code; (2) The OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code; (3) The state diploma seals prescribed under division (C) of this section. (B) A school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or chartered nonpublic school shall attach or affix the state seals prescribed under division (C) of this section to the diploma and transcript of a student enrolled in the district or school who meets the requirements established under that division. (C) The department shall establish all of the following state diploma seals: (1) An industry-recognized credential seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing either of the following: (a) Earning an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that meets the criteria established under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma and aligns to a job that is determined to be in demand in this state and its regions under section 6301.11 of the Revised Code. (b) Obtaining a license approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that is issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license. (2) A college-ready seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by attaining a score that is remediation-free, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code or by attaining a passing score, as determined by the department of education and workforce and aligned with current statewide college-level examination program scores identified by the chancellor of higher education, on a college-level examination program examination. (3) A military seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing one of the following: (a) Providing evidence that the student has enlisted in a branch of the armed services of the United States as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code; (b) Participating in a junior reserve officer training program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code; (c) Providing evidence that the student has accepted a scholarship to enter the reserve officer training corps; (d) Providing evidence that the student has been appointed to a United States military service academy. (4) A citizenship seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing any of the following: (a) Demonstrating at least a proficient level of skill as prescribed under division (B)(5)(a) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on both the American history and American government end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (b) Attaining a score level prescribed under division (B)(5)(d) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code that is at least the equivalent of a proficient level of skill in appropriate advanced placement or international baccalaureate examinations or by attaining a passing score, as determined by the department, on a college-level examination program examination in lieu of the American history and American government end-of-course examinations; (c) In lieu of the American history and American government end-of-course examinations, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in either: (i) An American history course and an American government course that are offered by the student's high school; (ii) Appropriate courses taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. (d) In the case of a student who takes an alternate assessment in accordance with division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, attaining a score established by the department on the alternate assessment in social studies; (e) In the case of a student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or who enrolls in an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in courses that correspond with the American history and American government end-of-course examinations and that the student completed in the state from which the student transferred or completed while receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school. Division (C)(4)(e) of this section does not apply to any such student with respect to an American history or American government course for which an end-of-course examination is associated that the student takes after enrolling in the high school. (5) A science seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing any of the following: (a) Demonstrating at least a proficient level of skill as prescribed under division (B)(5)(a) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on the science end-of-course examination prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (b) Attaining a score level prescribed under division (B)(5)(d) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code that is at least the equivalent of a proficient level of skill in an appropriate advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination or by attaining a passing score, as determined by the department, on a college-level examination program examination in lieu of the science end-of-course examination; (c) In lieu of the science end-of-course examination, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in either: (i) A science course listed in divisions (C)(5)(c)(i) to (iii) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code that is offered by the student's high school; (ii) An appropriate course taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. (d) In the case of a student who takes an alternate assessment in accordance with division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, attaining a score established by the department on the alternate assessment in science; (e) In the case of a student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or enrolls in an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in a course that corresponds with the science end-of-course examination and that the student completed in the state from which the student transferred or completed while receiving home instruction or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school. Division (C)(5)(e) of this section does not apply to any such student who takes a science course for which an end-of-course examination is associated after enrolling in the high school. (6) An honors diploma seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by meeting the additional criteria for an honors diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code. (7) A technology seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing any of the following: (a) Subject to division (B)(5)(d) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, attaining a score level that is at least the equivalent of a proficient level of skill in an appropriate advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination or by attaining a passing score, as determined by the department of education and workforce and aligned with the current statewide college-level examination program scores identified by the chancellor of higher education, on a college-level examination program examination; (b) Attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in an appropriate course taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code; (c) Completing a course offered through the student's district or school that meets guidelines developed by the department. However, a district or school shall not be required to offer a course that meets those guidelines. (d) In the case of a student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or enrolls in an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in an appropriate course, as determined by the district or school, that the student completed in the state from which the student transferred or completed while receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school. (8) A community service seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by completing a community service project that is aligned with guidelines adopted by the student's district board or school governing authority. (9) A fine and performing arts seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by demonstrating skill in the fine or performing arts according to an evaluation that is aligned with guidelines adopted by the student's district board or school governing authority. (10) A student engagement seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by participating in extracurricular activities such as athletics, clubs, or student government to a meaningful extent, as determined by guidelines adopted by the student's district board or school governing authority. (D)(1) Each district or school shall develop guidelines for at least one of the state seals prescribed under divisions (C)(8) to (10) of this section. (2) For the purposes of determining whether a student who transfers to a district or school has satisfied the state diploma seal requirement under division (B)(2) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code, each district or school shall recognize a state diploma seal prescribed under divisions (C)(8) to (10) of this section and earned by a student at another district or a different public or chartered nonpublic school regardless of whether the district or school to which the student transfers has developed guidelines under this section for that state seal. (3) In guidelines developed for a state diploma seal prescribed under divisions (C)(8) to (10) of this section, each district or school shall include a method to give, to the extent feasible, a student who transfers into the district or school a proportional amount of credit for any progress the student was making toward earning that state seal at the school district or different public or chartered nonpublic school from which the student transfers. (E) Each district or school shall maintain appropriate records to identify students who have met the requirements prescribed under division (C) of this section for earning the state seals established under that division. (F) The department shall prepare and deliver to each district or school an appropriate mechanism for assigning a state diploma seal established under division (C) of this section. (G) A student shall not be charged a fee to be assigned a state seal prescribed under division (C) of this section on the student's diploma and transcript. Sec. 3313.64. (A) As used in this section and in section 3313.65 of the Revised Code: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, "parent" means either parent, unless the parents have never been married to each other, are separated or divorced, or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent who is the residential parent and legal custodian of the child. When a child is in the legal custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent with residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. When a child is in the permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent who was divested of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and the right to have the child live with the parent and be the legal custodian of the child and all residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. (b) When a child is the subject of a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent designated as attorney in fact under the power of attorney. When a child is the subject of a caretaker authorization affidavit executed under sections 3109.64 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent that executed the affidavit. (2) "Legal custody," "permanent custody," and "residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (3) "School district" or "district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district and excludes any school operated in an institution maintained by the department of youth services. (4) Except as used in division (C)(2) of this section, "home" means a home, institution, foster home, group home, or other residential facility in this state that receives and cares for children, to which any of the following applies: (a) The home is licensed, certified, or approved for such purpose by the state or is maintained by the department of youth services. (b) The home is operated by a person who is licensed, certified, or approved by the state to operate the home for such purpose. (c) The home accepted the child through a placement by a person licensed, certified, or approved to place a child in such a home by the state. (d) The home is a children's home created under section 5153.21 or 5153.36 of the Revised Code. (5) "Agency" means all of the following: (a) A public children services agency; (b) An organization that holds a certificate issued by the department of children and youth in accordance with the requirements of section 5103.03 of the Revised Code and assumes temporary or permanent custody of children through commitment, agreement, or surrender, and places children in family homes for the purpose of adoption; (c) Comparable agencies of other states or countries that have complied with applicable requirements of section 2151.39 of the Revised Code or as applicable, sections 5103.20 to 5103.22 or 5103.23 to 5103.237 of the Revised Code. (6) A child is placed for adoption if either of the following occurs: (a) An agency to which the child has been permanently committed or surrendered enters into an agreement with a person pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code for the care and adoption of the child. (b) The child's natural parent places the child pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code with a person who will care for and adopt the child. (7) "Preschool child with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Child," unless otherwise indicated, includes preschool children with disabilities. (9) "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive order of the president of the United States, an act of the congress of the United States, or section 5919.29 or 5923.21 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code for admittance to kindergarten and first grade, a child who is at least five but under twenty-two years of age and any preschool child with a disability shall be admitted to school as provided in this division. (1) A child shall be admitted to the schools of the school district in which the child's parent resides. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section or division (B) of section 2151.362 and section 3317.30 of the Revised Code, a child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides shall be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if any of the following applies: (a) The child is in the legal or permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent. (b) The child resides in a home. (c) The child requires special education. (3) A child who is not entitled under division (B)(2) of this section to be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides and who is residing with a resident of this state with whom the child has been placed for adoption shall be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides unless either of the following applies: (a) The placement for adoption has been terminated. (b) Another school district is required to admit the child under division (B)(1) of this section. (4)(a) A child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides is not required to be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if both of the following apply: (i) The child resides in a home, or in a facility similarly licensed in another state, and the child was placed in the home or facility by the child's parent in consultation with, and upon the recommendation of, the Ohio resilience through integrated systems and excellence program for children and youth involved in multiple state systems. (ii) The home provides education services that meet the minimum education standards under division (D)(2) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code or, in the case of a facility located in another state, meets substantially similar requirements of the jurisdiction where the facility is located, except that the home or facility may provide the child with less than the minimum number of instructional hours required only as necessary to accommodate the child's treatment program. (b) Upon a child's admission to a home pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the home shall notify the district where the child's parent resides and the district where the home is located that the home is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. Upon a child's admission to a facility located in another state pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides that the facility is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. In either case, the district where the child's parent resides shall continue to enroll the student as provided in division (C)(5) of this section and shall excuse the child from attendance until the child is discharged from the home or facility. (c) Upon a child's discharge from a home or facility, the home or facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides. The home or facility and the district shall collaborate on a supportive reentry plan into school for the child. Division (B) of this section does not prohibit the board of education of a school district from placing a child with a disability who resides in the district in a special education program outside of the district or its schools in compliance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (C) A district shall not charge tuition for children admitted under division (B)(1) or (3) of this section. If the district admits a child under division (B)(2) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the district that admits the child as provided in divisions (C)(1) to (3) of this section, unless division (C)(4) of this section applies to the child: (1) If the child receives special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the school district of residence, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, shall pay tuition for the child in accordance with section 3323.091, 3323.13, 3323.14, or 3323.141 of the Revised Code regardless of who has custody of the child or whether the child resides in a home. (2) For a child that does not receive special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2)(d) of this section, if the child is in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent, tuition shall be paid by: (a) The district in which the child's parent resided at the time the court removed the child from home or at the time the court vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first; (b) If the parent's residence at the time the court removed the child from home or placed the child in the legal or permanent custody of the person or government agency is unknown, tuition shall be paid by the district in which the child resided at the time the child was removed from home or placed in legal or permanent custody, whichever occurred first; (c) If a school district cannot be established under division (C)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, tuition shall be paid by the district determined as required by section 2151.362 of the Revised Code by the court at the time it vests custody of the child in the person or government agency; (d) If at the time the court removed the child from home or vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first, one parent was in a residential or correctional facility or a juvenile residential placement and the other parent, if living and not in such a facility or placement, was not known to reside in this state, tuition shall be paid by the district determined under division (D) of section 3313.65 of the Revised Code as the district required to pay any tuition while the parent was in such facility or placement; (e) If the department of education and workforce has determined, pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 2151.362 of the Revised Code, that a school district other than the one named in the court's initial order, or in a prior determination of the department, is responsible to bear the cost of educating the child, the district so determined shall be responsible for that cost. (3) If the child is not in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent and the child resides in a home, tuition shall be paid by one of the following: (a) The school district in which the child's parent resides; (b) If the child's parent is not a resident of this state, the home in which the child resides. (4) Division (C)(4) of this section applies to any child who is admitted to a school district under division (B)(2) of this section, resides in a home that is not a foster home, a home maintained by the department of youth services, a detention facility established under section 2152.41 of the Revised Code, or a juvenile facility established under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, and receives educational services at the home or facility in which the child resides pursuant to a contract between the home or facility and the school district providing those services. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is a special education student, a district may choose whether to receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section or to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code. If a district chooses to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code, it shall not receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is not a special education student, a district shall receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. In the case of a child to which division (C)(4) of this section applies, the total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce, which formula shall be designed to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the school district providing the educational services and, if different, the school district that is responsible to pay tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the district providing the educational services to the child. (5) In the case of a child to whom division (B)(4) of this section applies, and except as otherwise provided in division (C)(5)(f) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the home or facility for educational services provided to the child by the school district in which the child's parent resides according to the following: (a) The total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce. The department shall design the formula to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the home or facility providing the educational services and the district that is responsible to pay the tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the home or facility providing the educational services to the child. (b) The district responsible to pay tuition shall continue to report the child in its enrollment for purposes of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If the parent's residence changes to a different school district while the child resides in the home or facility, the department of education and workforce may re-determine the school district responsible for tuition based on evidence provided by the district currently responsible for tuition. (d) Upon a child's discharge from the home or facility, the home or facility shall immediately notify the district where the child's parent resides and the department of education and workforce. The notification shall include a certified transcript of all coursework completed by the child while residing in the home or facility. The district where the child's parent resides shall accept all coursework completed by the child while in the home or facility and shall award credit for that coursework in accordance with district policy. (e) Following discharge from the home or facility and return to the parent's residence, high school students shall meet requirements under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code in order to qualify for a high school diploma that are no more stringent than those that apply to students who enroll into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving a home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (f) If the child is provided educational services by a chartered nonpublic school while residing in a home and the child has been awarded a scholarship under a state scholarship program, as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, no school district shall be responsible for paying tuition under division (C)(5) of this section. (D) Tuition required to be paid under divisions (C)(2) and (3)(a) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. Tuition required to be paid under division (C)(3)(b) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.081 of the Revised Code. If a home fails to pay the tuition required by division (C)(3)(b) of this section, the board of education providing the education may recover in a civil action the tuition and the expenses incurred in prosecuting the action, including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees. If the prosecuting attorney or city director of law represents the board in such action, costs and reasonable attorney's fees awarded by the court, based upon the prosecuting attorney's, director's, or one of their designee's time spent preparing and presenting the case, shall be deposited in the county or city general fund. (E) A board of education may enroll a child free of any tuition obligation for a period not to exceed sixty days, on the sworn statement of an adult resident of the district that the resident has initiated legal proceedings for custody of the child. (F) In the case of any individual entitled to attend school under this division, no tuition shall be charged by the school district of attendance and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the individual's attendance. Notwithstanding division (B), (C), or (E) of this section: (1) All persons at least eighteen but under twenty-two years of age who live apart from their parents, support themselves by their own labor, and have not successfully completed the high school curriculum or the individualized education program developed for the person by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code, are entitled to attend school in the district in which they reside. (2) Any child under eighteen years of age who is married is entitled to attend school in the child's district of residence. (3) A child is entitled to attend school in the district in which either of the child's parents is employed if the child has a medical condition that may require emergency medical attention. The parent of a child entitled to attend school under division (F)(3) of this section shall submit to the board of education of the district in which the parent is employed a statement from the child's physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner certifying that the child's medical condition may require emergency medical attention. The statement shall be supported by such other evidence as the board may require. (4) Any child residing with a person other than the child's parent is entitled, for a period not to exceed twelve months, to attend school in the district in which that person resides if the child's parent files an affidavit with the superintendent of the district in which the person with whom the child is living resides stating all of the following: (a) That the parent is serving outside of the state in the armed services of the United States; (b) That the parent intends to reside in the district upon returning to this state; (c) The name and address of the person with whom the child is living while the parent is outside the state. (5) Any child under the age of twenty-two years who, after the death of a parent, resides in a school district other than the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death is entitled to continue to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death for the remainder of the school year, subject to approval of that district board. (6) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a parent who is having a new house built in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the new house is being built. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being built, and stating the parent's intention to reside there upon its completion; (b) A statement from the builder confirming that a new house is being built for the parent and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. (7) A child under the age of twenty-two years residing with a parent who has a contract to purchase a house in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing and who is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan for the purchase of such house is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the house is being purchased. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being purchased, and stating the parent's intent to reside there; (b) A statement from a real estate broker or bank officer confirming that the parent has a contract to purchase the house, that the parent is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan, and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. The district superintendent shall establish a period of time not to exceed ninety days during which the child entitled to attend school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section may attend without tuition obligation. A student attending a school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section shall be eligible to participate in interscholastic athletics under the auspices of that school, provided the board of education of the school district where the student's parent resides, by a formal action, releases the student to participate in interscholastic athletics at the school where the student is attending, and provided the student receives any authorization required by a public agency or private organization of which the school district is a member exercising authority over interscholastic sports. (8) A child whose parent is a full-time employee of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or of an educational service center, may be admitted to the schools of the district where the child's parent is employed, or in the case of a child whose parent is employed by an educational service center, in the district that serves the location where the parent's job is primarily located, provided the district board of education establishes such an admission policy by resolution adopted by a majority of its members. Any such policy shall take effect on the first day of the school year and the effective date of any amendment or repeal may not be prior to the first day of the subsequent school year. The policy shall be uniformly applied to all such children and shall provide for the admission of any such child upon request of the parent. No child may be admitted under this policy after the first day of classes of any school year. (9) A child who is with the child's parent under the care of a shelter for victims of domestic violence, as defined in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code, is entitled to attend school free in the district in which the child is with the child's parent, and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the child's attendance in that school district. The enrollment of a child in a school district under this division shall not be denied due to a delay in the school district's receipt of any records required under section 3313.672 of the Revised Code or any other records required for enrollment. Any days of attendance and any credits earned by a child while enrolled in a school district under this division shall be transferred to and accepted by any school district in which the child subsequently enrolls. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with this division. (10) Any child under the age of twenty-two years whose parent has moved out of the school district after the commencement of classes in the child's senior year of high school is entitled, subject to the approval of that district board, to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parental move for the remainder of the school year and for one additional semester or equivalent term. A district board may also adopt a policy specifying extenuating circumstances under which a student may continue to attend school under division (F)(10) of this section for an additional period of time in order to successfully complete the high school curriculum for the individualized education program developed for the student by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code. (11) As used in this division, "grandparent" means a parent of a parent of a child. A child under the age of twenty-two years who is in the custody of the child's parent, resides with a grandparent, and does not require special education is entitled to attend the schools of the district in which the child's grandparent resides, provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, the board of education of the school district in which the child's grandparent resides and the board of education of the school district in which the child's parent resides enter into a written agreement specifying that good cause exists for such attendance, describing the nature of this good cause, and consenting to such attendance. In lieu of a consent form signed by a parent, a board of education may request the grandparent of a child attending school in the district in which the grandparent resides pursuant to division (F)(11) of this section to complete any consent form required by the district, including any authorization required by sections 3313.712, 3313.713, 3313.716, and 3313.718 of the Revised Code. Upon request, the grandparent shall complete any consent form required by the district. A school district shall not incur any liability solely because of its receipt of a consent form from a grandparent in lieu of a parent. Division (F)(11) of this section does not create, and shall not be construed as creating, a new cause of action or substantive legal right against a school district, a member of a board of education, or an employee of a school district. This section does not affect, and shall not be construed as affecting, any immunities from defenses to tort liability created or recognized by Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code for a school district, member, or employee. (12) A child under the age of twenty-two years is entitled to attend school in a school district other than the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, both of the following occur: (a) The superintendent of the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section contacts the superintendent of another district for purposes of this division; (b) The superintendents of both districts enter into a written agreement that consents to the attendance and specifies that the purpose of such attendance is to protect the student's physical or mental well-being or to deal with other extenuating circumstances deemed appropriate by the superintendents. While an agreement is in effect under this division for a student who is not receiving special education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code and notwithstanding Chapter 3327. of the Revised Code, the board of education of neither school district involved in the agreement is required to provide transportation for the student to and from the school where the student attends. A student attending a school of a district pursuant to this division shall be allowed to participate in all student activities, including interscholastic athletics, at the school where the student is attending on the same basis as any student who has always attended the schools of that district while of compulsory school age. (13) All school districts shall comply with the "McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act," 42 U.S.C.A. 11431 et seq., for the education of homeless children. Each city, local, and exempted village school district shall comply with the requirements of that act governing the provision of a free, appropriate public education, including public preschool, to each homeless child. When a child loses permanent housing and becomes a homeless person, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11481(5), or when a child who is such a homeless person changes temporary living arrangements, the child's parent or guardian shall have the option of enrolling the child in either of the following: (a) The child's school of origin, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11432(g)(3)(C); (b) The school that is operated by the school district in which the shelter where the child currently resides is located and that serves the geographic area in which the shelter is located. (14) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a person other than the child's parent is entitled to attend school in the school district in which that person resides if both of the following apply: (a) That person has been appointed, through a military power of attorney executed under section 574(a) of the "National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1994," 107 Stat. 1674 (1993), 10 U.S.C. 1044b, or through a comparable document necessary to complete a family care plan, as the parent's agent for the care, custody, and control of the child while the parent is on active duty as a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States or because the parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is on a duty assignment away from the parent's residence. (b) The military power of attorney or comparable document includes at least the authority to enroll the child in school. The entitlement to attend school in the district in which the parent's agent under the military power of attorney or comparable document resides applies until the end of the school year in which the military power of attorney or comparable document expires. (G) A board of education, after approving admission, may waive tuition for students who will temporarily reside in the district and who are either of the following: (1) Residents or domiciliaries of a foreign nation who request admission as foreign exchange students; (2) Residents or domiciliaries of the United States but not of Ohio who request admission as participants in an exchange program operated by a student exchange organization. (H) Pursuant to sections 3311.211, 3313.90, 3319.01, 3323.04, 3327.04, and 3327.06 of the Revised Code, a child may attend school or participate in a special education program in a school district other than in the district where the child is entitled to attend school under division (B) of this section. (I)(1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, a child under twenty-two years of age may attend school in the school district in which the child, at the end of the first full week of October of the school year, was entitled to attend school as otherwise provided under this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, if at that time the child was enrolled in the schools of the district but since that time the child or the child's parent has relocated to a new address located outside of that school district and within the same county as the child's or parent's address immediately prior to the relocation. The child may continue to attend school in the district, and at the school to which the child was assigned at the end of the first full week of October of the current school year, for the balance of the school year. Division (I)(1) of this section applies only if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The board of education of the school district in which the child was entitled to attend school at the end of the first full week in October and of the district to which the child or child's parent has relocated each has adopted a policy to enroll children described in division (I)(1) of this section. (b) The child's parent provides written notification of the relocation outside of the school district to the superintendent of each of the two school districts. (2) At the beginning of the school year following the school year in which the child or the child's parent relocated outside of the school district as described in division (I)(1) of this section, the child is not entitled to attend school in the school district under that division. (3) Any person or entity owing tuition to the school district on behalf of the child at the end of the first full week in October, as provided in division (C) of this section, shall continue to owe such tuition to the district for the child's attendance under division (I)(1) of this section for the lesser of the balance of the school year or the balance of the time that the child attends school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section. (4) A pupil who may attend school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section shall be entitled to transportation services pursuant to an agreement between the district and the district in which the child or child's parent has relocated unless the districts have not entered into such agreement, in which case the child shall be entitled to transportation services in the same manner as a pupil attending school in the district under interdistrict open enrollment as described in division (E) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the district has adopted an open enrollment policy as described in division (B)(1)(b) or (c) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code. (J) This division does not apply to a child receiving special education. A school district required to pay tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount deducted under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. A school district entitled to receive tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount credited under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. If the tuition rate credited to the district of attendance exceeds the rate deducted from the district required to pay tuition, the department of education and workforce shall pay the district of attendance the difference from amounts deducted from all districts' payments under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code but not credited to other school districts under such division and from appropriations made for such purpose. The treasurer of each school district shall, by the fifteenth day of January and July, furnish the director of education and workforce a report of the names of each child who attended the district's schools under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code during the preceding six calendar months, the duration of the attendance of those children, the school district responsible for tuition on behalf of the child, and any other information that the director requires. Upon receipt of the report the director, pursuant to division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, shall deduct each district's tuition obligations under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code and pay to the district of attendance that amount plus any amount required to be paid by the state. (K) In the event of a disagreement, the director of education and workforce shall determine the school district in which the parent resides. (L) Nothing in this section requires or authorizes, or shall be construed to require or authorize, the admission to a public school in this state of a pupil who has been permanently excluded from public school attendance by the director pursuant to sections 3301.121 and 3313.662 of the Revised Code. (M) In accordance with division (B)(1) of this section, a child whose parent is a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States and is called to active duty, or a child whose parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, may continue to attend school in the district in which the child's parent lived before being called to active duty or ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, as long as the child's parent continues to be a resident of that district, and regardless of where the child lives as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. However, the district is not responsible for providing transportation for the child if the child lives outside of the district as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. Sec. 3313.661. (A) Subject to the limitations set forth in section 3313.668 of the Revised Code, the board of education of each city, exempted village, and local school district shall adopt a policy regarding suspension, expulsion, removal, and permanent exclusion that specifies the types of misconduct for which a pupil may be suspended, expelled, or removed. The types of misconduct may include misconduct by a pupil that occurs off of property owned or controlled by the district but that is connected to activities or incidents that have occurred on property owned or controlled by that district and misconduct by a pupil that, regardless of where it occurs, is directed at a district official or employee, or the property of such official or employee. The policy shall specify the reasons for which the superintendent of the district may reduce the expulsion requirement in division (B)(2) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code. If a board of education adopts a resolution pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code, the policy shall define the term "knife capable of causing serious bodily injury" or "firearm," as applicable, for purposes of expulsion under that resolution and shall specify any reasons for which the superintendent of the district may reduce any required expulsion period on a case-by-case basis. If a board of education adopts a resolution pursuant to division (B)(4), (5), or (6) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code, the policy shall specify any reasons for which the superintendent of the district may reduce any expulsion period on a case-by-case basis. The policy also shall set forth the acts listed in section 3313.662 of the Revised Code for which a pupil may be permanently excluded. The policy adopted under this division shall specify the date and manner by which a pupil or a pupil's parent, guardian, or custodian may notify the board of the pupil's, parent's, guardian's, or custodian's intent to appeal an expulsion or suspension to the board or its designee pursuant to division (E) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code. In the case of any expulsion, the policy shall not specify a date that is less than fourteen days after the date of the notice provided to the pupil or the pupil's parent, guardian, or custodian under division (D) of that section. A copy of the policy shall be posted in a central location in the school or on the district's web site and made available to pupils upon request. No pupil shall be suspended, expelled, or removed except in accordance with the policy adopted by the board of education of the school district in which the pupil attends school, and no pupil shall be permanently excluded except in accordance with sections 3301.121 and 3313.662 of the Revised Code. (B) A board of education may establish a program and adopt guidelines under which a superintendent may require a pupil to perform community service in conjunction with a suspension or expulsion imposed under section 3313.66 of the Revised Code or in place of a suspension or expulsion imposed under section 3313.66 of the Revised Code except for an expulsion imposed pursuant to division (B)(2) of that section. If a board adopts guidelines under this division, they shall permit, except with regard to an expulsion pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code, a superintendent to impose a community service requirement beyond the end of the school year in lieu of applying an expulsion into the following school year. Any guidelines adopted shall be included in the policy adopted under this section. (C) The written policy of each board of education that is adopted pursuant to section 3313.20 of the Revised Code shall be posted in a central location in each school that is subject to the policy and shall be made available to pupils upon request. (D) Except as described in division (B) of section 3313.668 of the Revised Code, any policy, program, or guideline adopted by a board of education under this section with regard to suspensions or expulsions pursuant to division (A) or (B) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code shall apply to any student, whether or not the student is enrolled in the district, attending or otherwise participating in any curricular program provided in a school operated by the board or provided on any other property owned or controlled by the board. (E) If a board of education adopts a resolution pursuant to division (B)(6) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code, the board shall establish guidelines for appropriate conditions that the superintendent may develop pursuant to division (B)(6) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code. (F) The district superintendent shall develop a list of alternative educational options for pupils who are expelled under division (B)(6) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code. (G) As used in this section, "permanently exclude" and "permanent exclusion" have the same meanings as in section 3313.662 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.663. (A) The board of education of a city, exempted village, local, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district may adopt a policy requiring the parent or guardian of any student who is suspended or expelled by the district under section 3313.66 of the Revised Code to attend a parental education or training program provided by the district. (B) The board of education of a city, exempted village, local, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district may adopt a policy requiring the parent or guardian of any student of the district who is truant or habitually absent from school to attend a parental education or training program provided by the district. The policy shall specify what constitutes truancy and habitual absence for purposes of the policy. (C) If a board of education adopts a policy under this section, the board shall post the policy in a central location in each school building of the district or on the district's web site and make it available to students and their parents or guardians upon request. Sec. 3313.664. The board of education of a city, exempted village, local, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district may adopt a policy authorizing the district superintendent, other district administrative personnel, or personnel employed by the district to direct, supervise, or coach a pupil activity program as provided in the policy to prohibit a student from participating in any particular or all extracurricular activities of the district or a school of the district for a period of time as provided in the policy. If a board of education adopts a policy under this section, the board shall post the policy in a central location in each school building of the district or on the district's web site and make it available to students upon request. Sec. 3313.6611. Each local, city, exempted village, joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314., and STEM school established under Chapter 3326., and college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code may designate a student-led violence prevention club for each school building in the district or school serving grades six through twelve. If created, each club shall do the following: (A) Be open to all members of the student body; (B) Have at least one identified adult advisor; (C) Implement and sustain suicide and violence prevention and social inclusion training and awareness activities in a manner consistent with section 3301.221 of the Revised Code; (D) Foster opportunities for student leadership development. Sec. 3313.7112. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Board of education" means a board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district. (2) "Governing authority" means a governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school. (3) "Licensed health care professional" means any of the following: (a) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (b) A registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code; (c) A physician assistant licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (4) "Local health department" means a department operated by a board of health of a city or general health district or the authority having the duties of a board of health as described in section 3709.05 of the Revised Code. (5) "School employee" or "employee" means either of the following: (a) A person employed by a board of education or governing authority; (b) A licensed health care professional employed by or under contract with a local health department who is assigned to a school in a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district or a chartered nonpublic school. (6) "Treating practitioner" means any of the following who has primary responsibility for treating a student's diabetes and has been identified as such by the student's parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student or, if the student is at least eighteen years of age, by the student: (a) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (b) An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a current, valid license to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code and is designated as a clinical nurse specialist or certified nurse practitioner in accordance with section 4723.42 of the Revised Code; (c) A physician assistant who holds a license issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority. (7) "504 plan" means a plan based on an evaluation conducted in accordance with section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794, as amended. (B)(1) Each board of education or governing authority shall ensure that each student enrolled in the school district or chartered nonpublic school who has diabetes receives appropriate and needed diabetes care in accordance with an order signed by the student's treating practitioner. The diabetes care to be provided includes any of the following: (a) Checking and recording blood glucose levels and ketone levels or assisting the student with checking and recording these levels; (b) Responding to blood glucose levels that are outside of the student's target range; (c) In the case of severe hypoglycemia, administering glucagon and other emergency treatments as prescribed; (d) Administering insulin or assisting the student in self-administering insulin through the insulin delivery system the student uses; (e) Providing oral diabetes medications; (f) Understanding recommended schedules and food intake for meals and snacks in order to calculate medication dosages pursuant to the order of the student's treating practitioner; (g) Following the treating practitioner's instructions regarding meals, snacks, and physical activity; (h) Administering diabetes medication, as long as the conditions prescribed in division (C) of this section are satisfied. (2) Not later than fourteen days after receipt of an order signed by the treating practitioner of a student with diabetes, the board of education or governing authority shall inform the student's parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student that the student may be entitled to a 504 plan regarding the student's diabetes. The department of education and workforce shall develop a 504 plan information sheet for use by a board of education or governing authority when informing a student's parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student that the student may be entitled to a 504 plan regarding the student's diabetes. (C) Notwithstanding division (B) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code or any other provision of the Revised Code, diabetes medication may be administered under this section by a school nurse or, in the absence of a school nurse, a school employee who is trained in diabetes care under division (E) of this section. Medication administration may be provided under this section only when the conditions prescribed in division (C) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code are satisfied. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code, medication that is to be administered under this section may be kept in an easily accessible location. (D)(1) The department of education and workforce shall adopt nationally recognized guidelines, as determined by the department, for the training of school employees in diabetes care for students. In doing so, the department shall consult with the department of health, the American diabetes association, and the Ohio school nurses association. The department may consult with any other organizations as determined appropriate by the department. (2) The guidelines shall address all of the following issues: (a) Recognizing the symptoms of hypoglycemia and hyperglycemia; (b) The appropriate treatment for a student who exhibits the symptoms of hypoglycemia or hyperglycemia; (c) Recognizing situations that require the provision of emergency medical assistance to a student; (d) Understanding the appropriate treatment for a student, based on an order issued by the student's treating practitioner, if the student's blood glucose level is not within the target range indicated by the order; (e) Understanding the instructions in an order issued by a student's treating practitioner concerning necessary medications; (f) Performing blood glucose and ketone tests for a student in accordance with an order issued by the student's treating practitioner and recording the results of those tests; (g) Administering insulin, glucagon, or other medication to a student in accordance with an order issued by the student's treating practitioner and recording the results of the administration; (h) Understanding the relationship between the diet recommended in an order issued by a student's treating practitioner and actions that may be taken if the recommended diet is not followed. (E)(1) To ensure that a student with diabetes receives the diabetes care specified in division (B) of this section, a board of education or governing authority may provide training that complies with the guidelines developed under division (D) of this section to a school employee at each school attended by a student with diabetes. With respect to any training provided, all of the following apply: (a) The training shall be coordinated by a school nurse or, if the school does not employ a school nurse, a licensed health care professional with expertise in diabetes who is approved by the school to provide the training. (b) The training shall take place prior to the beginning of each school year or, as needed, not later than fourteen days after receipt by the board of education or governing authority of an order signed by the treating practitioner of a student with diabetes. (c) On completion of the training, the board of education or governing authority, in a manner it determines, shall determine whether each employee trained is competent to provide diabetes care. (d) The school nurse or approved licensed health care professional with expertise in diabetes care shall promptly provide all necessary follow-up training and supervision to an employee who receives training. (2) The principal of a school attended by a student with diabetes or another school official authorized to act on behalf of the principal may distribute a written notice to each employee containing all of the following: (a) A statement that the school is required to provide diabetes care to a student with diabetes and is seeking employees who are willing to be trained to provide that care; (b) A description of the tasks to be performed; (c) A statement that participation is voluntary and that the school district or governing authority will not take action against an employee who does not agree to provide diabetes care; (d) A statement that training will be provided by a licensed health care professional to an employee who agrees to provide care; (e) A statement that a trained employee is immune from liability under division (J) of this section; (f) The name of the individual who should be contacted if an employee is interested in providing diabetes care. (3) No employee of a board of education or governing authority shall be subject to a penalty or disciplinary action under school or district policies for refusing to volunteer to be trained in diabetes care. (4) No board or governing authority shall discourage employees from agreeing to provide diabetes care under this section. (F) A board of education or governing authority may provide training in the recognition of hypoglycemia and hyperglycemia and actions to take in response to emergency situations involving these conditions to both of the following: (1) A school employee who has primary responsibility for supervising a student with diabetes during some portion of the school day; (2) A bus driver employed by a school district or chartered nonpublic school responsible for the transportation of a student with diabetes. (G) A student with diabetes shall be permitted to attend the school the student would otherwise attend if the student did not have diabetes and the diabetes care specified in division (B) of this section shall be provided at the school. A board of education or governing authority shall not restrict a student who has diabetes from attending the school on the basis that the student has diabetes, that the school does not have a full-time school nurse, or that the school does not have an employee trained in diabetes care. The school shall not require or pressure a parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of a student to provide diabetes care for the student with diabetes at school or school-related activities. (H)(1) Notwithstanding section 3313.713 of the Revised Code or any policy adopted under that section and except as provided in division (H)(2) of this section, on written request of the parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of a student and authorization by the student's treating practitioner, a student with diabetes shall be permitted during regular school hours and school-sponsored activities to attend to the care and management of the student's diabetes in accordance with the order issued by the student's treating practitioner if the student's treating practitioner determines that the student is capable of performing diabetes care tasks. The student shall be permitted to perform diabetes care tasks in a classroom, in any area of the school or school grounds, and at any school-related activity, and to possess on the student's self at all times all necessary supplies and equipment to perform these tasks. If the student or the parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student so requests, the student shall have access to a private area for performing diabetes care tasks. (2) If the student performs any diabetes care tasks or uses medical equipment for purposes other than the student's own care, the board of education or governing authority may revoke the student's permission to attend to the care and management of the student's diabetes. (I)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, a licensed health care professional shall be permitted to provide training to a school employee under division (E) of this section or to supervise the employee in performing diabetes care tasks. (2) Nothing in this section diminishes the rights of eligible students or the obligations of school districts or governing authorities under the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act," 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act," 29 U.S.C. 794, or the "Americans with Disabilities Act," 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq. (J)(1) A school or school district, a member of a board or governing authority, or a district or school employee is not liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property allegedly arising from providing care or performing duties under this section unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a school or school district, member of a board of education or governing authority, or district or school employee may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. or any other provision of the Revised Code or under the common law of this state. (2) A school employee shall not be subject to disciplinary action under school or district policies for providing care or performing duties under this section. (3) A school nurse or other licensed health care professional shall be immune from disciplinary action by the board of nursing or any other regulatory board for providing care or performing duties under this section if the care provided or duties performed are consistent with applicable professional standards. (K)(1) Not later than the last day of December of each year, a board of education or governing authority shall report to the department of education and workforce both of the following: (a) The number of students with diabetes enrolled in the school district or chartered nonpublic school during the previous school year; (b) The number of errors associated with the administration of diabetes medication to students with diabetes during the previous school year. (2) Not later than the last day of March of each year, the department shall issue a report summarizing the information received by the department under division (K)(1) of this section for the previous school year. The department shall make the report available on its internet web site. Sec. 3313.7118. Each public school, as defined in section 3301.28 of the Revised Code, school district, other public school as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, educational service center, and chartered nonpublic school that serves elementary school students shall provide either an electronic or paper copy of the informational materials described in section 3707.61 of the Revised Code to each student's parent or guardian on the student's enrollment in elementary school. Sec. 3313.753. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Electronic communications device" means any device that is powered by batteries or electricity and that is capable of receiving, transmitting, or receiving and transmitting communications between two or more persons or a communication from or to a person. (2) "School" means any school that is operated by a board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district. (3) "School building" means any building in which any of the instruction, extracurricular activities, or training provided by a school is conducted. (4) "School grounds or premises" means either of the following: (a) The parcel of real property on which any school building is situated; (b) Any other parcel of real property that is owned or leased by a board of education and on which some of the instruction, extracurricular activities, or training of the school is conducted. (B) The board of education of any city, exempted village, local, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district may adopt a policy prohibiting students from carrying an electronic communications device in any school building or on any school grounds or premises of the district. The policy may provide for exceptions to this prohibition as specified in the policy. The policy shall specify any disciplinary measures that will be taken for violation of this prohibition. If a board of education adopts a policy under this division, the board shall post the policy in a central location in each school building or on the district's web site and make it available to students and parents upon request. (C)(1) Not later than January 1, 2026, each school district board of education shall adopt a policy governing the use of cellular telephones by students during school hours. The policy shall prohibit all cellular telephone use by students during the instructional day, except as described in division (C)(2) of this section or if permitted under the building's comprehensive emergency management plan adopted under section 5502.262 of the Revised Code. (2) If determined appropriate by the district board, or if included in a student's individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code or plan developed under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794, students may use cellular telephones or other electronic communications devices for student learning or to monitor or address a health concern. A district board shall permit a student to use a cellular telephone or other electronic communications device to monitor or address a health concern if the board receives a written statement from the student's physician requiring such use. (D) Any district board that adopts a policy that prohibits all cellular telephone use by students shall be considered to have met the requirements in division (C) of this section. (E) Any district board that adopts a policy that meets the requirements prescribed in division (C) of this section prior to the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025, shall be considered to have met the requirement to adopt a policy under this section. (F) Each district board that adopts a policy under this section after the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025, shall do so at a public meeting of the board. (G) Each district board shall make any policy it adopts under this section publicly available and post it prominently on its publicly accessible web site, if it has one. Sec. 3313.814. (A) As used in this section and sections 3313.816 and 3313.817 of the Revised Code: (1) "A la carte item" means an individually priced food or beverage item that is available for sale to students through any of the following: (a) A school food service program; (b) A vending machine located on school property; (c) A store operated by the school, a student association, or other school-sponsored organization. "A la carte item" does not include any food or beverage item available for sale in connection with a school-sponsored fundraiser held outside of the regular school day, any other school-sponsored event held outside of the regular school day, or an interscholastic athletic event. "A la carte item" also does not include any food or beverage item that is part of a reimbursable meal and that is available for sale as an individually priced item in a serving portion of the same size as in the reimbursable meal, regardless of whether the food or beverage item is included in the reimbursable meal served on a particular school day. (2) "Added sweeteners" means any additives that enhance the sweetness of a beverage, including processed sugar. "Added sweeteners" do not include any natural sugars found in fruit juices that are a component of the beverage. (3) "Extended school day" means the period before and after the regular school day during which students participate in school-sponsored extracurricular activities, latchkey programs as defined in section 3313.207 of the Revised Code, or other academic or enrichment programs. (4) "Regular school day" means the period each school day between the designated arrival time for students and the end of the final instructional period. (5) "Reimbursable meal" means a meal that is provided to students through a school breakfast or lunch program established under the "National School Lunch Act," 60 Stat. 230 (1946), 42 U.S.C. 1751, as amended, and the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," 80 Stat. 885, 42 U.S.C. 1771, as amended, and that meets the criteria for reimbursement established by the United States department of agriculture. (6) "School food service program" means a school food service program operated under section 3313.81 or 3313.813 of the Revised Code. (B) Each school district board of education and each chartered nonpublic school governing authority shall adopt and enforce nutrition standards governing the types of food and beverages that may be sold on the premises of its schools, and specifying the time and place each type of food or beverage may be sold. (1) In adopting the standards, the board or governing authority shall do all of the following: (a) Consider the nutritional value of each food or beverage; (b) Consult with a dietitian licensed under Chapter 4759. of the Revised Code, a dietetic technician registered by the commission on dietetic registration, or a school nutrition specialist certified or credentialed by the school nutrition association. The person with whom the board or governing authority consults may be an employee of the board or governing authority, a person contracted by the board or governing authority, or a volunteer, provided the person meets the requirements of this division. (c) Consult the dietary guidelines for Americans jointly developed by the United States department of agriculture and the United States department of health and human services and, to the maximum extent possible, incorporate the guidelines into the standards. (2) No food or beverage may be sold on any school premises except in accordance with the standards adopted by the board or governing authority. (3) The standards shall comply with sections 3313.816 and 3313.817 of the Revised Code, but nothing in this section shall prohibit the standards from being more restrictive than otherwise required by those sections. (C) The nutrition standards adopted under this section shall prohibit the placement of vending machines in any classroom where students are provided instruction, unless the classroom also is used to serve students meals. This division does not apply to vending machines that sell only milk, reimbursable meals, or food and beverage items that are part of a reimbursable meal and are available for sale as individually priced items in serving portions of the same size as in the reimbursable meal. (D) Each board or governing authority shall designate staff to be responsible for ensuring that the school district or school meets the nutrition standards adopted under this section. The staff shall prepare an annual report regarding the district's or school's compliance with the standards and include it in the report to the department of education and workforce prescribed in section 3301.68 of the Revised Code. The board or governing authority annually shall schedule a presentation on the nutrition standards report at one of its regular meetings. Each district or school shall make copies of the nutrition standards report available to the public upon request. (E) The department of education and workforce shall formulate and adopt guidelines, which boards of education and chartered nonpublic schools may follow in enforcing and implementing this section. Sec. 3313.902. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Competency-based educational program" means any system of academic instruction, assessment, grading, and reporting in which individuals receive credit based on demonstrations and assessments of their learning rather than the amount of time they spend studying a subject. A competency-based educational program shall encourage accelerated learning among individuals who master academic materials quickly while providing additional instructional support time for individuals who need it. (2) "Eligible individual" means an individual who satisfies all of the following criteria: (a) The individual is at least eighteen years of age. (b) The individual is officially withdrawn from school. (c) The individual has not been awarded a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalence as defined in section 4109.06 of the Revised Code. (3) "Eligible provider" means a city, local, or exempted village school district that operates a dropout prevention and recovery program, the buckeye united school district operated by the department of youth services, the Ohio central school system established under section 5145.06 of the Revised Code, or a joint vocational school district that operates an adult education program. (4) "Ohio technical center" has the same meaning as in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code. (B) An eligible provider may establish a competency-based educational program that complies with standards adopted by the department of education and workforce and may enroll eligible individuals in the program for up to three consecutive school years for the purpose of earning a high school diploma. The provider shall establish a career plan for each individual enrolled in the program that specifies the individual's career goals and describes how the individual will demonstrate competency or earn course credits under division (C) of this section to earn a diploma and attain the individual's career goals. (C) Notwithstanding sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.613, 3313.614, 3313.618, and 3313.619 of the Revised Code, the department shall award a high school diploma to an individual enrolled in a program under division (B) of this section who meets either of the following conditions: (1) The individual demonstrates competency by completing at least three of the following activities, at least one of which shall be the activity described in division (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section: (a) Attaining a competency score as determined under division (B)(10)(B)(9) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on each of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of that section; (b) Attaining a workforce readiness score, as determined by the department, on the nationally recognized job skills assessment selected by the department under division (F) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (c) Obtaining an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, in a single career field that meet the criteria established under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma or earning an industry-recognized credential that is aligned to a technical education program provided by an Ohio technical center; (d) Earning a cumulative score of proficient or higher on three or more state technical assessments aligned with section 3313.903 of the Revised Code in a single career pathway; (e) Doing either of the following: (i) Completing a pre-apprenticeship program aligned with options established under section 3313.904 of the Revised Code in the individual's chosen career field and providing evidence of acceptance into a registered apprenticeship program in that career field; (ii) Completing an apprenticeship registered with the apprenticeship council established under section 4139.02 of the Revised Code in the individual's chosen career field. (f) Completing two hundred fifty hours of a work-based learning experience with evidence of positive evaluations; (g) Obtaining an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code. (2) The individual demonstrates competency by completing at least two of the activities described in divisions (C)(1)(a) to (g) of this section and earns course credits distributed as follows: (a) English language arts, four credits; (b) Mathematics, four credits. One credit may be a career-based mathematics course aligned to the individual's career plan developed under division (B) of this section. (c) Science, three credits; (d) Social studies, three credits; (e) Financial literacy, one-half credit. The one-half credit of financial literacy may be applied toward the number of mathematics or social studies credits required under division (C)(2) of this section. (D) An eligible provider shall report each individual enrolled in a program under division (B) of this section to the department. The department annually shall certify the enrollment and attendance of each individual reported under this division and shall pay the provider up to $7,500 for each such individual per school year, as determined by the department based on the extent of the individual's successful completion of the diploma requirements prescribed in division (C) of this section. (E) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, an eligible provider may request that the department allow an eligible individual to enroll in a program under division (B) of this section for more than three consecutive school years due to a hardship experienced by the individual that necessitates additional time to meet the diploma requirements prescribed in division (C) of this section. (F) An eligible individual shall not be assigned to classes or settings with individuals who are younger than eighteen years of age. (G) Each eligible provider shall contact each individual to whom a diploma is awarded under this section to collect data on the individual's career and educational outcomes at six months, twelve months, and eighteen months after the awarding of the diploma. At each time of contact, the provider shall request information regarding whether the individual is gainfully employed, participating in an apprenticeship, enrolled in postsecondary education, or serving in the military. The provider shall report the data collected to the department in the manner determined by the department. (H) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this section. The rules may include all of the following: (1) Standards for competency-based educational programs; (2) Standards for applying an individual's work or life experiences toward the requirements of division (C) of this section; (3) Requirements for determining the amount paid to providers under division (D) of this section; (4) Guidelines for approving or denying a hardship request made under division (E) of this section. Sec. 3314.016. This section applies to any entity that sponsors a community school, regardless of whether section 3314.021 or 3314.027 of the Revised Code exempts the entity from the requirement to be approved for sponsorship under divisions (A)(2) and (B)(1) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. The office of Ohio school sponsorship established under section 3314.029 of the Revised Code shall be rated under division (B) of this section, but divisions (A) and (C) of this section do not apply to the office. (A) An entity that sponsors a community school shall be permitted to enter into contracts under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code to sponsor additional community schools only if the entity meets all of the following criteria: (1) The entity is in compliance with all provisions of this chapter requiring sponsors of community schools to report data or information to the department of education and workforce. (2) The entity is not rated as "ineffective" under division (B)(5) of this section. (3) Except as set forth in sections 3314.021 and 3314.027 of the Revised Code, the entity has received approval from and entered into an agreement with the department pursuant to section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The department shall develop and implement an evaluation system that annually rates and assigns an overall rating to each entity that sponsors a community school. The department, not later than the first day of February of each year, shall post on the department's web site the framework for the evaluation system, including technical documentation that the department intends to use to rate sponsors for the next school year. The department shall solicit public comment on the evaluation system for thirty consecutive days. Not later than the first day of April of each year, the department shall compile and post on the department's web site all public comments that were received during the public comment period. The evaluation system shall be posted on the department's web site by the fifteenth day of July of each school year. Any changes to the evaluation system after that date shall take effect the following year. The evaluation system shall be based on the following components: (a) Academic performance of students enrolled in community schools sponsored by the same entity. The academic performance component shall be derived from the performance measures prescribed for the state report cards under section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, and shall be based on the performance of the schools for the school year for which the evaluation is conducted. In addition to the academic performance for a specific school year, the academic performance component shall also include year-to-year changes in the overall sponsor portfolio. For a community school for which no graded performance measures are applicable or available, the department shall use nonreport card performance measures specified in the contract between the community school and the sponsor under division (A)(4) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (b) Adherence by a sponsor to the quality practices prescribed by the department under division (B)(3) of this section. (c) Compliance with all applicable laws and administrative rules by an entity that sponsors a community school. Under the evaluation system prescribed under division (B)(1) of this section, the department shall not assign an overall rating of "ineffective" or lower to an entity that sponsors a community school solely because that entity received no points on one of the components prescribed under that division. (2) In calculating an academic performance component, the department shall exclude all community schools that have been in operation for not more than two full school years, all community schools whose contracts were not renewed or terminated by the sponsor pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code before the evaluation, and all community schools described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. However, the academic performance of the community schools described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code shall be reported, but shall not be used as a factor when determining a sponsoring entity's rating under this section. (3) The department, in consultation with entities that sponsor community schools, shall prescribe quality practices for community school sponsors and develop an instrument to measure adherence to those quality practices. The quality practices shall be based on standards developed by the national association of charter school authorizers or any other nationally organized community school organization. (4) The director of education and workforce shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing standards for measuring compliance with applicable laws and rules under division (B)(1)(c) of this section. (5) The department annually shall rate all entities that sponsor community schools as either "exemplary," "effective," "ineffective," or "poor," based on the components prescribed by division (B) of this section, where each component is weighted equally. A separate rating shall be given by the department for each component of the evaluation system. The department shall publish the ratings between the first day of October and the fifteenth day of November. Prior to the publication of the final ratings, the department shall designate and provide notice of a period of at least ten business days during which each sponsor may review the information used by the department to determine the sponsor's rating on the components prescribed by division (B)(1) of this section. If the sponsor believes there is an error in the department's evaluation, the sponsor may request adjustments to the rating of any of those components based on documentation previously submitted as part of an evaluation. The sponsor shall provide to the department any necessary evidence or information to support the requested adjustments. The department shall review the evidence and information, determine whether an adjustment is valid, and promptly notify the sponsor of its determination and reasons. If any adjustments to the data could result in a change to the rating on the applicable component or to the overall rating, the department shall recalculate the ratings prior to publication. The department shall provide training on an annual basis regarding the evaluation system prescribed under this section. The training shall, at a minimum, describe methodology, timelines, and data required for the evaluation system. The first training session shall occur not later than March 2, 2016. Beginning in 2018, the training shall be made available to each entity that sponsors a community school by the fifteenth day of July of each year and shall include guidance on any changes made to the evaluation system. (6)(a) Entities with an overall rating of "exemplary" may take advantage of the following incentives: (i) Renewal of the written agreement with the department, not to exceed ten years, provided that the entity consents to continued evaluation of adherence to quality practices as described in division (B)(1)(b) of this section; (ii) The ability to extend the term of the contract between the sponsoring entity and the community school beyond the term described in the written agreement with the department; (iii) An exemption from the preliminary agreement and contract adoption and execution deadline requirements prescribed in division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code; (iv) An exemption from the automatic contract expiration requirement, should a new community school fail to open by the thirtieth day of September of the calendar year in which the community school contract is executed; (v) No limit on the number of community schools the entity may sponsor; (vi) No territorial restrictions on sponsorship. An entity may continue to sponsor any community schools with which it entered into agreements under division (B)(6)(a)(v) or (vi) of this section while rated "exemplary," notwithstanding the fact that the entity later receives a lower overall rating. (b) Entities with an overall rating of "exemplary" shall not be evaluated by the department for five full school years following the school year for which the entity received the "exemplary" rating. Entities with an overall rating of "effective" shall not be evaluated by the department for three full school years following the school year for which the entity received the "effective" rating. (c)(i) Entities that receive an overall rating of "ineffective" shall be prohibited from sponsoring any new or additional community schools during the time in which the sponsor is rated as "ineffective" and shall be subject to a quality improvement plan based on correcting the deficiencies that led to the "ineffective" rating, with timelines and benchmarks that have been established by the department. (ii) Entities that receive an overall rating of "ineffective" on their three most recent ratings shall have all sponsorship authority revoked. Within thirty days after receiving its third rating of "ineffective," the entity may appeal the revocation of its sponsorship authority to the director, who shall appoint an independent hearing officer to conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The hearing shall be conducted within thirty days after receipt of the notice of appeal. Within forty-five days after the hearing is completed, the director shall determine whether the revocation is appropriate based on the hearing conducted by the independent hearing officer, and if determined appropriate, the revocation shall be confirmed. (d) Entities that receive an overall rating of "poor" shall have all sponsorship authority revoked. Within thirty days after receiving a rating of "poor," the entity may appeal the revocation of its sponsorship authority to the director, who shall appoint an independent hearing officer to conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The hearing shall be conducted within thirty days after receipt of the notice of appeal. Within forty-five days after the hearing is completed, the director shall determine whether the revocation is appropriate based on the hearing conducted by the independent hearing officer, and if determined appropriate, the revocation shall be confirmed. (7) For the 2014-2015 school year and each school year thereafter, student academic performance prescribed under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall include student academic performance data from dropout prevention and recovery community schools. (8) The department shall publish annually academic performance data for each sponsor in accordance with division (B)(1)(a) of this section, regardless of whether the sponsor is being evaluated under this section for that school year. (C) If the governing authority of a community school enters into a contract with a sponsor prior to the date on which the sponsor is prohibited from sponsoring additional schools under division (A) of this section and the school has not opened for operation as of that date, that contract shall be void and the school shall not open until the governing authority secures a new sponsor by entering into a contract with the new sponsor under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. However, the department's office of Ohio school sponsorship, established under section 3314.029 of the Revised Code, may assume the sponsorship of the school until the earlier of the expiration of two school years or until a new sponsor is secured by the school's governing authority. A community school sponsored by the department under this division shall not be included when calculating the maximum number of directly authorized community schools permitted under division (A)(3) of section 3314.029 of the Revised Code. (D) When an entity's authority to sponsor schools is revoked pursuant to division (B)(6)(c) or (d) of this section, the office of Ohio school sponsorship shall assume sponsorship of any schools with which the original sponsor has contracted for the remainder of that school year. The office may continue sponsoring those schools until the earlier of: (1) The expiration of two school years from the time that sponsorship is revoked; (2) When a new sponsor is secured by the governing authority pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. Any community school sponsored under this division shall not be counted for purposes of directly authorized community schools under division (A)(3) of section 3314.029 of the Revised Code. (E) The department shall recalculate the rating for the 2017-2018 school year for each sponsor of a community school that receives recalculated ratings pursuant to division (I) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.017. (A) The department of education and workforce shall prescribe by rules, adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, an academic performance rating and report card system that satisfies the requirements of this section for dropout prevention and recovery community schools, to be used in lieu of the system prescribed under sections 3302.03 and 3314.012 of the Revised Code beginning with the 2012-2013 school year. Each such school shall comply with the testing and reporting requirements of the system as prescribed by the department. (B) Nothing in this section shall at any time relieve a school from its obligations under the "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001" to make "adequate yearly progress," as both that act and that term are defined in section 3302.01 of the Revised Code, or a school's amenability to the provisions of section 3302.04 or 3302.041 of the Revised Code. The department shall continue to report each school's performance as required by the act and to enforce applicable sanctions under section 3302.04 or 3302.041 of the Revised Code. (C) The rules adopted by the department shall prescribe the following performance indicators for the rating and report card system required by this section: (1) Graduation rate for each of the following student cohorts: (a) The number of students who graduate in four years or less with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the graduating class; (b) The number of students who graduate in five years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate; (c) The number of students who graduate in six years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate; (d) The number of students who graduate in seven years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate; (e) The number of students who graduate in eight years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate. (2) The percentage of twelfth-grade students currently enrolled in the school who have attained the designated passing score on all of the state high school achievement assessments required under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or the cumulative performance score on the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, whichever applies, and other students enrolled in the school, regardless of grade level, who are within three months of their twenty-second birthday and have attained the designated passing score on all of the state high school achievement assessments or the cumulative performance score on the end-of-course examinations, whichever applies, by their twenty-second birthday; (3) Annual measurable objectives as defined in section 3302.01 of the Revised Code; (4) Growth in student achievement in reading, or mathematics, or both as measured by separate nationally norm-referenced assessments that have developed appropriate standards for students enrolled in dropout prevention and recovery programs, adopted or approved by the department. (D)(1) The department's rules shall prescribe the expected performance levels and benchmarks for each of the indicators prescribed by division (C) of this section based on the data gathered by the department under division (G)(F) of this section and simulations created by the department. Based on a school's level of attainment or nonattainment of the expected performance levels and benchmarks for each of the indicators, the department shall rate each school in one of the following categories: (a) Exceeds standards; (b) Meets standards; (c) Does not meet standards. (2) The department's rules shall establish all of the following: (a) Performance levels and benchmarks for the indicators described in divisions (C)(1) to (3) of this section; (b) Both of the following: (i) Performance levels and benchmarks for the indicator described in division (C)(4) of this section; (ii) Standards for awarding a dropout prevention and recovery community school an overall designation, which shall be calculated as follows: (I) Thirty per cent of the score shall be based on the indicators described in division (C)(1) of this section that are applicable to the school year for which the overall designation is granted. (II) Thirty per cent of the score shall be based on the indicators described in division (C)(4) of this section. (III) Twenty per cent of the score shall be based on the indicators described in division (C)(2) of this section. (IV) Twenty per cent of the score shall be based on the indicators described in division (C)(3) of this section. (3) If both of the indicators described in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section improve by ten per cent for two consecutive years, a school shall be rated not less than "meets standards." The rating and the relevant performance data for each school shall be posted on the department's web site, and a copy of the rating and data shall be provided to the governing authority of the community school. (E) The department annually shall issue a report card for each dropout prevention and recovery community school that includes all of the following performance measures, including a performance rating for each measure as described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section: (1) The graduation rates as described in division (C)(1) of this section; (2) The percentage of twelfth-grade students and other students who have attained a designated passing score on high school achievement assessments as described in division (C)(2) of this section; (3) Annual measurable objectives described in division (C)(3) of this section, including a performance rating as described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section; (4) Growth in annual student achievement in reading and mathematics as described in division (C)(4) of this section; (5) An overall performance designation for the school calculated under rules adopted under division (D)(2) of this section. The department shall also include student outcome data, including postsecondary credit earned, nationally recognized career or technical certification, military enlistment, job placement, attendance rate, and progress on closing achievement gaps for each school. This information shall not be included in the calculation of a school's performance rating. (F) Not later than the thirty-first day of July of each year, the department shall submit preliminary report card data for overall academic performance for each performance measure prescribed in division (E) of this section for each community school to which this section applies. (G) For the purposes of prescribing performance levels and benchmarks under division (D) of this section, the department shall gather and analyze data from prior school years for each dropout prevention and recovery community school. Each such school shall cooperate with the department. The department shall consult with stakeholder groups in performing its duties under this division. (H)(G) The department shall review the performance levels and benchmarks for performance indicators in the report card issued under this section and may revise them based on the data collected under division (G)(F) of this section. (I) For the purposes of division (F) of section 3314.351 of the Revised Code, the department shall recalculate the ratings for each school under division (E)(3) of this section for the 2017-2018 school year and calculate the ratings under that division for the 2018-2019 school year using the indicators prescribed by division (C) of this section, as it exists on and after July 18, 2019. Sec. 3314.02. (A) As used in this chapter: (1) "Sponsor" means the board of education of a school district or the governing board of an educational service center that agrees to the conversion of all or part of a school or building under division (B) of this section, or an entity listed in division (C)(1) of this section, which has been approved by the department of education and workforce to sponsor community schools or is exempted by section 3314.021 or 3314.027 of the Revised Code from obtaining approval, and with which the governing authority of a community school enters into a contract under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (2) "Pilot project area" means the school districts included in the territory of the former community school pilot project established by former Section 50.52 of Am. Sub. H.B. No. 215 of the 122nd general assembly. (3) "Challenged school district" means any of the following: (a) A school district that is part of the pilot project area; (b) A school district that meets one of the following conditions: (i) On March 22, 2013, the district was in a state of academic emergency or in a state of academic watch under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to March 22, 2013; (ii) For two of the 2012-2013, 2013-2014, 2014-2015, and 2015-2016 school years, the district received a grade of "D" or "F" for the performance index score and a grade of "F" for the value-added progress dimension under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (iii) For the 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, and 2020-2021 school years, the district has received an overall grade of "D" or "F" under division (C)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, or, for at least two of the three most recent school years, the district received a grade of "F" for the value-added progress dimension under division (C)(1)(e) of that section; (iv) For the 2021-2022 school year and for any school year thereafter, the district has received an overall performance rating of less than three stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, or, for at least two of the three most recent school years, the district received one star for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section. (c) A big eight school district; (d) A school district ranked in the lowest five per cent of school districts according to performance index score under section 3302.21 of the Revised Code. (4) "Big eight school district" means a school district that for fiscal year 1997 had both of the following: (a) A percentage of children residing in the district and participating in the predecessor of Ohio works first greater than thirty per cent, as reported pursuant to section 3317.10 of the Revised Code; (b) An average daily membership greater than twelve thousand, as reported pursuant to former division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (5)(4) "New start-up school" means a community school other than one created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building, as designated in the school's contract pursuant to division (A)(17) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (6)(5) "Urban school district" means one of the state's twenty-one urban school districts as defined in division (O) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to July 1, 1998. (7)(6) "Internet- or computer-based community school" means a community school established under this chapter in which the enrolled students work primarily from their residences on assignments in nonclassroom-based learning opportunities provided via an internet- or other computer-based instructional method that does not rely on regular classroom instruction or via comprehensive instructional methods that include internet-based, other computer-based, and noncomputer-based learning opportunities unless a student receives career-technical education under section 3314.086 of the Revised Code. A community school that operates mainly as an internet- or computer-based community school and provides career-technical education under section 3314.086 of the Revised Code shall be considered an internet- or computer-based community school, even if it provides some classroom-based instruction, so long as it provides instruction via the methods described in this division. (8)(7) "Operator" or "management company" means either of the following: (a) An individual or organization that manages the daily operations of a community school pursuant to a contract between the operator or management company and the school's governing authority; (b) A nonprofit organization that provides programmatic oversight and support to a community school under a contract with the school's governing authority and that retains the right to terminate its affiliation with the school if the school fails to meet the organization's quality standards. (9)(8) "Alliance municipal school district" has the same meaning as in section 3311.86 of the Revised Code. (10)(9) "Dropout prevention and recovery community school" means a community school that enrolls only students who are at least fourteen years of age and not older than twenty-one years of age and who, at the time of their initial enrollment, are at least one grade level behind their cohort age groups or experience crises that significantly interfere with their academic progress such that they are prevented from continuing their traditional educational programs. (B)(1) Any person or group of individuals may initially propose under this division the conversion of all or a portion of a public school to a community school. The proposal shall be made to the board of education of the city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district in which the public school is proposed to be converted. (2) Any person or group of individuals may initially propose under this division the conversion of all or a portion of a building operated by an educational service center to a community school. The proposal shall be made to the governing board of the service center. On or after July 1, 2017, except as provided in section 3314.027 of the Revised Code, any educational service center that sponsors a community school shall be approved by and enter into a written agreement with the department as described in section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (3) Upon receipt of a proposal, and after an agreement has been entered into pursuant to section 3314.015 of the Revised Code, a board may enter into a preliminary agreement with the person or group proposing the conversion of the public school or service center building, indicating the intention of the board to support the conversion to a community school. A proposing person or group that has a preliminary agreement under this division may proceed to finalize plans for the school, establish a governing authority for the school, and negotiate a contract with the board. Provided the proposing person or group adheres to the preliminary agreement and all provisions of this chapter, the board shall negotiate in good faith to enter into a contract in accordance with section 3314.03 of the Revised Code and division (C) of this section. (4) The sponsor of a conversion community school proposed to open in an alliance municipal school district shall be subject to approval by the department of education and workforce for sponsorship of that school using the criteria established under division (A) of section 3311.87 of the Revised Code. Division (B)(4) of this section does not apply to a sponsor that, on or before September 29, 2015, was exempted under section 3314.021 or 3314.027 of the Revised Code from the requirement to be approved for sponsorship under divisions (A)(2) and (B)(1) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (5) A school established in accordance with division (B) of this section that later enters into a sponsorship contract with an entity that is not a school district or educational service center shall, at the time of entering into the new contract, be deemed a community school established in accordance with division (C) of this section. (C)(1) Provided all other conditions of sponsorship and governance are satisfied, any person or group of individuals may propose under this division the establishment of a new start-up school regardless of the school's proposed location. The proposal may be made to any of the following entities: (a) The board of education of the district in which the school is proposed to be located; (b) The board of education of any joint vocational school district with territory in the county in which is located the majority of the territory of the district in which the school is proposed to be located; (c) The board of education of any other city, local, or exempted village school district having territory in the same county where the district in which the school is proposed to be located has the major portion of its territory; (d) The governing board of any educational service center, regardless of the location of the proposed school, may sponsor a new start-up school if all of the following are satisfied: (i) If applicable, it satisfies the requirements of division (E) of section 3311.86 of the Revised Code; (ii) It is approved to do so by the department; (iii) It enters into an agreement with the department under section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (e) A sponsoring authority designated by the board of trustees of any of the thirteen state universities listed in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code or the board of trustees itself as long as a mission of the proposed school to be specified in the contract under division (A)(2) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code and as approved by the department under division (B)(3) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code will be the practical demonstration of teaching methods, educational technology, or other teaching practices that are included in the curriculum of the university's teacher preparation program approved by the chancellor of higher education; (f) Any qualified tax-exempt entity under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as long as all of the following conditions are satisfied: (i) The entity has been in operation for at least five years prior to applying to be a community school sponsor. (ii) The entity has assets of at least five hundred thousand dollars and a demonstrated record of financial responsibility. (iii) The department has determined that the entity is an education-oriented entity under division (B)(4) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and the entity has a demonstrated record of successful implementation of educational programs. (iv) The entity is not a community school. (g) The mayor of a city in which the majority of the territory of a school district to which section 3311.60 of the Revised Code applies is located, regardless of whether that district has created the position of independent auditor as prescribed by that section. The mayor's sponsorship authority under this division is limited to community schools that are located in that school district. Such mayor may sponsor community schools only with the approval of the city council of that city, after establishing standards with which community schools sponsored by the mayor must comply, and after entering into a sponsor agreement with the department as prescribed under section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. The mayor shall establish the standards for community schools sponsored by the mayor not later than one hundred eighty days after July 15, 2013, and shall submit them to the department upon their establishment. The department shall approve the mayor to sponsor community schools in the district, upon receipt of an application by the mayor to do so. Not later than ninety days after the department's approval of the mayor as a community school sponsor, the department shall enter into the sponsor agreement with the mayor. Any entity described in division (C)(1) of this section may enter into a preliminary agreement pursuant to division (C)(2) of this section with the proposing person or group, provided that entity has been approved by and entered into a written agreement with the department pursuant to section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (2) A preliminary agreement indicates the intention of an entity described in division (C)(1) of this section to sponsor the community school. A proposing person or group that has such a preliminary agreement may proceed to finalize plans for the school, establish a governing authority as described in division (E) of this section for the school, and negotiate a contract with the entity. Provided the proposing person or group adheres to the preliminary agreement and all provisions of this chapter, the entity shall negotiate in good faith to enter into a contract in accordance with section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (3) A new start-up school that is established in a school district described in either division (A)(3)(b) or (d) of this section may continue in existence once the school district no longer meets the conditions described in either division, provided there is a valid contract between the school and a sponsor. (4) A copy of every preliminary agreement entered into under this division shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. (D) A majority vote of the board of a sponsoring entity and a majority vote of the members of the governing authority of a community school shall be required to adopt a contract and convert the public school or educational service center building to a community school or establish the new start-up school. Beginning September 29, 2005, adoption of the contract shall occur not later than the fifteenth day of March, and signing of the contract shall occur not later than the fifteenth day of May, prior to the school year in which the school will open. The governing authority shall notify the department of education and workforce when the contract has been signed. Subject to sections 3314.013 and 3314.016 of the Revised Code, an unlimited number of community schools may be established in any school district provided that a contract is entered into for each community school pursuant to this chapter. (E)(1) As used in this division, "immediate relatives" are limited to spouses, children, parents, grandparents, and siblings, as well as in-laws residing in the same household as the person serving on the governing authority. Each new start-up community school established under this chapter shall be under the direction of a governing authority which shall consist of a board of not less than five individuals. (2)(a) No person shall serve on the governing authority or operate the community school under contract with the governing authority under any of the following circumstances: (i) The person owes the state any money or is in a dispute over whether the person owes the state any money concerning the operation of a community school that has closed. (ii) The person would otherwise be subject to division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code with respect to refusal, limitation, or revocation of a license to teach, if the person were a licensed educator. (iii) The person has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of theft in office under section 2921.41 of the Revised Code, or has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of a substantially similar offense in another state. (b) No person shall serve on the governing authority or engage in the financial day-to-day management of the community school under contract with the governing authority unless and until that person has submitted to a criminal records check in the manner prescribed by section 3319.39 of the Revised Code. (c) Each sponsor of a community school shall annually verify that a finding for recovery has not been issued by the auditor of state against any individual or individuals who propose to create a community school or any member of the governing authority, the operator, or any employee of each community school with responsibility for fiscal operations or authorization to expend money on behalf of the school. (3) No person shall serve on the governing authorities of more than five start-up community schools at the same time unless both of the following apply: (a) The person serves in a volunteer capacity and receives no compensation under division (E)(5) of this section from any governing authority on which the person serves. (b) For any school that has an operator, the operator is a nonprofit organization. (4)(a) For a community school established under this chapter that is not sponsored by a school district or an educational service center, no present or former member, or immediate relative of a present or former member, of the governing authority shall be an owner, employee, or consultant of the community school's sponsor or operator, unless at least one year has elapsed since the conclusion of the person's membership on the governing authority. (b) For a community school established under this chapter that is sponsored by a school district or an educational service center, no present or former member, or immediate relative of a present or former member, of the governing authority shall: (i) Be an officer of the district board or service center governing board that serves as the community school's sponsor, unless at least one year has elapsed since the conclusion of the person's membership on the governing authority; (ii) Serve as an employee of, or a consultant for, the department, division, or section of the sponsoring district or service center that is directly responsible for sponsoring community schools, or have supervisory authority over such a department, division, or section, unless at least one year has elapsed since the conclusion of the person's membership on the governing authority. (5) The governing authority of a start-up or conversion community school may provide by resolution for the compensation of its members. However, no individual who serves on the governing authority of a start-up or conversion community school shall be compensated more than one hundred twenty-five dollars per meeting of that governing authority and no such individual shall be compensated more than a total amount of five thousand dollars per year for all governing authorities upon which the individual serves. Each member of the governing authority may be paid compensation for attendance at an approved training program, provided that such compensation shall not exceed sixty dollars a day for attendance at a training program three hours or less in length and one hundred twenty-five dollars a day for attendance at a training program longer than three hours in length. (6) No person who is the employee of a school district or educational service center shall serve on the governing authority of any community school sponsored by that school district or service center. (7) Each member of the governing authority of a community school shall annually file a disclosure statement setting forth the names of any immediate relatives or business associates employed by any of the following within the previous three years: (a) The sponsor or operator of that community school; (b) A school district or educational service center that has contracted with that community school; (c) A vendor that is or has engaged in business with that community school. (8) No person who is a member of a school district board of education shall serve on the governing authority of any community school. (F)(1) A new start-up school that is established prior to August 15, 2003, in an urban school district that is not also a big-eight school district may continue to operate after that date and the contract between the school's governing authority and the school's sponsor may be renewed, as provided under this chapter, after that date. (2) A community school that was established prior to June 29, 1999, and is located in a county contiguous to the pilot project area and in a school district that was not a challenged school district, as that term was defined in this section prior to the effective date of this amendment, may continue to operate after that date, provided the school complies with all provisions of this chapter. The contract between the school's governing authority and the school's sponsor may be renewed. (3) Any educational service center that, on June 30, 2007, sponsors a community school that is not located in a county within the territory of the service center or in a county contiguous to such county may continue to sponsor that community school on and after June 30, 2007, and may renew its contract with the school. (4) The department of education and workforce shall not restrict the establishment of a new start-up community school to those located in a challenged school district, as that term was defined in this section prior to the effective date of this amendment, as was required by this section prior to September 30, 2021. Sec. 3314.031. (A) Beginning March 31, 2016, the The department shall do the following: (1) Maintain and annually publish an accurate record of the names and identifying information of all entities that have entered into a contract with the governing authority of a community school to manage or operate that school; (2) Receive from the governing authority of each community school a copy of the contract between a governing authority and its operator. A copy of each contract shall be made available on the department's web site. (B) Not later than November 15, 2016, and not later than the fifteenth day of November for each year thereafter, the department shall develop and publish an annual performance report for all operators of community schools in the state based on their performance for the previous school year. The report shall be made available on the department's web site. (C) The department shall include the performance report obtained pursuant to division (B) of this section in the department's annual report required by division (A)(4) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (D) For purposes of this section, "operator" has the same meaning as in division (A)(8) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.034. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, and except as described in division (E) of this section, any community school to which either of the following conditions apply shall be prohibited from entering into a contract with a new sponsor: (1) The community school has received, on the most recent report card issued for that school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, either of the following: (a) A grade of "D" or "F" for the performance index score, under division (C)(1)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, and an overall grade of "D" or "F" for the value-added progress dimension or another measure of student academic progress if adopted by the department of education and workforce, under division (C)(1)(e) of that section; (b) A a performance rating of less than three stars for achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and a performance rating of less than three stars for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (2) The community school is a dropout prevention and recovery community school, and it has received a rating of "does not meet standards" for the annual student growth measure and combined graduation rates on the most recent report card issued for the school under section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. (B) A community school to which division (A) of this section applies may enter into a contract with a new sponsor if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) The proposed sponsor received a rating of "effective" or higher pursuant to division (B)(5) of section 3314.016 of the Revised Code on its most recent evaluation conducted according to that section, or the proposed sponsor is the office of Ohio school sponsorship established in section 3314.029 of the Revised Code. (2) The community school submits a request to enter into a new contract with a sponsor. (3) The community school has not submitted a prior request that was granted. (4) The department grants the school's request pursuant to division (C) of this section. (C)(1) A school shall submit a request to change sponsors under this section not later than on the fifteenth day of February of the year in which the school wishes to do so. If a community school to which division (A)(1) of this section applies submits a request to the department to enter into a contract with a new sponsor and a majority of the school's students are children with disabilities receiving special education and related services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the department shall at least consider the school's performance as measured against the average performance of all other community schools that primarily serve children with disabilities. (2) The department shall grant or deny the request not later than thirty days after the department receives it. If the department denies the request, the community school may submit an appeal to the director of education and workforce who shall hold a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The community school shall file its notice of appeal to the director not later than ten days after receiving the decision from the department. The director shall conduct the hearing not later than thirty days after receiving the school's notice of appeal and act upon the determination of the hearing officer not later than the twenty-fifth day of June of the year in which the school wishes to change sponsors. (D) Factors to be considered during a hearing held pursuant to division (C) of this section include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) The school's impact on the students and the community or communities it serves; (2) The quality and quantity of academic and administrative support the school receives from its current sponsor to help the school to improve; (3) The sponsor's annual evaluations of the community school under division (c)(2) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code for the previous three years; (4) The academic performance of the school, taking into account the demographic information of the students enrolled in the school; (5) The academic performance of alternative schools that serve comparable populations of students as those served by the community school; (6) The fiscal stability of the school; (7) The results of any audits of the school by the auditor of state; (8) The length of time the school has been under the oversight of its current sponsor; (9) The number of times the school has changed sponsors prior to the current request; (10) Parent and student satisfaction rates as demonstrated by surveys, if available. (E) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, if a community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities receiving special education and related services in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code meets both of the following criteria, the school may enter into a contract with a new sponsor, provided that the new sponsor satisfies the criteria in division (B)(1) of this section: (1) The school received, on its most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, a performance rating of at least three stars for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section. (2) As calculated for the most recent school year under section 3302.035 of the Revised Code, the school's performance index score for students with disabilities was higher than the performance index score for students with disabilities of the school district in which the school is located. Sec. 3314.25. (A) As used in this section and section 3314.252 of the Revised Code: (1) "Internet- or computer-based community school" has the same meaning as in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "State assessment" means statewide achievement assessments prescribed under sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (B) Any student enrolled in an internet- or computer-based community school shall be permitted to complete any of the state assessments remotely in an online format with a remote proctor if the following conditions are met: (1) The student takes the assessment using a device in which the student will be monitored by the assessment proctor through video and audio for the duration of the assessment administration. (2) The assessment proctor actively monitors each student completing a remote assessment and is available to respond to student questions and troubleshoot issues. (3) The school maintains a ratio of eleven to one, or less, for students taking an assessment to an assessment proctor. (4) Each teacher or school personnel assigned to proctor a remote assessment completes a remote proctoring certification course. (5) Each teacher, assessment proctor, or other school staff of each participating school understands the technical requirements and is familiar with the remote testing features prior to the remote administration of assessments. (6) For parents and students, the school does all of the following prior to administering assessments: (a) Ensures that all testing equipment functions correctly; (b) Provides training and support, including an opportunity to gain experience with remote testing features; (c) Communicates test security provisions and procedures. (C) An internet- or computer-based community school and a student's parent or guardian shall determine whether a student takes state assessments remotely under this section in accordance with section 3314.252 of the Revised Code. (D) The department of education and workforce shall, by the fifteenth day of September of each year, publish on its publicly accessible web site a report that analyzes the results of assessments that were remotely administered and proctored under this section in the prior school year to identify whether there were any signs of cheating or any anomalous results. Sec. 3314.252. (A) Each internet- or computer-based community school that administers state assessments using remote proctoring under section 3314.25 of the Revised Code shall provide parents with information regarding available testing and proctoring options for enrolled students. (B) Not later than two weeks after a student's initial enrollment, the school shall conduct a meeting or consultation with the student's parent or guardian, which may occur in person, by telephone, or through electronic communication, including electronic mail or other digital means, to discuss the available testing administration and proctoring options for the student. During the meeting or consultation, the school shall inform the student's parent or guardian of the school's preferred method of administration and proctoring of state assessments and any available alternative options. A parent or guardian may elect an alternative state assessment administration and proctoring option, and the school shall accommodate such election to the extent practicable, taking into consideration the student's educational needs and the feasibility of available testing options. If a student's parent or guardian does not respond to the school's reasonable attempts to conduct the meeting or consultation within two weeks of the student's initial enrollment, the school may proceed with the school's preferred method of administration and proctoring of state assessments. Notwithstanding anything in this division to the contrary, if the student has an individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code that includes in-person administration and proctoring of state assessments, the school shall provide in-person testing for the student. (C) If in-person administration and proctoring is determined to be the appropriate option for the student, the school shall provide the student with access to a testing location within a fifty-mile radius of the student's residence at which the student may complete state assessments. (D) The school shall review the determination made under division (B) of this section annually with the student's parent or guardian and may revise the testing administration method if the school and parent agree that a different proctoring method better serves the student's needs. The school shall not revise a student's testing administration method without the approval of the student's parent. (E) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a school to use a method of administration and proctoring of state assessments for a student that conflicts with the services included in the student's individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.35. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section and section 3314.355 of the Revised Code, this section applies to any community school that meets one of the following criteria as follows: (1) The school does not offer a grade level higher than three offers at least grade three and no grade higher and, for the three most recent consecutive school years, satisfies either of the following criteria: (a) The school has received a performance rating of one star for early literacy under division (D)(3)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (b) The school has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code was ranked in the lowest five per cent of public schools in the state according to performance index score. The department of education and workforce shall exclude from performance index score rankings any school described in division (B) of this section and any school to which the performance index score does not apply and that instead receives a score through an alternative measure developed by the department under division (A)(1) of section 3302.21 of the Revised Code. (2) The school offers any of grade levels four to eight but does not offer a grade level higher than nine and, for the three most recent school years, satisfies either of the following criteria: (a) The school has received a performance rating of one star for both achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section; (b) The school has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and a performance rating of one star for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section. (3) The school offers any of grade levels ten to twelve and, for the three most recent school years, satisfies either of the following criteria: (a) The school has received a performance rating of "one star" for achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and has not met annual measurable objectives for gap closing under division (D)(3)(a) of that section, as determined by the department of education and workforce; (b) The school has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and a performance rating of one star for progress under division (D)(1)(b) of that section. twelve and any of the following apply: (a) In the 2026-2027 school year, both of the following apply: (i) The school met any of the criteria for closure established under former division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendment, on the state report cards issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for each of the 2023-2024, 2024-2025, and 2025-2026 school years. (ii) The school met both of the following criteria for the 2025-2026 school year: (I) The school was ranked in the lowest five per cent of public schools in the state according to performance index score. The department of education and workforce shall exclude from performance index score rankings any school described in division (B) of this section and any school to which the performance index score does not apply and that instead receives a score through an alternative measure developed by the department under division (A)(1) of section 3302.21 of the Revised Code. (II) The school was ranked in the lowest sixty per cent of public schools in the state according to the value-added progress dimension gain index, as determined by the department. (b) In the 2027-2028 school year, both of the following apply: (i) The school met any of the criteria for closure established under former division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendment, on the state report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the 2024-2025 school year. (ii) The school met both of the following criteria for each of the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years: (I) The school was ranked in the lowest five per cent of public schools in the state according to performance index score. The department shall exclude from performance index score rankings any school described in division (B) of this section and any school to which the performance index score does not apply and that instead receives a score through an alternative measure developed by the department under division (A)(1) of section 3302.21 of the Revised Code. (II) The school was ranked in the lowest sixty per cent of public schools in the state according to the value-added progress dimension gain index. (c) In the 2028-2029 school year and any school year thereafter, the school met both of the following criteria for each of the three most recent consecutive school years: (i) The school was ranked in the lowest five per cent of public schools in the state according to performance index score. The department shall exclude from performance index score rankings any school described in division (B) of this section and any school to which the performance index score does not apply and that instead receives a score through an alternative measure developed by the department under division (A)(1) of section 3302.21 of the Revised Code. (ii) The school was ranked in the lowest sixty per cent of public schools in the state according to the value-added progress dimension gain index. For purposes of division (A) of this section only, the department shall exclude from performance index score rankings any school described in division (B) of this section. For purposes of division (A) of this section only, the department shall calculate the value-added progress dimension for a community school using in the same manner as it is calculated under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, except that in doing so the department shall use assessment scores for only those students to whom the school has administered the achievement assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for at least the two most recent school years but using value-added data from only the most recent school year. (B) This section does not apply to either of the following: (1) Any dropout prevention and recovery community school. Rather, such schools shall be subject to closure only as provided in section 3314.351 of the Revised Code. However, prior to July 1, 2014, a community school in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program shall be exempt from this section only if it has been granted a waiver under section 3314.36 of the Revised Code. (2) Any community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities receiving special education and related services in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (C) Any community school to which this section applies shall permanently close at the conclusion of the school year in which the school first becomes subject to this section. The sponsor and governing authority of the school shall comply with all procedures for closing a community school adopted by the department under division (E) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. The governing authority of the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code after the school closes. (D) Nothing in this section or in any other provision of the Revised Code prohibits the sponsor of a community school from exercising its option not to renew a contract for any reason or from terminating a contract prior to its expiration for any of the reasons set forth in section 3314.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.351. (A) This section applies to any dropout prevention and recovery community school. Except as provided in division (F) of this section, any Any such community school that has received a designation of "does not meet standards," as described in division (D)(1) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code on the report card issued under that section, for the three most recent school years shall be subject to closure in accordance with this section. (B) Not later than the first day of September in each school year, the department of education and workforce shall notify each school subject to closure under this section that the school must close not later than the thirtieth day of the following June. A school so notified shall close as required. (C) A school that opens on or after July 1, 2014, shall not be subject to closure under this section for its first two years of operation. A school that is in operation prior to July 1, 2014, shall not be subject to closure under this section until after August 31, 2016. (D) The sponsor and governing authority of the school shall comply with all procedures for closing a community school adopted by the department under division (E) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. The governing authority of the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code after the school closes. (E) Nothing in this section or in any other provision of the Revised Code prohibits the sponsor of a community school from exercising its option not to renew a contract for any reason or from terminating a contract prior to its expiration for any of the reasons set forth in section 3314.07 of the Revised Code. (F) Beginning in the 2019-2020 school year, no school shall be subject to closure under this section based on the report card issued for that school for the 2017-2018 or 2018-2019 school year if the school received an overall rating of "meets standards" or "exceeds standards" for the 2017-2018 or 2018-2019 school year pursuant to division (I) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. However, no school permanently closed under this section prior to the 2019-2020 school year shall be eligible to reopen based on the calculated or recalculated ratings under division (I) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.353. Each year, the department of education and workforce shall publish separate lists of the following: (A) Community schools that have become subject to permanent closure under section 3314.35 or 3314.351 of the Revised Code; (B) Community schools that are at risk of becoming subject to permanent closure under section 3314.35 or 3314.351 of the Revised Code if their academic performance, as prescribed in those sections, does not improve on the next state report cards issued under section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code. The department of education and workforce shall not adopt any rules, enforce any procedures or policies, or otherwise restrict the establishment or sponsorship of a new start-up community school based upon whether the school's proposed location is in a challenged school district, as that term was defined in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code prior to the effective date of this amendment. Sec. 3314.362. Notwithstanding division (A)(10)(A)(9) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code, a community school that primarily serves students enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program may continue to operate in the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years without complying with that division and shall be considered a dropout prevention and recovery community school for the purposes of Title XXXIII of the Revised Code for those school years. Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2027, any community school that primarily serves students enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program is a dropout prevention and recovery community school, as defined in division (A)(10)(A)(9) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. Prior to that date, the school, upon approval of the school's sponsor, shall do one or both of the following with any grades that do not comply with division (A)(10)(A)(9) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code: (A) Transfer those grades to a separate community school. The department of education and workforce shall assign the separate community school its own internal retrieval number. (B) Cease offering those grades. The school shall assist students who are not eligible to enroll in the dropout prevention and recovery community school to transfer to a separate community school or enroll in a different school, as applicable. Sec. 3315.42. Sections 3315.40 and 3315.41 of the Revised Code do not apply to either of the following: (A) A a school district that has received funds for a project under Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code, so long as the purchase price to be paid by the board for the state's interest in the project has not been paid; (B) A school district that has an outstanding loan under section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3316.03. (A) The existence of a fiscal watch shall be declared by the auditor of state. The auditor of state may make a determination on the auditor of state's initiative, or upon receipt of a written request for such a determination, which may be filed by the governor, the director of education and workforce, or a majority of the members of the board of education of the school district. (1) The auditor of state shall declare a school district to be in a state of fiscal watch if the auditor of state determines that both of the following conditions are satisfied with respect to the school district: (a) An operating deficit has been certified for the current fiscal year by the auditor of state, and the certified operating deficit exceeds eight per cent of the school district's general fund revenue for the preceding fiscal year; (b) A majority of the voting electors have not voted in favor of levying a tax under section 5705.194, 5705.199, or 5705.21 or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code that the auditor of state expects will raise enough additional revenue in the next succeeding fiscal year that division (A)(1)(a) of this section will not apply to the district in such next succeeding fiscal year. (2) The auditor of state shall declare a school district to be in a state of fiscal watch if the auditor of state determines that the school district has outstanding securities issued under division (A)(4) of section 3316.06 of the Revised Code, and its financial planning and supervision commission has been terminated under section 3316.16 of the Revised Code. (3) The auditor of state shall declare a school district to be in a state of fiscal watch if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The director has reported to the auditor of state that the director has declared the district under section 3316.031 of the Revised Code to be under a fiscal caution, has found that the district has not acted reasonably to eliminate or correct practices or conditions that prompted the declaration, and has determined the declaration of a state of fiscal watch necessary to prevent further fiscal decline; (b) The auditor of state determines that the decision of the director is reasonable. If the auditor of state determines that the decision of the director is not reasonable, the auditor of state shall provide the director with a written explanation of that determination. (4) The auditor of state may declare a school district to be in a state of fiscal watch if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) An operating deficit has been certified for the current fiscal year by the auditor of state, and the certified operating deficit exceeds two per cent, but does not exceed eight per cent, of the school district's general fund revenue for the preceding fiscal year; (b) A majority of the voting electors have not voted in favor of levying a tax under section 5705.194, 5705.199, or 5705.21 or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code that the auditor of state expects will raise enough additional revenue in the next succeeding fiscal year that division (A)(4)(a) of this section will not apply to the district in the next succeeding fiscal year; (c) The auditor of state determines that there is no reasonable cause for the deficit or that the declaration of fiscal watch is necessary to prevent further fiscal decline in the district. (B)(1) The auditor of state shall issue an order declaring a school district to be in a state of fiscal emergency if the auditor of state determines that both of the following conditions are satisfied with respect to the school district: (a) An operating deficit has been certified for the current fiscal year by the auditor of state, and the certified operating deficit exceeds fifteen per cent of the school district's general fund revenue for the preceding fiscal year. (b) A majority of the voting electors have not voted in favor of levying a tax under section 5705.194, 5705.199, or 5705.21 or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code that the auditor of state expects will raise enough additional revenue in the next succeeding fiscal year that division (B)(1)(a) of this section will not apply to the district in such next succeeding fiscal year. (2) The auditor of state shall issue an order declaring a school district to be in a state of fiscal emergency if the school district board fails, pursuant to section 3316.04 of the Revised Code, to submit a plan acceptable to the director of education and workforce within one hundred twenty days of the auditor of state's declaration under division (A) of this section or an updated plan when one is required by division (C) of section 3316.04 of the Revised Code; (3) The auditor of state shall issue an order declaring a school district to be in a state of fiscal emergency if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The director has reported to the auditor of state that the district is not materially complying with the provisions of an original or updated plan as approved by the director under section 3316.04 of the Revised Code, and that the director has determined the declaration of a state of fiscal emergency necessary to prevent further fiscal decline; (b) The auditor of state finds that the determination of the director is reasonable. If the auditor of state determines that the decision of the director is not reasonable, the auditor of state shall provide the director a written explanation of that determination. (4) The auditor of state shall issue an order declaring a school district to be in a state of fiscal emergency if a declaration of fiscal emergency is required by division (D) of section 3316.04 of the Revised Code. (5) The auditor of state may issue an order declaring a school district to be in a state of fiscal emergency if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) An operating deficit has been certified for the current fiscal year by the auditor of state, and the certified operating deficit exceeds ten per cent, but does not exceed fifteen per cent, of the school district's general fund revenue for the preceding fiscal year; (b) A majority of the voting electors have not voted in favor of levying a tax under section 5705.194, 5705.199, or 5705.21 or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code that the auditor of state expects will raise enough additional revenue in the next succeeding fiscal year that division (B)(5)(a)(B)(4)(a) of this section will not apply to the district in the next succeeding fiscal year; (c) The auditor of state determines that a declaration of fiscal emergency is necessary to correct the district's fiscal problems and to prevent further fiscal decline. (C) In making the determinations under this section, the auditor of state may use financial reports required under section 117.43 of the Revised Code; tax budgets, certificates of estimated resources and amendments thereof, annual appropriating measures and spending plans, and any other documents or information prepared pursuant to Chapter 5705. of the Revised Code; and any other documents, records, or information available to the auditor of state that indicate the conditions described in divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (D) The auditor of state shall certify the action taken under division (A) or (B) of this section to the board of education of the school district, the director of budget and management, the mayor or county auditor who could be required to act pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 3316.05 of the Revised Code, and to the director of education and workforce. (E) A determination by the auditor of state under this section that a fiscal emergency condition does not exist is final and conclusive and not appealable. A determination by the auditor of state under this section that a fiscal emergency exists is final, except that the board of education of the school district affected by such a determination may appeal the determination of the existence of a fiscal emergency condition to the court of appeals having territorial jurisdiction over the school district. The appeal shall be heard expeditiously by the court of appeals and for good cause shown shall take precedence over all other civil matters except earlier matters of the same character. Notice of such appeal must be filed with the auditor of state and such court within thirty days after certification by the auditor of state to the board of education of the school district provided for in division (D) of this section. In such appeal, determinations of the auditor of state shall be presumed to be valid and the board of education shall have the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that each of the determinations made by the auditor of state as to the existence of a fiscal emergency condition under this section was in error. If the board of education fails, upon presentation of its case, to prove by clear and convincing evidence that each such determination by the auditor of state was in error, the court shall dismiss the appeal. The board of education and the auditor of state may introduce any evidence relevant to the existence or nonexistence of such fiscal emergency conditions. The pendency of any such appeal shall not affect or impede the operations of this chapter; no restraining order, temporary injunction, or other similar restraint upon actions consistent with this chapter shall be imposed by the court or any court pending determination of such appeal; and all things may be done under this chapter that may be done regardless of the pendency of any such appeal. Any action taken or contract executed pursuant to this chapter during the pendency of such appeal is valid and enforceable among all parties, notwithstanding the decision in such appeal. If the court of appeals reverses the determination of the existence of a fiscal emergency condition by the auditor of state, the determination no longer has any effect, and any procedures undertaken as a result of the determination shall be terminated. Sec. 3316.04. (A) Within sixty days of the auditor's declaration under division (A) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, the board of education of the school district shall prepare and submit to the director of education and workforce a financial plan delineating the steps the board will take to eliminate the district's current operating deficit and avoid incurring operating deficits in ensuing years, including the implementation of spending reductions. The financial plan also shall evaluate the feasibility of entering into shared services agreements with other political subdivisions for the joint exercise of any power, performance of any function, or rendering of any service, if so authorized by statute. The director shall evaluate the initial financial plan, and either approve or disapprove it within thirty calendar days from the date of its submission. If the initial financial plan is disapproved, the director shall recommend modifications that will render the financial plan acceptable. No school district board shall implement a financial plan submitted to the director under this section unless the director has approved the plan. (B) Upon request of the board of education of a school district declared to be in a state of fiscal watch, the auditor of state and director shall provide technical assistance to the board in resolving the fiscal problems that gave rise to the declaration, including assistance in drafting the board's financial plan. (C) A financial plan adopted under this section may be amended at any time with the approval of the director. The board of education of the school district shall submit an updated financial plan to the director, for the director's approval, every year that the district is in a state of fiscal watch. The updated plan shall be submitted in a form acceptable to the director. The director shall approve or disapprove each updated plan no later than the anniversary of the date on which the first such plan was approved. (D) A school district that has restructured or refinanced a loan under section 3316.041 of the Revised Code shall be declared to be in a state of fiscal emergency if any of the following occurs: (1) An operating deficit is certified for the district under section 3313.483 of the Revised Code for any year prior to the repayment of the restructured or refinanced loan; (2) The director determines, in consultation with the auditor of state, that the school district is not satisfactorily complying with the terms of the financial plan required by this section; (3) The board of education of the school district fails to submit an updated plan that is acceptable to the director under division (C) of this section. Sec. 3316.06. (A) Within one hundred twenty days after the first meeting of a school district financial planning and supervision commission, the commission shall adopt a financial recovery plan regarding the school district for which the commission was created. During the formulation of the plan, the commission shall seek appropriate input from the school district board and from the community. This plan shall contain the following: (1) Actions to be taken to: (a) Eliminate all fiscal emergency conditions declared to exist pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code; (b) Satisfy any judgments, past-due accounts payable, and all past-due and payable payroll and fringe benefits; (c) Eliminate the deficits in all deficit funds, except that any prior year deficits in the capital and maintenance fund established pursuant to section 3315.18 of the Revised Code shall be forgiven; (d) Restore to special funds any moneys from such funds that were used for purposes not within the purposes of such funds, or borrowed from such funds by the purchase of debt obligations of the school district with the moneys of such funds, or missing from the special funds and not accounted for, if any; (e) Balance the budget, avoid future deficits in any funds, and maintain on a current basis payments of payroll, fringe benefits, and all accounts; (f) Avoid any fiscal emergency condition in the future; (g) Restore the ability of the school district to market long-term general obligation bonds under provisions of law applicable to school districts generally. (2) The management structure that will enable the school district to take the actions enumerated in division (A)(1) of this section. The plan shall specify the level of fiscal and management control that the commission will exercise within the school district during the period of fiscal emergency, and shall enumerate respectively, the powers and duties of the commission and the powers and duties of the school board during that period. The commission may elect to assume any of the powers and duties of the school board it considers necessary, including all powers related to personnel, curriculum, and legal issues in order to successfully implement the actions described in division (A)(1) of this section. (3) The target dates for the commencement, progress upon, and completion of the actions enumerated in division (A)(1) of this section and a reasonable period of time expected to be required to implement the plan. The commission shall prepare a reasonable time schedule for progress toward and achievement of the requirements for the plan, and the plan shall be consistent with that time schedule. (4) The amount and purpose of any issue of debt obligations that will be issued, together with assurances that any such debt obligations that will be issued will not exceed debt limits supported by appropriate certifications by the fiscal officer of the school district and the county auditor. If the commission considers it necessary in order to maintain or improve educational opportunities of pupils in the school district, the plan may include a proposal to restructure or refinance outstanding debt obligations incurred by the board under section 3313.483 of the Revised Code contingent upon the approval, during the period of the fiscal emergency, by district voters of a tax levied under section 718.09, 718.10, 5705.194, 5705.21, 5748.02, 5748.08, or 5748.09 of the Revised Code that is not a renewal levy, or a levy under section 5705.199 of the Revised Code, and that will provide new operating revenue. Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 133. or sections 3313.483 to 3313.4810 of the Revised Code, following the required approval of the district voters and with the approval of the commission, the school district may issue securities to evidence the restructuring or refinancing. Those securities may extend the original period for repayment, not to exceed ten years, and may alter the frequency and amount of repayments, interest or other financing charges, and other terms of agreements under which the debt originally was contracted, at the discretion of the commission, provided that any loans received pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code shall be paid from funds the district would otherwise receive under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, as required under division (E)(3) of section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. The securities issued for the purpose of restructuring or refinancing the debt shall be repaid in equal payments and at equal intervals over the term of the debt and are not eligible to be included in any subsequent proposal for the purpose of restructuring or refinancing debt under this section. (5) An evaluation of the feasibility of entering into shared services agreements with other political subdivisions for the joint exercise of any power, performance of any function, or rendering of any service, if so authorized by statute. (B) Any financial recovery plan may be amended subsequent to its adoption. Each financial recovery plan shall be updated annually. (C) Each school district financial planning and supervision commission shall submit the financial recovery plan it adopts or updates under this section to the director of education and workforce for approval immediately following its adoption or updating. The director shall evaluate the plan and either approve or disapprove it within thirty calendar days from the date of its submission. If the plan is disapproved, the director shall recommend modifications that will render it acceptable. No financial planning and supervision commission shall implement a financial recovery plan that is adopted or updated on or after April 10, 2001, unless the director has approved it. Sec. 3316.14. (A) No debt obligation, including any debt incurred pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, may be issued or incurred by the school district, whether purchased by the school district or by others, except with the prior approval of the school district financial planning and supervision commission. (B) The commission shall disapprove the issuance of debt obligations upon a determination that, in its judgment, such action would impede the purposes of a financial recovery plan under this chapter or be inconsistent with this chapter or the plan. (C) The commission shall not approve the issuance of debt obligations unless: (1) The resolution authorizing their issuance, the resolution providing for their award, and every document forming part of the contract with the purchasers of such debt obligations from the school district is approved by the commission. (2) The resolution authorizing the debt obligations contains a covenant to the effect that the school district will comply with all provisions of this chapter, with the orders, directions, and requests of the commission and the auditor of state under this chapter, and with the financial recovery plan. The commission may prescribe the form of the covenant. (3) The school district, at the time of such approval, is in compliance with this chapter. (D) The commission shall not approve the issuance of a debt obligation if the issuance would cause the school district to exceed debt limits. (E) For purposes of the validity of debt obligations approved by the commission and delivered to and paid for by a purchaser other than the school district, but for no other purposes of this chapter, such approval shall be conclusive as to compliance with this section, unless the approval is withdrawn by the commission prior to the delivery and payment. Sec. 3317.02. As used in this chapter: (A) "Alternative school" has the same meaning as in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code. (B) "Autism scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom autism scholarships are awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code. (C) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a district's "base cost enrolled ADM" for a fiscal year means the greater of the following: (1) The district's enrolled ADM for the previous fiscal year; (2) The average of the district's enrolled ADM for the previous three fiscal years. (D)(1) "Base cost per pupil" means the following for a city, local, or exempted village school district: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the aggregate base cost calculated for that district for that fiscal year under section 3317.011 of the Revised Code divided by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year; (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "Base cost per pupil" means the following for a joint vocational school district: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the aggregate base cost calculated for that district for that fiscal year under section 3317.012 of the Revised Code divided by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year; (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (E)(1) "Category one career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(11) or (D)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(12) or (D)(2)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(13) or (D)(2)(j) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (4) "Category four career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(14) or (D)(2)(k) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (5) "Category five career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(15) or (D)(2)(l) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) "Category one English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(16) or (D)(2)(m) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(17) or (D)(2)(n) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(18) or (D)(2)(o) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) "Category one special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of children with disabilities receiving special education services for the disability specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(5) or (D)(2)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of children with disabilities receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(6) or (D)(2)(c) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(7) or (D)(2)(d) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (4) "Category four special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(8) or (D)(2)(e) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (5) "Category five special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for the disabilities specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(9) or (D)(2)(f) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (6) "Category six special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for the disabilities specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district certified under division (B)(10) or (D)(2)(g) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (H) "Community and STEM school unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students enrolled in community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (I)(1) "Economically disadvantaged index for a school district" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the square of the quotient of that district's percentage of students in its enrolled ADM who are identified as economically disadvantaged as defined by the department of education and workforce, divided by the percentage of students in the statewide ADM identified as economically disadvantaged. For purposes of this calculation: (i) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the "statewide ADM" equals the sum of the following: (I) The enrolled ADM for all city, local, and exempted village school districts combined; (II) The statewide enrollment of students in community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (III) The statewide enrollment of students in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (ii) For a joint vocational school district, the "statewide ADM" equals the sum of the enrolled ADM for all joint vocational school districts combined. (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an index calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "Economically disadvantaged index for a community or STEM school" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the square of the quotient of the percentage of students enrolled in the school who are identified as economically disadvantaged as defined by the department, divided by the percentage of students in the statewide ADM identified as economically disadvantaged. For purposes of this calculation, the "statewide ADM" equals the "statewide ADM" for city, local, and exempted village school districts described in division (I)(1)(a)(i) of this section. (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an index calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (J) "Educational choice scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom educational choice scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.03 and 3310.032 of the Revised Code. (K) "Enrolled ADM" means the following: (1) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department, as follows: (a) Add the students described in division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (b) Subtract the students counted under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (c) Count only twenty per cent of the number of joint vocational school district students counted under division (A)(3) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (d) Add twenty per cent of the number of students who are entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code and are enrolled in another school district under a career-technical education compact; (e) Add twenty per cent of the number of students described in division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code who enroll in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact. (2) For a joint vocational school district, the final number verified by the department, based on the enrollment reported and certified under division (D) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as adjusted, if so ordered, under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department by adding the students described in division (D)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (3) For the community and STEM school unit, the sum of the number of students reported as enrolled in community schools under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and the number of students reported as enrolled in STEM schools under division (A) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code; (4) For the educational choice scholarship unit, the number of students for whom educational choice scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.03 and 3310.032 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(g) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (5) For the pilot project scholarship unit, the number of students for whom pilot project scholarships are awarded under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (6) For the autism scholarship unit, the number of students for whom autism scholarships are awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (7) For the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit, the number of students for whom Jon Peterson special needs scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (L)(1) "Formula ADM" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department, as follows: (a) Count only twenty per cent of the number of joint vocational school district students counted under division (A)(3) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (b) Add twenty per cent of the number of students who are entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code and are enrolled in another school district under a career-technical education compact. (2) "Formula ADM" means, for a joint vocational school district, the final number verified by the department, based on the enrollment reported and certified under division (D) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as adjusted, if so ordered, under division (K) of that section. (M) "FTE basis" means a count of students based on full-time equivalency, in accordance with rules adopted by the department pursuant to section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. In adopting its rules under this division, the department shall provide for counting any student in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM or in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion the student is counted in enrolled ADM and formula ADM. (N) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the sum of the following as calculated by the department: (1) The district's "general funding base," which equals the amount calculated as follows: (a) Compute the sum of the following: (i) The amount calculated for the district for fiscal year 2020 under division (A)(1) of Section 265.220 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly after any adjustments required under Section 265.227 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and prior to any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, "Implementing Additional Spending Controls to Balance the State Budget" issued on May 7, 2020; (ii) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (C)(1), (3), and (4) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (b) Subtract from the amount calculated in division (N)(1)(a) of this section the sum of the following: (i) The following difference: (The amount paid to the district under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019) - (the amounts deducted from the district and paid to a community school under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school under division (E) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2020 in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly) (ii) The payments deducted from the district and paid to a community school for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (C)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (iii) The payments deducted from the district and paid to a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (A), (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), and (G) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (iv) The payments deducted from the district under division (C) of section 3310.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, division (C)(2) of section 3310.41 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, and former section 3310.55 of the Revised Code for fiscal year 2020 and, in the case of a pilot project school district as defined in section 3313.975 of the Revised Code, the funds deducted from the district under Section 265.210 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly to operate the pilot project scholarship program for fiscal year 2020 under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code; (v) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the payments subtracted from the district for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (B)(1) and (3) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (2) The district's "disadvantaged pupil impact aid funding base," which equals the following difference: (The amount paid to the district under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019) - (the amounts deducted from the district and paid to a community school under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school under division (E) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2020 in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly) (O) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" means, for a joint vocational school district, the sum of the following as calculated by the department: (1) The district's "general funding base," which equals the amount calculated as follows: (a) Compute the sum of the following: (i) The district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under Section 265.225 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly after any adjustments required under Section 265.227 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (ii) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (b) Subtract from the amount paid to the district under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019. (2) The district's "disadvantaged pupil impact aid funding base," which equals the amount paid to the district under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019. (P) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" for a community school means the following: (1) For a community school that was in operation for the entirety of fiscal year 2020, the amount paid to the school for that fiscal year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and the amount, if any, paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (2) For a community school that was in operation for part of fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department; (3) For a community school that was not in operation for fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school if it was in operation for that school year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department. (Q) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" for a STEM school means the following: (1) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was in operation for the entirety of fiscal year 2020, the amount paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and the amount, if any, paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (2) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was in operation for part of fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department; (3) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was not in operation for fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school if it was in operation for that school year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department. (R) "Funding unit" means any of the following: (1) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; (2) The community and STEM school unit; (3) The educational choice scholarship unit; (4) The pilot project scholarship unit; (5) The autism scholarship unit; (6) The Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit. (S) "Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom Jon Peterson scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (T) "Internet- or computer-based community school" has the same meaning as in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (U) "LRE student with a disability" means a child with a disability who has an individualized education program providing for the student to spend more than half of each school day in a regular school setting with nondisabled students. For purposes of this division, "individualized education program" and "child with a disability" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, and "LRE" is an abbreviation for "least restrictive environment." (V) "Medically fragile child" means a child to whom all of the following apply: (1) The child requires the services of a doctor of medicine or osteopathic medicine at least once a week due to the instability of the child's medical condition. (2) The child requires the services of a registered nurse on a daily basis. (3) The child is at risk of institutionalization in a hospital, skilled nursing facility, or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities. (W)(1) A child may be identified as having an "other health impairment-major" if the child's condition meets the definition of "other health impaired" established in rules previously adopted by the department and if either of the following apply: (a) The child is identified as having a medical condition that is among those listed by the department as conditions where a substantial majority of cases fall within the definition of "medically fragile child." (b) The child is determined by the department to be a medically fragile child. A school district superintendent may petition the department for a determination that a child is a medically fragile child. (2) A child may be identified as having an "other health impairment-minor" if the child's condition meets the definition of "other health impaired" established in rules previously adopted by the department but the child's condition does not meet either of the conditions specified in division (W)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (X)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district's, community school's, or STEM school's "general phase-in percentage" is equal to the percentage for that fiscal year that is determined by the general assembly. (2) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district's "phase-in percentage for disadvantaged pupil impact aid" is equal to the percentage for that fiscal year that is determined by the general assembly. (Y) "Pilot project scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom pilot project scholarships are awarded under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (Z) "Preschool child with a disability" means a child with a disability, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, who is at least age three but is not of compulsory school age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, and who is not currently enrolled in kindergarten. (AA) "Related services" includes: (1) Child study, special education supervisors and coordinators, speech and hearing services, adaptive physical development services, occupational or physical therapy, teacher assistants for children with disabilities whose disabilities are described in division (B) of section 3317.013 or division (G)(3) of this section, behavioral intervention, interpreter services, work study, nursing services, and specialized integrative services as those terms are defined by the department; (2) Speech and language services provided to any student with a disability, including any student whose primary or only disability is a speech and language disability; (3) Any related service not specifically covered by other state funds but specified in federal law, including but not limited to, audiology and school psychological services; (4) Any service included in units funded under former division (O)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code; (5) Any other related service needed by children with disabilities in accordance with their individualized education programs. (BB) "School district," unless otherwise specified, means city, local, and exempted village school districts. (CC) "Separately educated student with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code. (DD) "State education aid" has the same meaning as in section 5751.20 of the Revised Code. (EE)(1) "State share percentage" means the following for a city, local, or exempted village school district: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the state share percentage calculated under section 3317.017 of the Revised Code; (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, a percentage calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "State share percentage" means, for a joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage calculated under section 3317.165 of the Revised Code. (FF) "Statewide average base cost per pupil" means the following: (1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the statewide average base cost per pupil calculated under division (A) of section 3317.018 of the Revised Code; (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (GG) "Statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil" means the following: (1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil calculated under division (B) of section 3317.018 of the Revised Code; (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (HH) "STEM school" means a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (II) "Taxes charged and payable" means the taxes charged and payable against real and public utility property after making the reduction required by section 319.301 of the Revised Code, plus the taxes levied against tangible personal property. (JJ) For purposes of sections 3317.017 and 3317.165 of the Revised Code, "three-year average valuation" for a fiscal year means the average of total taxable value for the three most recent tax years for which data is available, as certified under section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Total ADM" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code minus the enrollment reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (g), (h), and (i) of that section, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section. (LL) "Total special education ADM" means the sum of categories one through six special education ADM. (MM) "Total taxable value" means the sum of the amounts certified for a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district under divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (NN) "Tuition discount" means any deduction from the base tuition amount per student charged by a chartered nonpublic school, to which the student's family is entitled due to one or more of the following conditions: (1) The student's family has multiple children enrolled in the same school. (2) The student's family is a member of or affiliated with a religious or secular organization that provides oversight of the school or from which the school has agreed to enroll students. (3) The student's parent is an employee of the school. (4) Some other qualification not based on the income of the student's family or the student's athletic or academic ability and for which all students in the school may qualify. Sec. 3317.023. (A) The amounts required to be paid to a district under this chapter shall be adjusted by the amount of the computations made under divisions (B) to (K) of this section. As used in this section: (1) "Career-technical planning district" or "CTPD" means a school district or group of school districts designated by the department of education and workforce as being responsible for the planning for and provision of career-technical education services to students within the district or group. A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code or a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code that is serving students in any of grades seven through twelve shall be assigned to a career-technical planning district by the department. (2) "Lead district" means a school district, including a joint vocational school district, designated by the department as a CTPD, or designated to provide primary career-technical education leadership within a CTPD composed of a group of districts, community schools assigned to the CTPD, and STEM schools assigned to the CTPD. (B) If a local, city, or exempted village school district to which a governing board of an educational service center provides services pursuant to an agreement entered into under section 3313.843 of the Revised Code, deduct the amount of the payment required for the reimbursement of the governing board under that section. (C)(1) If the district is required to pay to or entitled to receive tuition from another school district under division (C)(2) or (3) of section 3313.64 or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, or if the department is required to determine the correct amount of tuition and make a deduction or credit under section 3317.08 of the Revised Code, deduct and credit such amounts as provided in division (J) of section 3313.64 or section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. (2) For each child for whom the district is responsible for tuition or payment under division (A)(1) of section 3317.082 or section 3323.091 of the Revised Code, deduct the amount of tuition or payment for which the district is responsible. (D) If the district has been certified by the department under section 3313.90 of the Revised Code as not in compliance with the requirements of that section, deduct an amount equal to ten per cent of the amount computed for the district under this chapter. (E) This division does not apply on or after the effective date of this amendment. If the district has received a loan from a commercial lending institution for which payments are made pursuant to former division (E)(3) of section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to the effective date of this amendment, deduct an amount equal to such payments. (F)(1) If the district is a party to an agreement entered into under division (D), (E), or (F) of section 3311.06 or division (B) of section 3311.24 of the Revised Code and is obligated to make payments to another district under such an agreement, deduct an amount equal to such payments if the district school board notifies the department in writing that it wishes to have such payments deducted. (2) If the district is entitled to receive payments from another district that has notified the department to deduct such payments under division (F)(1) of this section, add the amount of such payments. (G) If the district is required to pay an amount of funds to a cooperative education district pursuant to a provision described by division (B)(4) of section 3311.52 or division (B)(8) of section 3311.521 of the Revised Code, deduct such amounts as provided under that provision and credit those amounts to the cooperative education district for payment to the district under division (B)(1) of section 3317.19 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) If a district is educating a student entitled to attend school in another district pursuant to a shared education contract, compact, or cooperative education agreement other than an agreement entered into pursuant to section 3313.842 of the Revised Code, credit to that educating district on an FTE basis both of the following: (a) An amount equal to the statewide average base cost per pupil. (b) Any amount applicable to the student pursuant to section 3317.013 or 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (2) Deduct any amount credited pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section from amounts paid to the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (3) If the district is required by a shared education contract, compact, or cooperative education agreement to make payments to an educational service center, deduct the amounts from payments to the district and add them to the amounts paid to the service center. (I)(1) If a district, including a joint vocational school district, is a lead district of a CTPD, credit to that district the amount calculated for each school district within that CTPD under divisions (D) and (E) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and for each community school and STEM school assigned to the CTPD under divisions (D) and (E) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (2) Deduct from each appropriate district that is not a lead district, or from the appropriate community school or STEM school, the amount attributable to that district or school that is credited to a lead district under division (I)(1) of this section. (J) If the department pays a joint vocational school district under division (C)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code for excess costs of providing special education and related services to a student with a disability, as calculated under division (C)(1) of that section, the department shall deduct the amount of that payment from the city, local, or exempted village school district that is responsible as specified in that section for the excess costs. (K)(1) If the district reports an amount of excess cost for special education services for a child under division (C) of section 3323.14 of the Revised Code, the department shall pay that amount to the district. (2) If the district reports an amount of excess cost for special education services for a child under division (C) of section 3323.14 of the Revised Code, the department shall deduct that amount from the district of residence of that child. Sec. 3317.03. (A) The superintendent of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall report to the department of education and workforce as of the last day of October, March, and June of each year the enrollment of students receiving services from schools under the superintendent's supervision, and the numbers of other students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code the superintendent is required to report under this section, so that the department can calculate the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, transportation ADM, and, for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership. (1) The enrollment reported by the superintendent during the reporting period shall consist of the number of students in grades kindergarten through twelve receiving any educational services from the district, except that the following categories of students shall not be included in the determination: (a) Students enrolled in adult education classes; (b) Adjacent or other district students enrolled in the district under an open enrollment policy pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (c) Students receiving services in the district pursuant to a compact, cooperative education agreement, or a contract, but who are entitled to attend school in another district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code; (d) Students for whom tuition is payable pursuant to sections 3317.081 and 3323.141 of the Revised Code; (e) Students receiving services in the district through a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. When reporting students under division (A)(1) of this section, the superintendent also shall report the district where each student is entitled to attend school pursuant to sections 3313.64 and 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (2) The department shall compile a list of all students reported to be enrolled in a district under division (A)(1) of this section and of the students entitled to attend school in the district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code on an FTE basis but receiving educational services in grades kindergarten through twelve from one or more of the following entities: (a) A community school pursuant to Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in such community school; (b) An alternative school pursuant to sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code; (c) A college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, except when the student is enrolled in the college while also enrolled in a community school pursuant to Chapter 3314.,or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (d) An adjacent or other school district under an open enrollment policy adopted pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (e) An educational service center or cooperative education district; (f) Another school district under a cooperative education agreement, compact, or contract; (g) A chartered nonpublic school with a scholarship paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, if the students qualified for the scholarship under section 3310.03 or 3310.032 of the Revised Code; (h) An alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "alternative public provider" and "registered private provider" have the same meanings as in section 3310.41 or 3310.51 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (i) A science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in the school; (j) A college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in the school. (3) The department also shall compile a list of the students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are enrolled in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact, excluding any students so entitled to attend school in the district who are enrolled in another school district through an open enrollment policy as reported under division (A)(2)(d) of this section and then enroll in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact. The department shall provide each city, local, and exempted village school district with an opportunity to review the list of students compiled under divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section to ensure that the students reported accurately reflect the enrollment of students in the district. (B) To enable the department to obtain the data needed to complete the calculation of payments pursuant to this chapter, each superintendent shall certify from the reports provided by the department under division (A) of this section all of the following: (1) The total student enrollment in regular learning day classes included in the report under division (A)(1) or (2), including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, of this section for each of the individual grades kindergarten through twelve in schools under the superintendent's supervision; (2) The unduplicated count of the number of preschool children with disabilities enrolled in the district for whom the district is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, in accordance with the disability categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (3) The number of children entitled to attend school in the district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are: (a) Enrolled in a college under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, except when the student is enrolled in the college while also enrolled in a community school pursuant to Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (b) Participating in a program operated by a county board of developmental disabilities or a state institution. (4) The total enrollment of pupils in joint vocational schools; (5) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (6) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (7) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (8) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (9) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (10) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (11) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, in category one career-technical education programs or classes, described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or by another district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (12) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, in category two career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (13) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, in category three career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (14) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, in category four career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (15) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section, in category five career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (16) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section; (17) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section; (18) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section; (19) The average number of children transported during the reporting period by the school district on board-owned or contractor-owned and -operated buses, reported in accordance with rules adopted by the department; (20)(a) The number of children, other than preschool children with disabilities, the district placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in fiscal year 1998. Division (B)(20)(a) of this section does not apply after fiscal year 2013. (b) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (c) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (d) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (e) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (f) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (g) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. (21) The enrollment of students who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department, including any student described in divisions (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), and (i), and (j) of this section. A student shall not be categorically excluded from the number reported under division (B)(21) of this section based on anything other than family income. (22) The enrollment of students identified as gifted under division (A), (B), (C), or (D) of section 3324.03 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The department shall adopt rules necessary for implementing divisions (A), (B), and (D) of this section. (2) A student enrolled in a community school established under Chapter 3314., or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code shall be counted in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code for the same proportion of the school year that the student is counted in the enrollment of the community school, or the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school, or the college-preparatory boarding school for purposes of section 3317.022 or 3328.24 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding the enrollment of students reported pursuant to division (A)(2)(a), or (i), or (j) of this section, the department may adjust the formula ADM of a school district to account for students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are enrolled in a community school, or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school, or a college-preparatory boarding school for only a portion of the school year. (3) No child shall be counted as more than a total of one child in the sum of the enrollment of students of a school district under division (A), divisions (B)(1) to (22), or division (D) of this section, except as follows: (a)(i) A child with a disability described in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code may be counted both in formula ADM and in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM. As provided in division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM in the same proportion that the child is counted in formula ADM. (ii) A child with a disability described in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code may be counted both in enrolled ADM and in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM. As provided in division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM in the same proportion that the child is counted in enrolled ADM. (b)(i) A child enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in section 3317.014 of the Revised Code may be counted both in formula ADM and category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM. Such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion as the percentage of time that the child spends in the career-technical education programs or classes. (ii) A child enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in section 3317.014 of the Revised Code may be counted both in enrolled ADM and category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM. Such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion as the percentage of time that the child spends in the career-technical education programs or classes. (4) Based on the information reported under this section, the department shall determine the total student count, as defined in section 3301.011 of the Revised Code, for each school district. (D)(1) The superintendent of each joint vocational school district shall report and certify to the department as of the last day of October, March, and June of each year the enrollment of students receiving services from schools under the superintendent's supervision so that the department can calculate the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, and for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership. The enrollment reported and certified by the superintendent, except as otherwise provided in this division, shall consist of the number of students in grades six through twelve receiving any educational services from the district, except that the following categories of students shall not be included in the determination: (a) Students enrolled in adult education classes; (b) Adjacent or other district joint vocational students enrolled in the district under an open enrollment policy pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (c) Students receiving services in the district pursuant to a compact, cooperative education agreement, or a contract, but who are entitled to attend school in a city, local, or exempted village school district whose territory is not part of the territory of the joint vocational district; (d) Students for whom tuition is payable pursuant to sections 3317.081 and 3323.141 of the Revised Code. (2) To enable the department to obtain the data needed to complete the calculation of payments pursuant to this chapter, each superintendent shall certify from the report provided under division (D)(1) of this section the enrollment for each of the following categories of students: (a) Students enrolled in each individual grade included in the joint vocational district schools, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (b) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (c) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (d) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (e) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (f) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (g) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (h) Students receiving category one career-technical education services, described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (i) Students receiving category two career-technical education services, described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (j) Students receiving category three career-technical education services, described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (k) Students receiving category four career-technical education services, described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (l) Students receiving category five career-technical education services, described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (m) English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (n) English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (o) English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (p) Students who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section. A student shall not be categorically excluded from the number reported under division (D)(2)(p) of this section based on anything other than family income. The superintendent of each joint vocational school district shall also indicate the city, local, or exempted village school district in which each joint vocational district pupil is entitled to attend school pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (E) In each school of each city, local, exempted village, joint vocational, and cooperative education school district there shall be maintained a record of school enrollment, which record shall accurately show, for each day the school is in session, the actual enrollment in regular day classes. For the purpose of determining the enrollment of students, the enrollment figure of any school shall not include any pupils except those pupils described by division (A) or (D) of this section. The record of enrollment for each school shall be maintained in such manner that no pupil shall be counted as enrolled prior to the actual date of entry in the school and also in such manner that where for any cause a pupil permanently withdraws from the school that pupil shall not be counted as enrolled from and after the date of such withdrawal. There shall not be included in the enrollment of any school any of the following: (1) Any pupil who has graduated from the twelfth grade of a public or nonpublic high school; (2) Any pupil who is not a resident of the state; (3) Any pupil who was enrolled in the schools of the district during the previous school year when assessments were administered under section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code but did not take one or more of the assessments required by that section and was not excused pursuant to division (C)(1) or (3) of that section; (4) Any pupil who has attained the age of twenty-two years, except for veterans of the armed services whose attendance was interrupted before completing the recognized twelve-year course of the public schools by reason of induction or enlistment in the armed forces and who apply for reenrollment in the public school system of their residence not later than four years after termination of war or their honorable discharge; (5) Any pupil who has a certificate of high school equivalence as defined in section 5107.40 of the Revised Code. If, however, any veteran described by division (E)(4) of this section elects to enroll in special courses organized for veterans for whom tuition is paid under the provisions of federal laws, or otherwise, that veteran shall not be included in the enrollment of students determined under this section. Notwithstanding division (E)(3) of this section, the enrollment of any school may include a pupil who did not take an assessment required by section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code if the department of education and workforce grants a waiver from the requirement to take the assessment to the specific pupil and a parent is not paying tuition for the pupil pursuant to section 3313.6410 of the Revised Code. The department may grant such a waiver only for good cause in accordance with rules adopted by the department. The enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, transportation ADM, and, for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership of any school district shall be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the department. (F)(1) If a student attending a community school under Chapter 3314., or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code is not included in the formula ADM calculated for the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student in accordance with division (C)(2) of this section. (2) If a student awarded an educational choice scholarship is not included in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student resides, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student. (3) If a student awarded a scholarship under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program is not included in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student resides, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student. (G)(1)(a) The superintendent of an institution operating a special education program pursuant to section 3323.091 of the Revised Code shall, for the programs under such superintendent's supervision, certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the director of education and workforce, both of the following: (i) The unduplicated count of the number of all children with disabilities other than preschool children with disabilities receiving services at the institution for each category of disability described in divisions (A) to (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled; (ii) The unduplicated count of the number of all preschool children with disabilities in classes or programs for whom the district is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, reported according to the categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. (b) The superintendent of an institution with career-technical education units approved under section 3317.05 of the Revised Code shall, for the units under the superintendent's supervision, certify to the department the enrollment in those units, in the manner prescribed by the director of education and workforce. (2) The superintendent of each county board of developmental disabilities that maintains special education classes under section 3317.20 of the Revised Code or provides services to preschool children with disabilities pursuant to an agreement between the county board and the appropriate school district shall do both of the following: (a) Certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, the enrollment in classes under section 3317.20 of the Revised Code for each school district that has placed children in the classes; (b) Certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, the unduplicated count of the number of all preschool children with disabilities enrolled in classes for which the board is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, reported according to the categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, and the number of those classes. (H) Except as provided in division (I) of this section, when any city, local, or exempted village school district provides instruction for a nonresident pupil whose attendance is unauthorized attendance as defined in section 3327.06 of the Revised Code, that pupil's enrollment shall not be included in that district's enrollment figure used in calculating the district's payments under this chapter. The reporting official shall report separately the enrollment of all pupils whose attendance in the district is unauthorized attendance, and the enrollment of each such pupil shall be credited to the school district in which the pupil is entitled to attend school under division (B) of section 3313.64 or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code as determined by the department. (I) This division shall not apply on or after September 30, 2021. (1) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district admitting a scholarship student of a pilot project district pursuant to division (C) of section 3313.976 of the Revised Code may count such student in its enrollment. (2) In any year for which funds are appropriated for pilot project scholarship programs, a school district implementing a state-sponsored pilot project scholarship program that year pursuant to sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code may count in its enrollment: (a) All children residing in the district and utilizing a scholarship to attend kindergarten in any alternative school, as defined in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code; (b) All children who were enrolled in the district in the preceding year who are utilizing a scholarship to attend an alternative school. (J) The superintendent of each cooperative education school district shall certify to the director of education and workforce, in a manner prescribed by the department, the applicable enrollments for all students in the cooperative education district, also indicating the city, local, or exempted village district where each pupil is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (K) If the director of education and workforce determines that a component of the enrollment certified or reported by a district superintendent, or other reporting entity, is not correct, the director of education and workforce may order that the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, or both be adjusted in the amount of the error. Sec. 3317.18. (A) As used in this section, the terms "Chapter 133. securities," "credit enhancement facilities," "debt charges," "general obligation," "legislation," "public obligations," and "securities" have the same meanings as in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of education of any school district authorizing the issuance of securities under section 133.10 or 3313.372 of the Revised Code or general obligation Chapter 133. securities may adopt legislation requesting the department of education and workforce to approve, and enter into an agreement with the school district and the primary paying agent or fiscal agent for such securities providing for, the withholding and deposit of funds, otherwise due the district under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, for the payment of debt service charges on such securities. The board of education shall deliver to the state department a copy of such resolution and any additional pertinent information the department may require. The department and the office of budget and management shall evaluate each request received from a school district under this section and the department, with the advice and consent of the director of budget and management, shall approve or deny each request based on all of the following: (1) Whether approval of the request will enhance the marketability of the securities for which the request is made; (2) Any other pertinent factors or limitations established in rules made under division (I) of this section, including: (a) Current and projected obligations of funds due to the requesting school district under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code including obligations of those funds to public obligations or relevant credit enhancement facilities under this section, Chapter 133. and section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, and under any other similar provisions of law; (b) Whether the department of education and workforce or the office of budget and management has any reason to believe the requesting school district will be unable to pay when due the debt charges on the securities for which the request is made. The department may require a school district to establish schedules for the payment of all debt charges that take into account the amount and timing of anticipated distributions of funds to the district under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. (C) If the department approves the request of a school district to withhold and deposit funds pursuant to this section, the department shall enter into a written agreement with the district and the primary paying agent or fiscal agent for the securities which shall provide for the withholding of funds pursuant to this section for the payment of debt charges on those securities, and may include both of the following: (1) Provisions for certification by the district to the department, at a time prior to any date for the payment of applicable debt charges, whether the district is able to pay those debt charges when due; (2) Requirements that the district deposit amounts for the payment of debt charges on the securities with the primary paying agent or fiscal agent for the securities prior to the date on which those debt charge payments are due to the owners or holders of the securities. (D) Whenever a district notifies the department that it will be unable to pay debt charges when they are due, subject to the withholding provisions of this section, or whenever the applicable paying agent or fiscal agent notifies the department that it has not timely received from a school district the full amount needed for the payment when due of those debt charges to the holders or owners of such securities, the department shall immediately contact the school district and the paying agent or fiscal agent to confirm or determine whether the district is unable to make the required payment by the date on which it is due. Upon demand of the treasurer of state while holding a school district obligation purchased under division (G)(1) of section 135.143 of the Revised Code, the department, without a request of the school district, shall withhold and deposit funds pursuant to this section for payment of debt service charges on that obligation. If the department confirms or determines that the district will be unable to make such payment and payment will not be made pursuant to a credit enhancement facility, the department shall promptly pay to the applicable primary paying agent or fiscal agent the lesser of the amount due for debt charges or the amount due the district for the remainder of the fiscal year under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. If this amount is insufficient to pay the total amount then due the agent for the payment of debt charges, the department shall pay to the agent each fiscal year thereafter, and until the full amount due the agent for unpaid debt charges is paid in full, the lesser of the remaining amount due the agent for debt charges or the amount due the district for the fiscal year under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. (E) The department may make any payments under this division by direct deposit of funds by electronic transfer. Any amount received by a paying agent or fiscal agent under this section shall be applied only to the payment of debt charges on the securities of the school district subject to this section or to the reimbursement to the provider of a credit enhancement facility that has paid such debt charges. (F) To the extent a school district whose securities are subject to this section is unable to pay applicable debt charges because of the failure to collect property taxes levied for the payment of those debt charges, the district may transfer to or deposit into any fund that would have received payments under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code that were withheld under this section any such delinquent property taxes when later collected, provided that transfer or deposit shall be limited to the amounts withheld from that fund under this section. (G) The department may make payments under this section to paying agents or fiscal agents only from and to the extent that money is appropriated by the general assembly for Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code or for the purposes of this section. No securities of a school district to which this section is made applicable constitute an obligation or a debt or a pledge of the faith, credit, or taxing power of the state, and the holders or owners of such securities have no right to have taxes levied or appropriations made by the general assembly for the payment of debt charges on those securities, and those securities, if the department requires, shall contain a statement to that effect. The agreement for or the actual withholding and payment of moneys under this section does not constitute the assumption by the state of any debt of a school district. (H) In the case of securities subject to the withholding provisions of this section, the issuing board of education shall appoint a paying agent or fiscal agent who is not an officer or employee of the school district. (I) The department, with the advice of the office of budget and management, may adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section for the implementation of this section and division (B) of section 133.25 of the Revised Code as it relates to the withholding and depositing of payments under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to secure payment of debt charges on school district securities. Those rules shall include criteria for the evaluation and approval or denial of school district requests for withholding under this section and limits on the obligation for the purpose of paying debt charges or reimbursing credit enhancement facilities of funds otherwise to be paid to school districts under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. (J) The authority granted by this section is in addition to and not a limitation on any other authorizations granted by or pursuant to law for the same or similar purposes. Sec. 3317.25. (A) As used in this section, "disadvantaged pupil impact aid" means the following: (1) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the funds received under division (A)(4)(a) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; (2) For a joint vocational school district, the funds received under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code; (3) For a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, the funds received under division (A)(4)(b) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; (4) For a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, the funds received under division (A)(4)(b) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school, or STEM school shall spend the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives for any of the following initiatives or a combination of any of the following initiatives: (a) Extended school day and school year; (b) Reading improvement and intervention that is aligned with the science of reading and evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction; (c) Instructional technology or blended learning; (d) Professional development in the science of reading and evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction for teachers of students in kindergarten through third grade; (e) Dropout prevention; (f) School safety and security measures; (g) Community learning centers that address barriers to learning; (h) Academic interventions for students in any of grades six through twelve; (i) Employment of an individual who has successfully completed the bright new leaders for Ohio schools program as a principal or an assistant principal under section 3319.272 of the Revised Code; (j) Mental health services, including telehealth services, community-based behavioral health services, and recovery supports; (k) Culturally appropriate, evidence-based or evidence-informed prevention services, including youth-led programming and curricula to promote mental health and prevent substance use and suicide, and trauma-informed services; (l) Services for homeless youth; (m) Services for child welfare involved youth; (n) Community liaisons or programs that connect students to community resources, including behavioral wellness coordinators and city connects, communities in schools, and other similar programs; (o) Physical health care services, including telehealth services and community-based health services; (p) Family engagement and support services; (q) Student services provided prior to or after the regularly scheduled school day or any time school is not in session, including mentoring programs. (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school shall spend the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives for one or more initiatives specified by the general assembly. (C)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school that is subject to the requirements of this section shall develop a plan for utilizing the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives in coordination with at least one of the following community partners: (a) A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services established under Chapter 340. of the Revised Code; (b) An educational service center; (c) A county board of developmental disabilities; (d) A community mental health prevention or treatment provider; (e) A board of health of a city or general health district; (f) A county department of job and family services; (g) A nonprofit organization with experience serving children; (h) A public hospital agency. (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school that is subject to the requirements of this section shall develop a plan for utilizing the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives in the manner specified by the general assembly, if the general assembly requires city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school districts, community schools, and STEM schools to develop such a plan. (D) After the end of each fiscal year, each city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school shall submit a report to the department of education and workforce describing the initiative or initiatives on which the district's or school's disadvantaged pupil impact aid were spent during that fiscal year. For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, this report shall be submitted in a manner prescribed by the department and shall also describe the amount of money that was spent on each initiative. (E) Starting in 2015, the department shall submit a report of the information it receives under division (C) of this section to the general assembly not later than the first day of December of each odd-numbered year in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code.Not later than the thirty-first day of October of each year, the department of education and workforce shall publish on its web site the total disadvantaged pupil impact aid each district and school received for the prior school year and each district's and school's expenditures of those funds. The department shall develop a uniform mechanism for districts and schools to report this data. Sec. 3319.2310. (A) As used in this section, "other public school" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall do both of the following: (1) Maintain a training course for licensed educators that serves as an introduction to the science of reading; (2) Develop a competency-based training course for licensed educators that updates and reinforces educators' knowledge and skills in the science of reading; (3) Develop a list of approved training courses that are more rigorous than the course described in division (B)(2) of this section that may be taken in place of the course described under division (B)(2) of this section if an individual chooses. (C) Each individual employed by a school district or other public school as a teacher, administrator, school psychologist, or speech-language pathologist shall complete training in the science of reading in accordance with division (C) of this section. (1) An individual hired by the district or other public school as a teacher or administrator prior to July 1, 2025, shall complete the training described in division (B)(2) of this section or a training from the list described in division (B)(3) of this section by June 30, 2030, and every five years thereafter. (2) An individual hired by the district or other public school as a teacher or administrator on or after July 1, 2025, shall complete the training described in division (B)(1) of this section within one year after the date of hire and shall complete the training described in division (B)(2) of this section or a training from the list described in division (B)(3) of this section every five years thereafter. However, an individual shall not be required to complete the training described in division (B)(1) of this section if the district superintendent or head administrator of the other public school has verified that the individual did either of the following within five years prior to the date of hire: (a) Completed that training or a similar training, as determined by the department; (b) Completed appropriate coursework in the science of reading as part of the individual's educator or licensure preparation program. (3) An individual employed by the district or other public school as a school psychologist or speech-language pathologist shall complete the training described in division (B)(1) of this section by June 30, 2027, and shall complete the training described in division (B)(2) of this section or a training from the list described in division (B)(3) of this section every five years thereafter. (D) A professional development committee established under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code shall count training described in division (B) of this section toward professional development requirements for educator licensure renewal. The committee shall permit an individual to apply any hours earned over the minimum amount of hours required for professional development coursework for licensure renewal to the next renewal period for that license. Sec. 3319.265. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, the state board of education shall add additional grade levels to an individual's valid alternative resident educator license to authorize the individual to provide instruction at any grade level from pre-kindergarten to twelve or any combination of grade levels as assigned by the individual's employing district based on local staffing needs if the following conditions are satisfied: (1) The employing district informs the state board of education that due to local staffing needs, the district plans to assign the educator to a grade level outside of the educator's current license. (2) The educator is teaching a subject area aligned with any of the following: (a) The educator's bachelor's degree; (b) The educator's graduate degree; (c) The educator's professional experience; (d) Demonstrated subject content competency through a passing score on a subject content examination as determined by the state board of education. (3) The educator possesses the knowledge, skills, and professional capacity necessary to instruct students at the assigned grade level. (4) The educator completes any required pedagogical training prescribed by the state board within the timeframes established for alternative resident educator license holders. (B) The employing district's assignment decisions shall satisfy grade band licensure requirements otherwise established in statute or rule. (C) This section supersedes any conflicting grade band licensure restrictions contained elsewhere in the Revised Code or administrative rule for individuals holding an alternative resident educator license. Sec. 3319.31. (A) As used in this section and sections 3123.41 to 3123.50 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code, "license" means a certificate, license, or permit described in this chapter or in division (B) of section 3301.071 or in section 3301.074 of the Revised Code or a registration described in division (B) of section 3302.151, section 3310.411, or section 3319.221 of the Revised Code. (B) For any of the following reasons, the state board of education, except as provided in division (H) of this section and in accordance with Chapter 119. and section 3319.311 of the Revised Code, may refuse to issue a license to an applicant; may limit a license it issues to an applicant; may suspend, revoke, or limit a license that has been issued to any person; or may revoke a license that has been issued to any person and has expired: (1) Engaging in an immoral act, incompetence, negligence, or conduct that is unbecoming to the applicant's or person's position; (2) A plea of guilty to, a finding of guilt by a jury or court of, or a conviction of any of the following: (a) A felony other than a felony listed in division (C) of this section; (b) An offense of violence other than an offense of violence listed in division (C) of this section; (c) A theft offense, as defined in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code, other than a theft offense listed in division (C) of this section; (d) A drug abuse offense, as defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code, that is not a minor misdemeanor, other than a drug abuse offense listed in division (C) of this section; (e) A violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation that is substantively comparable to an offense listed in divisions (B)(2)(a) to (d) of this section. (3) A judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction under section 2951.041 of the Revised Code, or agreeing to participate in a pre-trial diversion program under section 2935.36 of the Revised Code, or a similar diversion program under rules of a court, for any offense listed in division (B)(2) or (C) of this section; (4) Failure to comply with section 3314.40, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, 5126.253, or 5502.262 of the Revised Code; (5) Purposely using or intentionally releasing information that is confidential under state or federal law concerning a student or student's family members for purposes other than student instruction in violation of the licensure code of professional conduct for Ohio educators developed by the state board of education. (C) Upon learning of a plea of guilty to, a finding of guilt by a jury or court of, or a conviction of any of the offenses listed in this division by a person who holds a current or expired license or is an applicant for renewal of a license, the state board or the superintendent of public instruction, if the state board has delegated the duty pursuant to division (D) of this section, shall by a written order revoke the person's license or deny renewal of the license to the person. The state board or the superintendent shall revoke a license that has been issued to a person to whom this division applies and has expired in the same manner as a license that has not expired. Revocation of a license or denial of renewal of a license under this division is effective immediately at the time and date that the board or superintendent issues the written order and is not subject to appeal in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Revocation of a license or denial of renewal of license under this division remains in force during the pendency of an appeal by the person of the plea of guilty, finding of guilt, or conviction that is the basis of the action taken under this division. The state board or superintendent shall take the action required by this division for a violation of division (B)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code; a violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.15, 2903.18, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.071, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.241, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.311, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2907.33, 2907.34, 2909.02, 2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2913.44, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2917.33, 2919.12, 2919.121, 2919.13, 2919.25, 2921.02, 2921.03, 2921.04, 2921.05, 2921.11, 2921.34, 2921.41, 2923.122, 2923.123, 2923.161, 2923.17, 2923.21, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.32, 2925.36, 2925.37, 2927.24, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; a violation of section 2907.231 of the Revised Code unless the offender was coerced into committing a violation of that section; a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996; a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date; felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code; or a violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation that is substantively comparable to an offense listed in this paragraph. (D) The state board may delegate to the superintendent of public instruction the authority to revoke a person's license or to deny renewal of a license to a person under division (C) or (F) of this section. (E)(1) If the plea of guilty, finding of guilt, or conviction that is the basis of the action taken under division (B)(2) or (C) of this section, or under the version of division (F) of section 3319.311 of the Revised Code in effect prior to September 12, 2008, is overturned on appeal, upon exhaustion of the criminal appeal, the clerk of the court that overturned the plea, finding, or conviction or, if applicable, the clerk of the court that accepted an appeal from the court that overturned the plea, finding, or conviction, shall notify the state board that the plea, finding, or conviction has been overturned. Within thirty days after receiving the notification, the state board shall initiate proceedings to reconsider the revocation or denial of the person's license in accordance with division (E)(2) of this section. In addition, the person whose license was revoked or denied may file with the state board a petition for reconsideration of the revocation or denial along with appropriate court documents. (2) Upon receipt of a court notification or a petition and supporting court documents under division (E)(1) of this section, the state board, after offering the person an opportunity for an adjudication hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall determine whether the person committed the act in question in the prior criminal action against the person that is the basis of the revocation or denial and may continue the revocation or denial, may reinstate the person's license, with or without limits, or may grant the person a new license, with or without limits. The decision of the board shall be based on grounds for revoking, denying, suspending, or limiting a license adopted by rule under division (G) of this section and in accordance with the evidentiary standards the board employs for all other licensure hearings. The decision of the board under this division is subject to appeal under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (3) A person whose license is revoked or denied under division (C) of this section shall not apply for any license if the plea of guilty, finding of guilt, or conviction that is the basis of the revocation or denial, upon completion of the criminal appeal, either is upheld or is overturned but the state board continues the revocation or denial under division (E)(2) of this section and that continuation is upheld on final appeal. (F) The state board may take action under division (B) of this section, and the state board or the superintendent shall take the action required under division (C) of this section, on the basis of substantially comparable conduct occurring in a jurisdiction outside this state or occurring before a person applies for or receives any license. (G) The state board may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to carry out this section and section 3319.311 of the Revised Code. (H) The state board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a conviction of, a plea of guilty to, or a finding of guilt by a jury or court of an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3319.311. (A)(1) The state board of education, or the superintendent of public instruction on behalf of the board, may investigate any information received about a person that reasonably appears to be a basis for action under section 3319.31 of the Revised Code, including information received pursuant to section 3314.40, 3319.291, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, 5126.253, or 5153.176 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the board shall contract with the office of the Ohio attorney general to conduct any investigation of that nature. The board shall pay for the costs of the contract only from moneys in the occupational licensing and regulatory fund established in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, all information received pursuant to section 3314.40, 3319.291, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, 5126.253, or 5153.176 of the Revised Code, and all information obtained during an investigation is confidential and is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. If an investigation is conducted under this division regarding information received about a person and no action is taken against the person under this section or section 3319.31 of the Revised Code within two years of the completion of the investigation, all records of the investigation shall be expunged. (2) In the case of a person about whom the board has learned of a plea of guilty to, finding of guilt by a jury or court of, or a conviction of an offense listed in division (C) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code, or substantially comparable conduct occurring in a jurisdiction outside this state, the board or the superintendent of public instruction need not conduct any further investigation and shall take the action required by division (C) or (F) of that section. Except as provided in division (G) of this section, all information obtained by the board or the superintendent of public instruction pertaining to the action is a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (B) The superintendent of public instruction shall review the results of each investigation of a person conducted under division (A)(1) of this section and shall determine, on behalf of the state board, whether the results warrant initiating action under division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. The superintendent shall advise the board of such determination at a meeting of the board. Within fourteen days of the next meeting of the board, any member of the board may ask that the question of initiating action under section 3319.31 of the Revised Code be placed on the board's agenda for that next meeting. Prior to initiating that action against any person, the person's name and any other personally identifiable information shall remain confidential. (C) The board shall take no action against a person under division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code without providing the person with written notice of the charges and with an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (D) For purposes of an investigation under division (A)(1) of this section or a hearing under division (C) of this section or under division (E)(2) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code, the board, or the superintendent on behalf of the board, may administer oaths, order the taking of depositions, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, accounts, papers, records, documents, and testimony. The issuance of subpoenas under this division may be by certified mail, regular mail with a certificate of mailing, or other form of delivery with proof of delivery, including electronic delivery with electronic proof of delivery, or personal delivery to the person. (E) The superintendent, on behalf of the board, may enter into a consent agreement with a person against whom action is being taken under division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. The board may adopt rules governing the superintendent's action under this division. (F) No surrender of a license shall be effective until the board takes action to accept the surrender unless the surrender is pursuant to a consent agreement entered into under division (E) of this section. (G) The name of any person who is not required to report information under section 3314.40, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, 5126.253, or 5153.176 of the Revised Code, but who in good faith provides information to the state board or superintendent of public instruction about alleged misconduct committed by a person who holds a license or has applied for issuance or renewal of a license, shall be confidential and shall not be released. Any such person shall be immune from any civil liability that otherwise might be incurred or imposed for injury, death, or loss to person or property as a result of the provision of that information. (H)(1) No person shall knowingly make a false report to the superintendent of public instruction or the state board of education alleging misconduct by an employee of a public or chartered nonpublic school or an employee of the operator of a community school established under Chapter 3314. or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (2)(a) In any civil action brought against a person in which it is alleged and proved that the person violated division (H)(1) of this section, the court shall award the prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees and costs that the prevailing party incurred in the civil action or as a result of the false report that was the basis of the violation. (b) If a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (H)(1) of this section, if the subject of the false report that was the basis of the violation was charged with any violation of a law or ordinance as a result of the false report, and if the subject of the false report is found not to be guilty of the charges brought against the subject as a result of the false report or those charges are dismissed, the court that sentences the person for the violation of division (H)(1) of this section, as part of the sentence, shall order the person to pay restitution to the subject of the false report, in an amount equal to reasonable attorney's fees and costs that the subject of the false report incurred as a result of or in relation to the charges. Sec. 3319.319. The appointing or hiring officer of a school district or school located in Ohio or another state may request from the state board of education any report received under sections section 3314.40, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, or 5126.253 of the Revised Code regarding an individual who is under consideration for employment by the district or school. If the superintendent of public instruction has received a report under any of those sections regarding the individual, the state superintendent shall provide the contents of the report to the requesting officer. Upon provision of the contents of the report to the requesting officer, the state superintendent shall notify the officer that the information provided is confidential and may not be disseminated to any other person or entity. If the state superintendent provides the contents of a report to an appointing or hiring officer under this section, the state superintendent shall document the information provided in the record of any investigation undertaken pursuant to section 3319.311 of the Revised Code based on the report. Such documentation shall include a list of the information provided, the date the information was provided, and the name and contact information of the appointing or hiring officer to whom the information was provided. Sec. 3319.39. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (F)(2)(b) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code, the appointing or hiring officer of the board of education of a school district, the governing board of an educational service center, or of a chartered nonpublic school shall request the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation to conduct a criminal records check with respect to any applicant who has applied to the school district, educational service center, or school for employment in any position. The appointing or hiring officer shall request that the superintendent include information from the federal bureau of investigation in the criminal records check, unless all of the following apply to the applicant: (a) The applicant is applying to be an instructor of adult education. (b) The duties of the position for which the applicant is applying do not involve routine interaction with a child or regular responsibility for the care, custody, or control of a child or, if the duties do involve such interaction or responsibility, during any period of time in which the applicant, if hired, has such interaction or responsibility, another employee of the school district, educational service center, or chartered nonpublic school will be present in the same room with the child or, if outdoors, will be within a thirty-yard radius of the child or have visual contact with the child. (c) The applicant presents proof that the applicant has been a resident of this state for the five-year period immediately prior to the date upon which the criminal records check is requested or provides evidence that within that five-year period the superintendent has requested information about the applicant from the federal bureau of investigation in a criminal records check. (2) A person required by division (A)(1) of this section to request a criminal records check shall provide to each applicant a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, provide to each applicant a standard impression sheet to obtain fingerprint impressions prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, obtain the completed form and impression sheet from each applicant, and forward the completed form and impression sheet to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation at the time the person requests a criminal records check pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section. (3) An applicant who receives pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a copy of an impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section and who is requested to complete the form and provide a set of fingerprint impressions shall complete the form or provide all the information necessary to complete the form and shall provide the impression sheet with the impressions of the applicant's fingerprints. If an applicant, upon request, fails to provide the information necessary to complete the form or fails to provide impressions of the applicant's fingerprints, the board of education of a school district, governing board of an educational service center, or governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall not employ that applicant for any position. (4) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, an applicant who meets the conditions prescribed in divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section and who, within the two-year period prior to the date of application, was the subject of a criminal records check under this section prior to being hired for short-term employment with the school district, educational service center, or chartered nonpublic school to which application is being made shall not be required to undergo a criminal records check prior to the applicant's rehiring by that district, service center, or school. (B)(1) Except as provided in rules adopted by the state board of education in accordance with division (E) of this section and as provided in division (B)(3) of this section, no board of education of a school district, no governing board of an educational service center, and no governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall employ a person if the person previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.18, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.071, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2907.231 of the Revised Code unless the offender was coerced into committing a violation of that section, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense, or felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code; (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, another state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses or violations described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section. (2) A board, governing board of an educational service center, or a governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may employ an applicant conditionally until the criminal records check required by this section is completed and the board or governing authority receives the results of the criminal records check. If the results of the criminal records check indicate that, pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, the applicant does not qualify for employment, the board or governing authority shall release the applicant from employment. (3) No board and no governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall employ a teacher who previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the offenses listed in section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Each board and each governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall pay to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation the fee prescribed pursuant to division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code for each criminal records check conducted in accordance with that section upon the request pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section of the appointing or hiring officer of the board or governing authority. (2) A board and the governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may charge an applicant a fee for the costs it incurs in obtaining a criminal records check under this section. A fee charged under this division shall not exceed the amount of fees the board or governing authority pays under division (C)(1) of this section. If a fee is charged under this division, the board or governing authority shall notify the applicant at the time of the applicant's initial application for employment of the amount of the fee and that, unless the fee is paid, the board or governing authority will not consider the applicant for employment. (D) The report of any criminal records check conducted by the bureau of criminal identification and investigation in accordance with section 109.572 of the Revised Code and pursuant to a request under division (A)(1) of this section is not a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person other than the applicant who is the subject of the criminal records check or the applicant's representative, the board or governing authority requesting the criminal records check or its representative, and any court, hearing officer, or other necessary individual involved in a case dealing with the denial of employment to the applicant. (E) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section, including rules specifying circumstances under which the board or governing authority may hire a person who has been convicted of an offense listed in division (B)(1) or (3) of this section but who meets standards in regard to rehabilitation set by the state board. Any rules adopted by the state board under this division regarding the employment of a person holding a certificate, license, or permit described in this chapter or in division (B) of section 3301.071 or in section 3301.074 of the Revised Code shall comply with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. The state board shall amend rule 3301-83-23 of the Ohio Administrative Code that took effect August 27, 2009, and that specifies the offenses that disqualify a person for employment as a school bus or school van driver and establishes rehabilitation standards for school bus and school van drivers. (F) Any person required by division (A)(1) of this section to request a criminal records check shall inform each person, at the time of the person's initial application for employment, of the requirement to provide a set of fingerprint impressions and that a criminal records check is required to be conducted and satisfactorily completed in accordance with section 109.572 of the Revised Code if the person comes under final consideration for appointment or employment as a precondition to employment for the school district, educational service center, or school for that position. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Applicant" means a person who is under final consideration for appointment or employment in a position with a board of education, governing board of an educational service center, or a chartered nonpublic school, except that "applicant" does not include a person already employed by a board or chartered nonpublic school who is under consideration for a different position with such board or school. (2) "Teacher" means a person holding an educator license or permit issued under section 3319.22 or 3319.301 of the Revised Code and teachers in a chartered nonpublic school. (3) "Criminal records check" has the same meaning as in section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (4) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (H) If the board of education of a local school district adopts a resolution requesting the assistance of the educational service center in which the local district has territory in conducting criminal records checks of substitute teachers and substitutes for other district employees under this section, the appointing or hiring officer of such educational service center shall serve for purposes of this section as the appointing or hiring officer of the local board in the case of hiring substitute teachers and other substitute employees for the local district. Sec. 3319.393. (A) Each school district and chartered nonpublic school shall include the following notice in boldface type in each employment application: "ANY PERSON WHO KNOWINGLY MAKES A FALSE STATEMENT IS GUILTY OF FALSIFICATION UNDER SECTION 2921.13 OF THE REVISED CODE, WHICH IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE FIRST DEGREE." (B)(1) Each district and chartered nonpublic school shall consult the "educator profile" database maintained on the web site of the state board of education prior to making any hiring decision. (2) After consulting the "educator profile" database, a district or chartered nonpublic school may further discern the employment, disciplinary, or criminal record of an applicant for employment in either or both of the following ways: (a) Consulting the state board of education's office of professional conduct in accordance with section 3319.319 of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual has been the subject of either: (i) Any notice to the superintendent of public instruction under section 3314.40, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, or 5126.253 of the Revised Code; (ii) Any disciplinary actions conducted by the state board. (b) Consulting any prior education-related employers of the individual. (3) A district or chartered nonpublic school may require additional background checks other than the criminal records checks authorized under sections 109.574 to 109.577 of the Revised Code or those required under section 3319.39 or 3319.391 of the Revised Code for any applicant for employment or potential volunteer. (C) A district or chartered nonpublic school may conditionally employ an individual pending the receipt of information sought in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section. Should that information indicate that the individual has engaged in conduct unbecoming to the teaching profession or has committed an offense that prevents, limits, or otherwise affects the applicant's employment with the district or school, the district or chartered nonpublic school may release the individual from employment. Sec. 3320.02. (A) A student enrolled in a public school may engage in religious expression before, during, and after school hours in the same manner and to the same extent that a student is permitted to engage in secular activities or expression before, during, and after school hours. (B) A school district, community school established under Chapter 3314., or STEM school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code shall give the same access to school facilities to students who wish to conduct a meeting for the purpose of engaging in religious expression as is given to secular student groups, without regard to the content of a student's or group's expression. Sec. 3320.03. No school district board of education, governing authority of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or governing body of a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or board of trustees of a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code shall prohibit a student from engaging in religious expression in the completion of homework, artwork, or other written or oral assignments. Assignment grades and scores shall be calculated using ordinary academic standards of substance and relevance, including any legitimate pedagogical concerns, and shall not penalize or reward a student based on the religious content of a student's work. Sec. 3325.08. (A) A diploma shall be granted by the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services to any student enrolled in the state school for the blind or the state school for the deaf to whom all of the following apply: (1) The student has successfully completed the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the student for the student's high school education pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code; (2) Subject to section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, the student has met the assessment requirements of division (A)(2)(a) or (b)(A)(2) of this section, as applicable. (a) If the student entered the ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014, the student either: (i) Has attained at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments prescribed by that division unless division (L) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code applies to the student; (ii) Has satisfied the alternative conditions prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. (b) If the student entered the ninth grade on or after July 1, 2014, the The student has met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code, except to the extent that division (L)(K) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code applies to the student. (3) The student is not eligible to receive an honors diploma granted pursuant to division (B) of this section. No diploma shall be granted under this division to anyone except as provided under this division. (B) In lieu of a diploma granted under division (A) of this section, the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall grant an honors diploma, in the same manner that the boards of education of school districts grant such diplomas under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code, to any student enrolled in the state school for the blind or the state school for the deaf who accomplishes all of the following: (1) Successfully completes the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the student for the student's high school education pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code; (2) Subject to section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, has met the assessment requirements of division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. (a) If the student entered the ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014, the student either: (i) Has attained at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments prescribed under that division; (ii) Has satisfied the alternative conditions prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. (b) If the student entered the ninth grade on or after July 1, 2014, the student has met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. (3) Has met additional criteria for granting an honors diploma. These additional criteria shall be the same as those prescribed by the department of education and workforce under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code for the granting of such diplomas by school districts. No honors diploma shall be granted to anyone failing to comply with this division and not more than one honors diploma shall be granted to any student under this division. (C) A diploma or honors diploma awarded under this section shall be signed by the director of education and workforce and the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services. Each diploma shall bear the date of its issue and be in such form as the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services prescribes. (D) Upon granting a diploma to a student under this section, the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall provide notice of receipt of the diploma to the board of education of the school district where the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code when not residing at the state school for the blind or the state school for the deaf. The notice shall indicate the type of diploma granted. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.7118, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3319.90, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Sec. 3327.014. The board of education of a city, exempted village, local, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district may adopt a policy authorizing the district superintendent or other district administrative personnel as provided in the policy to suspend a student only from school bus riding privileges for a period of time as provided in the policy. A policy adopted under this section shall provide a student notice of an intended suspension under the policy and an opportunity to appear before the district superintendent or other district personnel as provided in the policy before a suspension under the policy is imposed. If a board of education adopts a policy under this section, the board shall post the policy in a central location in each school building of the district or on the district's web site and make it available to students upon request. Sec. 3331.02. (A) The superintendent of schools or the chief administrative officer, as appropriate pursuant to section 3331.01 of the Revised Code, shall not issue an age and schooling certificate until the superintendent or chief administrative officer has received, examined, approved, and filed the following papers duly executed: (1) The written pledge or promise of the person, partnership, or corporation to legally employ the child, and for this purpose work performed by a minor, directly and exclusively for the benefit of such minor's parent, in the farm home or on the farm of such parent is legal employment, irrespective of any contract of employment, or the absence thereof, to permit the child to attend school as provided in section 3321.08 of the Revised Code, and give notice of the nonuse of an age and schooling certificate within five days from the date of the child's withdrawal or dismissal from the service of that person, partnership, or corporation, giving the reasons for such withdrawal or dismissal; (2) The child's school record or notification. As used in this division, a "school record" means documents properly filled out and signed by the person in charge of the school which the child last attended, giving the recorded age of the child, the child's address, standing in studies, rating in conduct, and attendance in days during the school year of the child's last attendance; "notification" means the information submitted to the superintendent by the parent of a child exempt from attendance at school pursuant to section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (3) Evidence of the age of the child as follows: (a) A certified copy of an original birth record or a certification of birth, issued in accordance with Chapter 3705. of the Revised Code, or by an officer charged with the duty of recording births in another state or country, shall be conclusive evidence of the age of the child; (b) In the absence of such birth record or certification of birth, a passport, or duly attested transcript thereof, showing the date and place of birth of the child, filed with a register of passports at a port of entry of the United States; or an attested transcript of the certificate of birth or baptism or other religious record, showing the date and place of birth of the child, shall be conclusive evidence of the age of the child; (c) In case none of the above proofs of age can be produced, other documentary evidence, except the affidavit of the parent, guardian, or custodian, satisfactory to the superintendent or chief administrative officer may be accepted in lieu thereof; (d) In case no documentary proof of age can be procured, the superintendent or chief administrative officer may receive and file an application signed by the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child that a medical certificate be secured to establish the sufficiency of the age of the child, which application shall state the alleged age of the child, the place and date of birth, the child's present residence, and such further facts as may be of assistance in determining the age of the child, and shall certify that the person signing the application is unable to obtain any of the documentary proofs specified in divisions (A)(3)(a), (b), and (c) of this section; and if the superintendent or chief administrative officer is satisfied that a reasonable effort to procure such documentary proof has been without success such application shall be granted and the certificate of the school physician or if there be none, of a physician, a physician assistant, a clinical nurse specialist, or a certified nurse practitioner employed by the board of education, that said physician, physician assistant, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner is satisfied that the child is above the age required for an age and schooling certificate as stated in section 3331.01 of the Revised Code, shall be accepted as sufficient evidence of age. (4) A certificate, including an athletic certificate of examination, from a physician licensed pursuant to Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, a physician assistant, a clinical nurse specialist, or a certified nurse practitioner, or from the district health commissioner, showing after a thorough examination that the child is physically fit to be employed in such occupations as are not prohibited by law for a boy or girl, as the case may be, under eighteen years of age; but a certificate with "limited" written, printed, marked, or stamped thereon may be furnished by such physician, physician assistant, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner and accepted by the superintendent or chief administrative officer in issuing a "limited" age and schooling certificate provided in section 3331.06 of the Revised Code, showing that the child is physically fit to be employed in some particular occupation not prohibited by law for a boy or girl of such child's age, as the case may be, even if the child's complete physical ability to engage in such occupation cannot be vouched for. (5) A minor work hour notification form described in division (D) of this section that is signed by the child's parent or legal guardian. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, a physical fitness certificate described in division (A)(4) of this section is valid for purposes of that division while the child remains employed in job duties of a similar nature as the job duties for which the child last was issued an age and schooling certificate. The superintendent or chief administrative officer who issues an age and schooling certificate shall determine whether job duties are similar for purposes of this division. (2) A "limited" physical fitness certificate described in division (A)(4) of this section is valid for one year. (C) The superintendent of schools or the chief administrative officer shall require a child who resides out of this state to file all the information required under division (A) of this section. The superintendent of schools or the chief administrative officer shall evaluate the information filed and determine whether to issue the age and schooling certificate using the same standards as those the superintendent or officer uses for in-state children. (D) The director of commerce shall create, and make available to the public, a minor work hour notification form that provides notice of the hours a minor may work in accordance with section 4109.07 of the Revised Code. The director shall include on the form a space for a child's parent or legal guardian to provide a signature. By signing the form, the parent or guardian acknowledges that the parent or guardian has received notice of the information on the form. Sec. 3333.041. (A) On or before the last day of December of each year, the chancellor of higher education shall submit to the governor and, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, the general assembly a report or reports concerning all of the following: (1) The status of graduates of Ohio school districts at state institutions of higher education during the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth day of September of the current calendar year. The report shall list, by school district, the number of graduates of each school district who attended a state institution of higher education and the percentage of each district's graduates enrolled in a state institution of higher education during the reporting period who were required during such period by the college or university, as a prerequisite to enrolling in those courses generally required for first-year students, to enroll in a remedial course in English, including composition or reading, mathematics, and any other area designated by the chancellor. The chancellor also shall make the information described in division (A)(1) of this section available to the board of education of each city, exempted village, and local school district. Each state institution of higher education shall, by the first day of November of each year, submit to the chancellor in the form specified by the chancellor the information the chancellor requires to compile the report. (2) The following information with respect to the Ohio tuition trust authority: (a) The name of each investment manager that is a minority business enterprise or a women's business enterprise with which the chancellor contracts; (b) The amount of assets managed by investment managers that are minority business enterprises or women's business enterprises, expressed as a percentage of assets managed by investment managers with which the chancellor has contracted; (c) Efforts by the chancellor to increase utilization of investment managers that are minority business enterprises or women's business enterprises. (3) The chancellor's strategy in assigning choose Ohio first scholarships, as established under section 3333.61 of the Revised Code, among state universities and colleges and how the actual awards fit that strategy. (B) On or before the fifteenth day of February of each year, the chancellor shall submit to the governor and, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, the general assembly a report concerning aggregate academic growth data for students assigned to graduates of teacher preparation programs approved under section 3333.048 of the Revised Code who teach English language arts or mathematics in any of grades four to eight in a public school in Ohio. For this purpose, the chancellor shall use the value-added progress dimension prescribed by section 3302.021 of the Revised Code or the alternative student academic progress measure if adopted under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. The chancellor shall aggregate the data by graduating class for each approved teacher preparation program, except that if a particular class has ten or fewer graduates to which this division applies, the chancellor shall report the data for a group of classes over a three-year period. In no case shall the report identify any individual graduate. The department of education and workforce shall share any data necessary for the report with the chancellor. (C) As used in this section: (1) "Minority business enterprise" has the same meaning as in section 122.71 of the Revised Code. (2) "State institution of higher education" and "state university" have the same meanings as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (3) "State university or college" has the same meaning as in section 3345.12 of the Revised Code. (4) "Women's business enterprise" means a business, or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint venture of any kind, that is owned and controlled by women who are United States citizens and residents of this state. Sec. 3333.048. (A) The chancellor of higher education, in consultation with the director of education and workforce, shall, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, establish metrics for the preparation of educators and other school personnel and the institutions of higher education that are engaged in their preparation. The metrics to be used in educator preparation programs shall do all of the following: (1) Be aligned with the standards and qualifications for educator licenses adopted by the state board of education under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code and the requirements of the Ohio teacher residency program established under section 3319.223 of the Revised Code; (2) Ensure that educators and other school personnel are adequately prepared to use the value-added progress dimension prescribed by section 3302.021 of the Revised Code or the alternative student academic progress measure if adopted under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (3) Ensure that all educators complete coursework in evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction aligned to the science of reading, which includes phonics, phonemic awareness, fluency comprehension, and vocabulary development, and is part of a structured literacy program; (4) Ensure that clinical preparation for all educators who are responsible for teaching reading only occur in the classrooms where the local education agency has verified that the practicing teachers have training in literacy instruction strategies aligned to the science of reading, use instructional materials aligned to the science of reading from the list established under section 3313.6028 of the Revised Code, and actively implement a structured literacy approach. (B) The chancellor shall do all of the following: (1) Develop an auditing process that clearly documents the degree to which every educator preparation program at an institution of higher education is effectively teaching the science of reading as follows: (a) By December 31, 2023, complete an initial survey of educator preparation programs, establish metrics for the audits, and update standards to reflect new requirements; (b) Grant a one-year grace period for all institutions to meet new standards and requirements under this section to begin on January 1, 2024; (c) On January 1, 2025, begin conducting audits of each institution that offers educator preparation programs. The chancellor shall revoke approval for programs that are found to be not in alignment and do not address the findings of the audit within a year. All programs shall be reviewed every four years thereafter to ensure continued alignment. (2) Annually create a summary of literacy instruction strategies and practices in place for all educator preparation programs based on the program audits, including institution-level summaries, until all programs reach the required alignment specified in division (A)(3) of this section; (3) In conjunction with the department of education and workforce, do all of the following: (a) Publicly release the summaries with local education agencies not later than the thirty-first day of March of each year; (b) Identify a list of approved vendors who can provide professional development experiences that are consistent with the science of reading to educators who are responsible for teaching reading, including faculty in educator preparation programs; (c) Develop a public dashboard that reports the first-time passage rates of students, by institution, on the foundations of reading licensure test. (C) If the metrics established under division (A) of this section require an institution of higher education that prepares teachers to satisfy the standards of an independent accreditation organization, the chancellor shall permit each institution to satisfy the standards of any applicable national educator preparation accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of education. (D) The metrics and educator preparation programs established under division (A) of this section may require an institution of higher education, as a condition of approval by the chancellor, to make changes in the curricula of its preparation programs for educators and other school personnel. Notwithstanding division (E) of section 119.03 and division (A)(1) of section 119.04 of the Revised Code, any metrics, educator preparation programs, rules, and regulations, or any amendment or rescission of such metrics, educator preparation programs, rules, and regulations, adopted under this section that necessitate institutions offering preparation programs for educators and other school personnel approved by the chancellor to revise the curricula of those programs shall not be effective for at least one year after the first day of January next succeeding the publication of the said change. Each institution shall allocate money from its existing revenue sources to pay the cost of making the curricular changes. (E) The chancellor shall notify the state board of the metrics and educator preparation programs established under division (A) of this section. The state board shall publish the metrics and educator preparation programs with the standards and qualifications for each type of educator license. (F) The graduates of educator preparation programs approved by the chancellor shall be licensed by the state board in accordance with the standards and qualifications adopted under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3333.301. (A) The chancellor of higher education, in collaboration with the management council of the Ohio education computer network established under section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code, shall establish a data system to track the free application for federal student aid form completion rate of public and chartered nonpublic school students in the state. (B) The chancellor and the management council shall develop guidelines and procedures for the operation of the system. (C) The chancellor may publish and share aggregate data regarding the free application for federal student aid, including completion counts and rates for the state and each school district, chartered nonpublic school, community school established under Chapter 3314., and STEM school established under Chapter 3326., and college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. Such data may be used for the benefit of public and chartered nonpublic schools, to increase public understanding regarding the free application for federal student aid, and to assist in encouraging student completion of the free application for federal student aid form. Sec. 3345.061. (A) Ohio's two-year institutions of higher education are respected points of entry for students embarking on post-secondary careers and courses completed at those institutions are transferable to state universities in accordance with articulation and transfer agreements developed under sections 3333.16, 3333.161, and 3333.162 of the Revised Code. (B) Beginning with undergraduate students who commence undergraduate studies in the 2014-2015 academic year, no state university listed in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, except Central state university, Shawnee state university, and Youngstown state university, shall receive any state operating subsidies for any academic remedial or developmental courses for undergraduate students, including courses prescribed in division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, offered at its main campus, except as provided in divisions (B)(1) to (4) of this section. (1) In the 2014-2015 and 2015-2016 academic years, a state university may receive state operating subsidies for academic remedial or developmental courses completed at the main campus for not more than three per cent of the total undergraduate credit hours provided by the university at its main campus. (2) In the 2016-2017 academic year, a state university may receive state operating subsidies for academic remedial or developmental courses completed at the main campus for not more than fifteen per cent of the first-year students who have graduated from high school within the previous twelve months and who are enrolled in the university at its main campus, as calculated on a full-time-equivalent basis. (3) In the 2017-2018 academic year, a state university may receive state operating subsidies for academic remedial or developmental courses completed at the main campus for not more than ten per cent of the first-year students who have graduated from high school within the previous twelve months and who are enrolled in the university at its main campus, as calculated on a full-time-equivalent basis. (4) In the 2018-2019 academic year, a state university may receive state operating subsidies for academic remedial or developmental courses completed at the main campus for not more than five per cent of the first-year students who have graduated from high school within the previous twelve months and who are enrolled in the university at its main campus, as calculated on a full-time-equivalent basis. Each state university may continue to offer academic remedial and developmental courses at its main campus beyond the extent for which state operating subsidies may be paid under this division and may continue to offer such courses beyond the 2018-2019 academic year. However, the main campus of a state university shall not receive any state operating subsidies for such courses above the maximum amounts permitted in this division. (C) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section, beginning with students who commence undergraduate studies in the 2014-2015 academic year, state operating subsidies for academic remedial or developmental courses offered by state institutions of higher education may be paid only to Central state university, Shawnee state university, Youngstown state university, any university branch, any community college, any state community college, or any technical college. (D) Each state university shall grant credit for academic remedial or developmental courses successfully completed at an institution described in division (C) of this section pursuant to any applicable articulation and transfer agreements the university has entered into in accordance with policies and procedures adopted under section 3333.16, 3333.161, or 3333.162 of the Revised Code. (E) The chancellor of higher education shall do all of the following: (1) Withhold state operating subsidies for academic remedial or developmental courses provided by a main campus of a state university as required in order to conform to divisions (B) and (C) of this section; (2) Adopt uniform statewide standards for academic remedial and developmental courses offered by all state institutions of higher education; (3) Encourage and assist in the design and establishment of academic remedial and developmental courses by institutions of higher education; (4) Define "academic year" for purposes of this section and section 3345.06 of the Revised Code; (5) Encourage and assist in the development of articulation and transfer agreements between state universities and other institutions of higher education in accordance with policies and procedures adopted under sections 3333.16, 3333.161, and 3333.162 of the Revised Code. (F) Not later than December 31, 2012, the presidents, or equivalent position, of all state institutions of higher education, or their designees, jointly shall establish uniform statewide standards in mathematics, science, reading, and writing each student enrolled in a state institution of higher education must meet to be considered in remediation-free status. The presidents also shall establish assessments, if they deem necessary, to determine if a student meets the standards adopted under this division. Each institution is responsible for assessing the needs of its enrolled students in the manner adopted by the presidents. The board of trustees or managing authority of each state institution of higher education shall adopt the remediation-free status standard, and any related assessments, into the institution's policies. The chancellor shall assist in coordinating the work of the presidents under this division. The chancellor shall monitor the standards in mathematics, science, reading, and writing established under division (F) of this section to ensure that the standards adequately demonstrate a student's remediation-free status. (G) Each year, not later than a date established by the chancellor, each state institution of higher education shall report to the governor, the general assembly, the chancellor, and the department of education and workforce all of the following for the prior academic year: (1) The institution's aggregate costs for providing academic remedial or developmental courses; (2) The amount of those costs disaggregated according to the city, local, or exempted village school districts from which the students taking those courses received their high school diplomas; (3) Any other information with respect to academic remedial and developmental courses that the chancellor considers appropriate. (H) Annually, not later than the thirty-first day of each December, the chancellor and the department of education and workforce shall issue a report recommending policies and strategies for reducing the need for academic remediation and developmental courses at state institutions of higher education. (I) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3365.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Articulated credit" means post-secondary credit that is reflected on the official record of a student at an institution of higher education only upon enrollment at that institution after graduation from a secondary school. (B) "Default ceiling amount" means one of the following amounts, whichever is applicable: (1) For a participant enrolled in a college operating on a semester schedule, the amount calculated according to the following formula: ((0.83 X formula amount) / 30) X number of enrolled credit hours (2) For a participant enrolled in a college operating on a quarter schedule, the amount calculated according to the following formula: ((0.83 X formula amount) / 45) X number of enrolled credit hours (C) "Default floor amount" means twenty-five per cent of the default ceiling amount. (D) "Eligible out-of-state college" means any institution of higher education that is located outside of Ohio and is approved by the chancellor of higher education to participate in the college credit plus program. (E) "Fee" means any course-related fee and any other fee imposed by the college, but not included in tuition, for participation in the program established by this chapter. (F) "Formula amount" means $6,020. (G) "Governing entity" means any of the following: (1) A board of education of a school district; (2) A governing authority of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (3) A governing body of a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (4) A board of trustees of a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (5) When referring to the state school for the deaf or the state school for the blind, the department of education and workforce; (6)(5) When referring to an institution operated by the department of youth services, the superintendent of that institution. (H) "Home-educated participant" means a student who is exempt from the compulsory attendance law for the purpose of home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, and is participating in the program established by this chapter. (I) "Maximum per participant charge amount" means one of the following amounts, whichever is applicable: (1) For a participant enrolled in a college operating on a semester schedule, the amount calculated according to the following formula: ((formula amount / 30) X number of enrolled credit hours) (2) For a participant enrolled in a college operating on a quarter schedule, the amount calculated according to the following formula: ((formula amount / 45) X number of enrolled credit hours) (J) "Nonpublic secondary school" means a chartered school for which minimum standards are prescribed by the director of education and workforce pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. (K) "Number of enrolled credit hours" means the number of credit hours for a course in which a participant is enrolled during the previous term after the date on which a withdrawal from a course would have negatively affected the participant's transcripted grade, as prescribed by the college's established withdrawal policy. (L) "Parent" has the same meaning as in section 3313.64 of the Revised Code. (M) "Participant" means any student enrolled in a college under the program established by this chapter. (N) "Partnering college" means a college with which a public or nonpublic secondary school has entered into an agreement in order to offer the program established by this chapter. (O) "Partnering secondary school" means a public or nonpublic secondary school with which a college has entered into an agreement in order to offer the program established by this chapter. (P) "Private college" means any of the following: (1) A nonprofit institution holding a certificate of authorization pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code; (2) An institution holding a certificate of registration from the state board of career colleges and schools and program authorization for an associate or bachelor's degree program issued under section 3332.05 of the Revised Code; (3) A private institution exempt from regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code. (Q) "Public college" means a "state institution of higher education" in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, excluding the northeast Ohio medical university. (R) "Public secondary school" means a school serving grades nine through twelve in a city, local, or exempted village school district, a joint vocational school district, a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, the state school for the deaf, the state school for the blind, or an institution operated by the department of youth services. (S) "School year" has the same meaning as in section 3313.62 of the Revised Code. (T) "Secondary grade" means any of grades nine through twelve. (U) "Standard rate" means the amount per credit hour assessed by the college for an in-state student who is enrolled in an undergraduate course at that college, but who is not participating in the college credit plus program, as prescribed by the college's established tuition policy. (V) "Transcripted credit" means post-secondary credit that is conferred by an institution of higher education and is reflected on a student's official record at that institution upon completion of a course. Sec. 3365.032. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) The "expulsion of a student" or "expelling a student" means the following: (a) For a public secondary school that is a school operated by a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, the expulsion of a student or the act of expelling a student under division (B) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code; (b) For a public secondary school that is a college-preparatory boarding school, the expulsion of a student or the act of expelling a student in accordance with the school's bylaws adopted pursuant to section 3328.13 of the Revised Code; (c) For a public secondary school that is the state school for the deaf or the state school for the blind, the expulsion of a student or the act of expelling a student in accordance with rules adopted by the department of education and workforce. (2) A "policy to deny high school credit for courses taken under the college credit plus program during an expulsion" means the following: (a) For a public secondary school that is a school operated by a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, a policy adopted under section 3313.613 of the Revised Code; (b) For a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, a policy adopted in accordance with the school's bylaws adopted pursuant to section 3328.13 of the Revised Code; (c) For the state school for the deaf or the state school for the blind, a policy adopted in accordance with any rules adopted by the department requiring such a policy. (B) When a public secondary school expels a student, the superintendent, or equivalent, shall send a written notice of the expulsion to any college in which the expelled student is enrolled under section 3365.03 of the Revised Code at the time the expulsion is imposed. The notice shall indicate the date the expulsion is scheduled to expire. The notice also shall indicate whether the school has adopted a policy to deny high school credit for courses taken under the college credit plus program during an expulsion. If the expulsion is extended, the superintendent, or equivalent, shall notify the college of the extension. (C) A college may withdraw its acceptance under section 3365.03 of the Revised Code of a student who is expelled from school. As provided in section 3365.03 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the college withdraws its acceptance of the student for the college term in which the student is expelled, the student is ineligible to enroll in a college under that section for subsequent college terms during the period of the expulsion, unless the student enrolls in another public school or a participating nonpublic school during that period. If a college withdraws its acceptance of an expelled student who elected either option of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code, the college shall refund tuition and fees paid by the student in the same proportion that it refunds tuition and fees to students who voluntarily withdraw from the college at the same time in the term. If a college withdraws its acceptance of an expelled student who elected the option of division (B) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code, the public school shall not award high school credit for the college courses in which the student was enrolled at the time the college withdrew its acceptance, and any reimbursement under section 3365.07 of the Revised Code for the student's attendance prior to the withdrawal shall be the same as would be paid for a student who voluntarily withdrew from the college at the same time in the term. If the withdrawal results in the college's receiving no reimbursement, the college or secondary school may require the student to return or pay for any textbooks and materials it provided the student free of charge. (D) When a student who elected the option of division (B) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code is expelled from a public school that has adopted a policy to deny high school credit for courses taken under the college credit plus program during an expulsion, that election is automatically revoked for all college courses in which the student is enrolled during the college term in which the expulsion is imposed. Any reimbursement under section 3365.07 of the Revised Code for the student's attendance prior to the expulsion shall be the same as would be paid for a student who voluntarily withdrew from the college at the same time in the term. If the revocation results in the college's receiving no reimbursement, the college or secondary school may require the student to return or pay for any textbooks and materials it provided the student free of charge. Not later than five days after receiving an expulsion notice from the superintendent, or equivalent, of a public school that has adopted a policy to deny high school credit for courses taken under the college credit plus program during an expulsion, the college shall send a written notice to the expelled student that the student's election of division (B) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code is revoked. If the college elects not to withdraw its acceptance of the student, the student shall pay all applicable tuition and fees for the college courses and shall pay for any textbooks and materials that the college or secondary school provided to the student. Sec. 3365.07. The department of education and workforce shall calculate and pay state funds to colleges for participants in the college credit plus program under division (B) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code pursuant to this section. For a nonpublic secondary school participant, a nonchartered nonpublic secondary school participant, or a home-educated participant, the department shall pay state funds pursuant to this section only if that participant is awarded funding according to rules adopted by the chancellor of higher education, in consultation with the department of education and workforce, pursuant to section 3365.071 of the Revised Code. The program shall be the sole mechanism by which state funds are paid to colleges for students to earn transcripted credit for college courses while enrolled in both a secondary school and a college, with the exception of state funds paid to colleges according to an agreement described in division (A)(1) of section 3365.02 of the Revised Code. (A) For each public or nonpublic secondary school participant enrolled in a public college: (1) If no agreement has been entered into under division (A)(2) of this section, both of the following shall apply: (a) The department shall pay to the college the applicable amount as follows: (i) For a participant enrolled in a college course delivered on the college campus, at another location operated by the college, or online, the lesser of the default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate; (ii) For a participant enrolled in a college course delivered at the participant's secondary school but taught by college faculty, the lesser of fifty per cent of the default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate; (iii) For a participant enrolled in a college course delivered at the participant's secondary school and taught by a high school teacher who has met the credential requirements established for purposes of the program in rules adopted by the chancellor, the default floor amount. (b) The participant's secondary school shall pay for textbooks, and the college shall waive payment of all other fees related to participation in the program. (2) The governing entity of a participant's secondary school and the college may enter into an agreement to establish an alternative payment structure for tuition, textbooks, and fees. Under such an agreement, payments for each participant made by the department shall be not less than the default floor amount, unless approved by the chancellor, and not more than either the default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate, whichever is less. The chancellor may approve an agreement that includes a payment below the default floor amount, as long as the provisions of the agreement comply with all other requirements of this chapter to ensure program quality. If no agreement is entered into under division (A)(2) of this section, both of the following shall apply: (a) The department shall pay to the college the applicable default amounts prescribed by division (A)(1)(a) of this section, depending upon the method of delivery and instruction. (b) In accordance with division (A)(1)(b) of this section, the participant's secondary school shall pay for textbooks, and the college shall waive payment of all other fees related to participation in the program. (3) No participant that is enrolled in a public college shall be charged for any tuition, textbooks, or other fees related to participation in the program. (B) For each public secondary school participant enrolled in a private college: (1) If no agreement has been entered into under division (B)(2) of this section, the department shall pay to the college the applicable amount calculated in the same manner as in division (A)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The governing entity of a participant's secondary school and the college may enter into an agreement to establish an alternative payment structure for tuition, textbooks, and fees. Under such an agreement, payments shall be not less than the default floor amount, unless approved by the chancellor, and not more than either the default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate, whichever is less. If an agreement is entered into under division (B)(2) of this section, both of the following shall apply: (a) The department shall make a payment to the college for each participant that is equal to the default floor amount, unless approved by the chancellor to pay an amount below the default floor amount. The chancellor may approve an agreement that includes a payment below the default floor amount, as long as the provisions of the agreement comply with all other requirements of this chapter to ensure program quality. (b) Payment for costs for the participant that exceed the amount paid by the department pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) of this section shall be negotiated by the school and the college. The agreement may include a stipulation permitting the charging of a participant. However, under no circumstances shall: (i) Payments for a participant made by the department under division (B)(2) of this section exceed the lesser of the default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate; (ii) The amount charged to a participant under division (B)(2) of this section exceed the difference between the maximum per participant charge amount and the default floor amount; (iii) The sum of the payments made by the department for a participant and the amount charged to that participant under division (B)(2) of this section exceed the following amounts, as applicable: (I) For a participant enrolled in a college course delivered on the college campus, at another location operated by the college, or online, the maximum per participant charge amount; (II) For a participant enrolled in a college course delivered at the participant's secondary school but taught by college faculty, one hundred twenty-five dollars; (III) For a participant enrolled in a college course delivered at the participant's secondary school and taught by a high school teacher who has met the credential requirements established for purposes of the program in rules adopted by the chancellor, one hundred dollars. (iv) A participant that is identified as economically disadvantaged according to rules adopted by the department be charged under division (B)(2) of this section for any tuition, textbooks, or other fees related to participation in the program. (C) For each nonpublic secondary school participant enrolled in a private or eligible out-of-state college, the department shall pay to the college the applicable amount calculated in the same manner as in division (A)(1)(a) of this section. Payment for costs for the participant that exceed the amount paid by the department shall be negotiated by the governing body of the nonpublic secondary school and the college. However, under no circumstances shall: (1) The payments for a participant made by the department under this division exceed the lesser of the default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate. (2) Any nonpublic secondary school participant, who is enrolled in that secondary school with a scholarship awarded under either the educational choice scholarship pilot program, as prescribed by sections 3310.01 to 3310.17, or the pilot project scholarship program, as prescribed by sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, and who qualifies as a low-income student, as determined by a method established by the department be charged for any tuition, textbooks, or other fees related to participation in the college credit plus program. (D) For each nonchartered nonpublic secondary school participant and each home-educated participant enrolled in a public, private, or eligible out-of-state college, the department shall pay to the college the lesser of the default ceiling amount or the college's standard rate, if that participant is enrolled in a college course delivered on the college campus, at another location operated by the college, or online. (E) Not later than thirty days after the end of each term, each college expecting to receive payment for the costs of a participant under this section shall notify the department of the number of enrolled credit hours for each participant. (F) The department shall make the applicable payments under this section to each college, which provided proper notification to the department under division (E) of this section, for the number of enrolled credit hours for participants enrolled in the college under division (B) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code. Except in cases involving incomplete participant information or a dispute of participant information, payments shall be made by the last day of January for participants who were enrolled during the fall term and by the last day of July for participants who were enrolled during the spring term. The department shall not make any payments to a college under this section if a participant withdrew from a course prior to the date on which a withdrawal from the course would have negatively affected the participant's transcripted grade, as prescribed by the college's established withdrawal policy. (1) Payments made for public secondary school participants under this section shall be deducted as follows: (a) For a participant enrolled in a school district, from the school foundation payments made to the participant's school district. If the participant is enrolled in a joint vocational school district, a portion of the amount shall be deducted from the payments to the joint vocational school district and a portion shall be deducted from the payments to the participant's city, local, or exempted village school district in accordance with the full-time equivalency of the student's enrollment in each district. (b) For a participant enrolled in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, from the payments made to that school under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; (c) For a participant enrolled in a STEM school, from the payments made to that school under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; (d) For a participant enrolled in a college-preparatory boarding school, from the payments made to that school under section 3328.34 of the Revised Code; (e) For a participant enrolled in the state school for the deaf or the state school for the blind, from the amount paid to that school with funds appropriated by the general assembly for support of Ohio deaf and blind education services; (f)(e) For a participant enrolled in an institution operated by the department of youth services, from the amount paid to that institution with funds appropriated by the general assembly for support of that institution. Amounts deducted under divisions (F)(1)(a) to (f) of this section shall be calculated in accordance with rules adopted by the chancellor, in consultation with the department of education and workforce, pursuant to division (B) of section 3365.071 of the Revised Code (2) Payments made for nonpublic secondary school participants, nonchartered nonpublic secondary school participants, and home-educated participants under this section shall be deducted from moneys appropriated by the general assembly for such purpose. Payments shall be allocated and distributed in accordance with rules adopted by the chancellor, in consultation with the department of education and workforce, pursuant to division (A) of section 3365.071 of the Revised Code. (G) Any public college that enrolls a student under division (B) of section 3365.06 of the Revised Code may include that student in the calculation used to determine its state share of instruction funds appropriated to the department of higher education by the general assembly. Sec. 3728.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Administer epinephrine" means to inject an individual with epinephrine using an autoinjector in a manufactured dosage form. (B) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 109.71 of the Revised Code and also includes a sheriff. (C) "Prescriber" means an individual who is authorized by law to prescribe drugs or dangerous drugs or drug therapy related devices in the course of the individual's professional practice, including only the following: (1) A clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner; (2) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery; (3) A physician assistant who is licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority. (D)(1) "Qualified entity" means either of the following: (a) Any public or private entity that is associated with a location where allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be present, including child care centers, colleges and universities, places of employment, restaurants, amusement parks, recreation camps, sports playing fields and arenas, and other similar locations; (b) Either of the following served by a peace officer: a law enforcement agency or other entity described in division (A) of section 109.71 of the Revised Code. (2) "Qualified entity" does not include either of the following: (a) A chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; community school; science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school; college-preparatory boarding school; or a school operated by the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, as those entities are otherwise authorized to procure epinephrine delivery systems pursuant to sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, or 3326.28, or 3328.29 of the Revised Code; (b) A camp described in section 5180.26 of the Revised Code that is authorized to procure epinephrine delivery systems pursuant to that section. Sec. 3737.07. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Authority having jurisdiction" means an organization, office, agency, or individual responsible for enforcing the requirements under this section. (2) "NFPA 101" means the standards for life safety code published by the national fire protection association, which includes the NFPA 80 standards for fire doors and other opening protectives. (3) "Protective door assembly" or "protective door assemblies" means any of the following: (a) Doors with panic hardware or fire exit hardware; (b) Door assemblies in exit enclosures; (c) Electricity controlled egress doors; (d) Door assemblies with special locking arrangements, such as delayed egress, sensor release egress doors, and elevator lobby doors. (4) "Qualified inspector" means a person, who by possession of a recognized degree, certificate, professional standing, or skill, and who, by knowledge, training, and experience, has demonstrated the ability to deal with the subject matter, the work, or the project. (5) "School building" means a structure used for the instruction of students by a school governing authority. (6) "School governing authority" means any of the following: (a) The board of education of a school district; (b) The governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school; (c) The governing authority of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (d) The governing body of a STEM school established under Chapter 3328.3326. of the Revised Code; (e) The board of trustees of a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (B) Each school governing authority in this state shall do both of the following: (1) Cause all protective door assemblies in school buildings used by the school governing authority for instruction of students to be inspected and tested every twelve months in accordance with division (C) of this section; (2) Verify that such protective door assemblies are in compliance with the following standards: (a) If the protective door assembly was installed in 2015 or after, the 2015 NFPA 101, or other standards required by the board of building standards; (b) If the protective door assembly was installed prior to 2015, the NFPA 101 that was in effect on the date the protective door assembly was installed or, if the protective door assembly was installed before the NFPA 101 was published and in effect, the building code standards in effect at the time of installation. (C)(1) A school governing authority shall cause all of the protective door assemblies in school buildings used for the instruction of students to be inspected and tested every twelve months by a qualified inspector to confirm proper operation and full closure. (2) If a protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable standards described in division (B)(2) of this section, then the school governing authority shall take all steps necessary to make the protective door assembly compliant. (D) After the inspection of a protective door assembly in a school building, the qualified inspector shall provide a report to the school governing authority indicating any of the following: (1) That the protective door assembly is in compliance with the applicable standards described in division (B)(2) of this section and no further inspection is required respecting that protective door assembly for the next twelve months; (2) That the protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable standards; (3) That the protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable standards and there is a serious risk for fire or life safety hazard. (E) Each school governing authority shall maintain records verifying annual inspections. (F) If one or more protective door assemblies in a school building are not in compliance with the applicable standards described in division (B)(2) of this section, as indicated in a report under division (D)(2), (D)(3), (G)(2), or (G)(3) of this section, then the school governing authority shall do both of the following: (1) Take all steps necessary to make each such protective door assembly compliant with the applicable standards; (2) Cause another inspection of each such protective door assembly immediately after completing those steps. (G) After each inspection of a protective door assembly in the school building under division (F)(2) of this section has been completed, the qualified inspector shall provide a report to the school governing authority indicating any of the following: (1) That the protective door assembly is in compliance with the applicable standards described in division (B)(2) of this section and no further inspection is required respecting that protective door assembly for the next twelve months; (2) That the protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable standards; (3) That the protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable standards and there is a serious risk for fire or life safety hazard. (H)(1) Beginning eighteen months after the effective date of this section October 24, 2024, the authority having jurisdiction shall annually cause an inspection of the records retained by each school governing authority under division (E) of this section. If a protective door assembly in a school building is not fully compliant with the applicable standards within eighteen months after a report issued under division (D)(2) of this section, or within one hundred eighty days after a report issued under division (D)(3) of this section, and the school governing authority is not actively taking steps to achieve compliance, then the authority having jurisdiction shall issue a citation pursuant to section 3737.42 of the Revised Code. Each protective door assembly that is not in compliance with the applicable standards, and which the respecting school governing authority is not actively taking steps to achieve compliance with those standards, is a separate violation and is subject to an additional citation. (2) If a citation is issued under division (H)(1) of this section and section 3737.42 of the Revised Code, the school governing authority shall post the citation issued concerning the protective door assembly on a public web site managed by the school governing authority. The school governing authority may remove the citation posted under this division once the protective door assembly is made compliant with the applicable standards and an inspection confirms such compliance. (I) No authority having jurisdiction shall do either of the following: (1) Issue a citation pursuant to this section and section 3737.42 of the Revised Code to a school governing authority that is actively taking steps to reach compliance with the applicable standards, regardless of whether full compliance is reached for all protective door assemblies in the school building; (2) Assess a civil penalty or any fine associated with a citation issued pursuant to this section. (J) A qualified inspector that inspects more than one protective door assembly under division (D) or (G) of this section in the same school building may combine the results of such inspections into one report, so long as the report clearly indicates which protective door assemblies are in compliance with the applicable standards and which are not. (K)(1) The fire marshal shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that are necessary to implement the requirements of this section. (2) The fire marshal shall work in conjunction with the board of building standards to implement such requirements. (3) The rules shall require that protective door assemblies are inspected in accordance with this section and that the protective door assemblies continue to meet the compliance standards required at the time of installation. (L) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a temporary door-locking device in compliance with the rules adopted by the fire marshal is not in conflict with this section. (M) Any citation issued pursuant to this section may be appealed under section 3737.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3781.106. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Institution of higher education" means a state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, a private nonprofit college or university located in this state that possesses a certificate of authorization issued pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code, or a school located in this state that possesses a certificate of registration and one or more program authorizations issued by the state board of career colleges and schools under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code. (2) "Nonresidential building" means a building or structure, or part of a building or structure, not occupied in whole or in part for the purpose of human habitation, and includes the lands and premises appurtenant and all of the outbuildings, fences, or erections thereon or therein. "Nonresidential building" does not include an institution of higher education, private school, or public school, as defined in this section. (3) "Owner" means an individual or entity possessing title to a nonresidential building or an authorized agent of the owner. (4) "Private school" means a chartered nonpublic school or a nonchartered nonpublic school. (5) "Public school" means any school operated by a school district board of education, any community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and any STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, and any college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (6) "School building" means a structure used for the instruction of students by a public or private school or institution of higher education. (B)(1) The board of building standards shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, for the use of a device by a staff member of a public or private school or institution of higher education that prevents both ingress and egress through a door in a school building, for a finite period of time, in an emergency situation, and during active shooter drills. The rules shall provide that the use of a device is permissible only if the device requires minimal steps to remove it after it is engaged. The rules shall provide that the administrative authority of a building notify the police chief, or equivalent, of the law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the building, and the fire chief, or equivalent, of the fire department that serves the political subdivision in which the building is located, prior to the use of such devices in a building. The rules may require that the device be visible from the exterior of the door. (2) The device described in division (B)(1) of this section shall not be permanently mounted to the door. (3) Each public and private school and institution of higher education shall provide its staff members in-service training on the use of the device described in division (B)(1) of this section. The school shall maintain a record verifying this training on file. (4) In consultation with the department of education and workforce and the chancellor of higher education, the board shall determine and include in the rules a definition of "emergency situation." These rules shall apply to both existing and new school buildings. (C)(1) The board of building standards shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, for the use of a device by the owner, or a person authorized by the owner, of a nonresidential building that prevents both ingress and egress through a door in the building, for a finite period of time, in an emergency situation, and during active shooter drills. The rules shall provide that the use of a device is permissible only if the device requires minimal steps to remove it after it is engaged. The rules shall require the owner of a building notify the police chief, or equivalent, of the law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the building, and the fire chief, or equivalent, of the fire department that serves the political subdivision in which the building is located, prior to the use of such devices in a building. The rules may require that the device be visible from the exterior of the door. (2) The device described in division (C)(1) of this section shall not be permanently mounted to the door. (3) Each owner of a nonresidential building shall provide any person that may use the device described in division (C)(1) of this section training on the use of the device. The owner of the building shall maintain a record verifying this training on file. (4) The board shall determine and include in the rules a definition of "emergency situation" for purposes of division (C)(1) of this section. These rules shall apply to both existing and new nonresidential buildings. (D) Any provision of the state fire code that is in conflict with this section or section 3737.84 of the Revised Code is unenforceable. Sec. 3792.04. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public school" means any of the following: a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; or STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; or college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, a public school or state institution of higher education shall not do either of the following: (1) Require an individual to receive a vaccine for which the United States food and drug administration has not granted full approval; (2) Discriminate against an individual who has not received a vaccine described in division (B)(1) of this section, including by requiring the individual to engage in or refrain from engaging in activities or precautions that differ from the activities or precautions of an individual who has received such a vaccine. (C) This section does not apply to a hospital or other health care facility that is owned or operated by, or affiliated with, a state institution of higher education. Sec. 4109.07. (A) No person under sixteen years of age shall be employed: (1) During school hours except where specifically permitted by this chapter; (2) Before seven a.m.; (3) After nine p.m. from the first day of June to the first day of September or during any school holiday of five school days or more duration, or after ; (4) After seven p.m. at any other time, except the person may be employed between seven p.m. and nine p.m. on any night preceding a day that school is not in session if the person has approval to do so from the person's parent or legal guardian; (4)(5) For more than three hours a day in any school day; (5)(6) For more than eighteen hours in any week while school is in session; (6)(7) For more than eight hours in any day which is not a school day; (7)(8) For more than forty hours in any week that school is not in session. (B) No person under sixteen years of age may be employed more than forty hours in any one week nor during school hours unless employment is incidental to bona fide programs of vocational cooperative training, work-study, or other work- oriented programs with the purpose of educating students, and the program meets standards established by the department of education and workforce. (C) No employer shall employ a minor more than five consecutive hours without allowing the minor a rest period of at least thirty minutes. The rest period need not be included in the computation of the number of hours worked by the minor. (D) No person sixteen or seventeen years of age who is required to attend school under Chapter 3321. of the Revised Code shall be employed: (1) Before seven a.m. on any day that school is in session, except such person may be employed after six a.m. if the person was not employed after eight p.m. the previous night; (2) After eleven p.m. on any night preceding a day that school is in session. (E) As used in this section, "school" refers to either a school the child actually attends or a school he is required to attend pursuant to Chapter 3321. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4117.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Person," in addition to those included in division (C) of section 1.59 of the Revised Code, includes employee organizations, public employees, and public employers. (B) "Public employer" means the state or any political subdivision of the state located entirely within the state, including, without limitation, any municipal corporation with a population of at least five thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census; county; township with a population of at least five thousand in the unincorporated area of the township according to the most recent federal decennial census; school district; governing authority of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; college preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code or its operator; state institution of higher learning; public or special district; state agency, authority, commission, or board; or other branch of public employment. "Public employer" does not include the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Public employee" means any person holding a position by appointment or employment in the service of a public employer, including any person working pursuant to a contract between a public employer and a private employer and over whom the national labor relations board has declined jurisdiction on the basis that the involved employees are employees of a public employer, except: (1) Persons holding elective office; (2) Employees of the general assembly and employees of any other legislative body of the public employer whose principal duties are directly related to the legislative functions of the body; (3) Employees on the staff of the governor or the chief executive of the public employer whose principal duties are directly related to the performance of the executive functions of the governor or the chief executive; (4) Persons who are members of the Ohio organized militia, while training or performing duty under section 5919.29 or 5923.12 of the Revised Code; (5) Employees of the state employment relations board, including those employees of the state employment relations board utilized by the state personnel board of review in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions of the state personnel board of review; (6) Confidential employees; (7) Management level employees; (8) Employees and officers of the courts, assistants to the attorney general, assistant prosecuting attorneys, and employees of the clerks of courts who perform a judicial function; (9) Employees of a public official who act in a fiduciary capacity, appointed pursuant to section 124.11 of the Revised Code; (10) Supervisors; (11) Students whose primary purpose is educational training, including graduate assistants or associates, residents, interns, or other students working as part-time public employees less than fifty per cent of the normal year in the employee's bargaining unit; (12) Employees of county boards of election; (13) Seasonal and casual employees as determined by the state employment relations board; (14) Part-time faculty members of an institution of higher education; (15) Participants in a work activity, developmental activity, or alternative work activity under sections 5107.40 to 5107.69 of the Revised Code who perform a service for a public employer that the public employer needs but is not performed by an employee of the public employer if the participant is not engaged in paid employment or subsidized employment pursuant to the activity; (16) Employees included in the career professional service of the department of transportation under section 5501.20 of the Revised Code; (17) Employees of community-based correctional facilities and district community-based correctional facilities created under sections 2301.51 to 2301.58 of the Revised Code. (D) "Employee organization" means any labor or bona fide organization in which public employees participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with public employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, hours, terms, and other conditions of employment. (E) "Exclusive representative" means the employee organization certified or recognized as an exclusive representative under section 4117.05 of the Revised Code. (F) "Supervisor" means any individual who has authority, in the interest of the public employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other public employees; to responsibly direct them; to adjust their grievances; or to effectively recommend such action, if the exercise of that authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the use of independent judgment, provided that: (1) Employees of school districts who are department chairpersons or consulting teachers shall not be deemed supervisors. (2) With respect to members of a police or fire department, no person shall be deemed a supervisor except the chief of the department or those individuals who, in the absence of the chief, are authorized to exercise the authority and perform the duties of the chief of the department. Where prior to June 1, 1982, a public employer pursuant to a judicial decision, rendered in litigation to which the public employer was a party, has declined to engage in collective bargaining with members of a police or fire department on the basis that those members are supervisors, those members of a police or fire department do not have the rights specified in this chapter for the purposes of future collective bargaining. The state employment relations board shall decide all disputes concerning the application of division (F)(2) of this section. (3) With respect to faculty members of a state institution of higher education, heads of departments or divisions are supervisors; however, no other faculty member or group of faculty members is a supervisor solely because the faculty member or group of faculty members participate in decisions with respect to courses, curriculum, personnel, or other matters of academic policy. (4) No teacher as defined in section 3319.09 of the Revised Code shall be designated as a supervisor or a management level employee unless the teacher is employed under a contract governed by section 3319.01, 3319.011, or 3319.02 of the Revised Code and is assigned to a position for which a license deemed to be for administrators under state board rules is required pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code. (G) "To bargain collectively" means to perform the mutual obligation of the public employer, by its representatives, and the representatives of its employees to negotiate in good faith at reasonable times and places with respect to wages, hours, terms, and other conditions of employment and the continuation, modification, or deletion of an existing provision of a collective bargaining agreement, with the intention of reaching an agreement, or to resolve questions arising under the agreement. "To bargain collectively" includes executing a written contract incorporating the terms of any agreement reached. The obligation to bargain collectively does not mean that either party is compelled to agree to a proposal nor does it require the making of a concession. (H) "Strike" means continuous concerted action in failing to report to duty; willful absence from one's position; or stoppage of work in whole from the full, faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, for the purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in wages, hours, terms, and other conditions of employment. "Strike" does not include a stoppage of work by employees in good faith because of dangerous or unhealthful working conditions at the place of employment that are abnormal to the place of employment. (I) "Unauthorized strike" includes, but is not limited to, concerted action during the term or extended term of a collective bargaining agreement or during the pendency of the settlement procedures set forth in section 4117.14 of the Revised Code in failing to report to duty; willful absence from one's position; stoppage of work; slowdown, or abstinence in whole or in part from the full, faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment for the purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in wages, hours, terms, and other conditions of employment. "Unauthorized strike" includes any such action, absence, stoppage, slowdown, or abstinence when done partially or intermittently, whether during or after the expiration of the term or extended term of a collective bargaining agreement or during or after the pendency of the settlement procedures set forth in section 4117.14 of the Revised Code. (J) "Professional employee" means any employee engaged in work that is predominantly intellectual, involving the consistent exercise of discretion and judgment in its performance and requiring knowledge of an advanced type in a field of science or learning customarily acquired by a prolonged course in an institution of higher learning or a hospital, as distinguished from a general academic education or from an apprenticeship; or an employee who has completed the courses of specialized intellectual instruction and is performing related work under the supervision of a professional person to become qualified as a professional employee. (K) "Confidential employee" means any employee who works in the personnel offices of a public employer and deals with information to be used by the public employer in collective bargaining; or any employee who works in a close continuing relationship with public officers or representatives directly participating in collective bargaining on behalf of the employer. (L) "Management level employee" means an individual who formulates policy on behalf of the public employer, who responsibly directs the implementation of policy, or who may reasonably be required on behalf of the public employer to assist in the preparation for the conduct of collective negotiations, administer collectively negotiated agreements, or have a major role in personnel administration. Assistant superintendents, principals, and assistant principals whose employment is governed by section 3319.02 of the Revised Code are management level employees. With respect to members of a faculty of a state institution of higher education, no person is a management level employee because of the person's involvement in the formulation or implementation of academic or institution policy. (M) "Wages" means hourly rates of pay, salaries, or other forms of compensation for services rendered. (N) "Member of a police department" means a person who is in the employ of a police department of a municipal corporation as a full-time regular police officer as the result of an appointment from a duly established civil service eligibility list or under section 737.15 or 737.16 of the Revised Code, a full-time deputy sheriff appointed under section 311.04 of the Revised Code, a township constable appointed under section 509.01 of the Revised Code, or a member of a township or joint police district police department appointed under section 505.49 of the Revised Code. (O) "Members of the state highway patrol" means highway patrol troopers and radio operators appointed under section 5503.01 of the Revised Code. (P) "Member of a fire department" means a person who is in the employ of a fire department of a municipal corporation or a township as a fire cadet, full-time regular firefighter, or promoted rank as the result of an appointment from a duly established civil service eligibility list or under section 505.38, 709.012, or 737.22 of the Revised Code. (Q) "Day" means calendar day. Sec. 4723.483. (A) As used in this section, "epinephrine delivery system" has the same meaning as in section 3313.718 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any conflicting provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the board of nursing, a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner may do any of the following without having examined an individual to whom epinephrine may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with Chapter 3728. of the Revised Code; (b) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine delivery systems for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code; (c) Issue a prescription for epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with Chapter 3728. of the Revised Code; (d) Issue a prescription for epinephrine delivery systems for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code. (2) An epinephrine autoinjector personally furnished or prescribed under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (C) A nurse who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which an epinephrine delivery system, including an autoinjector, is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4723.4811. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the board of nursing, a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom glucagon may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, and 5180.262 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, and 5180.262 of the Revised Code. (2) Injectable or nasally administered glucagon personally furnished or prescribed under division (A)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (B) A nurse who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which injectable or nasally administered glucagon is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4729.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Pharmacy," except when used in a context that refers to the practice of pharmacy, means any area, room, rooms, place of business, department, or portion of any of the foregoing where the practice of pharmacy is conducted. (B) "Practice of pharmacy" means providing pharmacist care requiring specialized knowledge, judgment, and skill derived from the principles of biological, chemical, behavioral, social, pharmaceutical, and clinical sciences. As used in this division, "pharmacist care" includes the following: (1) Interpreting prescriptions; (2) Dispensing drugs and drug therapy related devices; (3) Compounding drugs; (4) Counseling individuals with regard to their drug therapy, recommending drug therapy related devices, and assisting in the selection of drugs and appliances for treatment of common diseases and injuries and providing instruction in the proper use of the drugs and appliances; (5) Performing drug regimen reviews with individuals by discussing all of the drugs that the individual is taking and explaining the interactions of the drugs; (6) Performing drug utilization reviews with licensed health professionals authorized to prescribe drugs when the pharmacist determines that an individual with a prescription has a drug regimen that warrants additional discussion with the prescriber; (7) Advising an individual and the health care professionals treating an individual with regard to the individual's drug therapy; (8) Acting pursuant to a consult agreement, if an agreement has been established; (9) Engaging in the administration of immunizations to the extent authorized by section 4729.41 of the Revised Code; (10) Engaging in the administration of drugs to the extent authorized by section 4729.45 of the Revised Code. (C) "Compounding" means the preparation, mixing, assembling, packaging, and labeling of one or more drugs in any of the following circumstances: (1) Pursuant to a prescription issued by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs; (2) Pursuant to the modification of a prescription made in accordance with a consult agreement; (3) As an incident to research, teaching activities, or chemical analysis; (4) In anticipation of orders for drugs pursuant to prescriptions, based on routine, regularly observed dispensing patterns; (5) Pursuant to a request made by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs for a drug that is to be used by the professional for the purpose of direct administration to patients in the course of the professional's practice, if all of the following apply: (a) At the time the request is made, the drug is not commercially available regardless of the reason that the drug is not available, including the absence of a manufacturer for the drug or the lack of a readily available supply of the drug from a manufacturer. (b) A limited quantity of the drug is compounded and provided to the professional. (c) The drug is compounded and provided to the professional as an occasional exception to the normal practice of dispensing drugs pursuant to patient-specific prescriptions. (D) "Consult agreement" means an agreement that has been entered into under section 4729.39 of the Revised Code. (E) "Drug" means: (1) Any article recognized in the United States pharmacopoeia and national formulary, or any supplement to them, intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals; (2) Any other article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals; (3) Any article, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or animals; (4) Any article intended for use as a component of any article specified in division (E)(1), (2), or (3) of this section; but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories. "Drug" does not include "hemp" as that term is defined in section 928.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Dangerous drug" means any of the following: (1) Any drug to which either of the following applies: (a) Under the "Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act," 52 Stat. 1040 (1938), 21 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended, the drug is required to bear a label containing the legend "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription" or "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian" or any similar restrictive statement, or the drug may be dispensed only upon a prescription; (b) Under Chapter 3715. or 3719. of the Revised Code, the drug may be dispensed only upon a prescription. (2) Any drug that contains a schedule V controlled substance and that is exempt from Chapter 3719. of the Revised Code or to which that chapter does not apply; (3) Any drug intended for administration by injection into the human body other than through a natural orifice of the human body; (4) Any drug that is a biological product, as defined in section 3715.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "Federal drug abuse control laws" has the same meaning as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (H) "Prescription" means all of the following: (1) A written, electronic, or oral order for drugs or combinations or mixtures of drugs to be used by a particular individual or for treating a particular animal, issued by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs; (2) For purposes of sections 4723.4810, 4729.282, 4730.432, and 4731.93 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for a drug to treat chlamydia, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis issued to and in the name of a patient who is not the intended user of the drug but is the sexual partner of the intended user; (3) For purposes of sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 4723.483, 4729.88, 4730.433, 4731.96, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for an epinephrine autoinjector issued to and in the name of a school, school district, or camp; (4) For purposes of Chapter 3728. and sections 4723.483, 4729.88, 4730.433, and 4731.96 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for an epinephrine autoinjector issued to and in the name of a qualified entity, as defined in section 3728.01 of the Revised Code; (5) For purposes of sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, 4723.4811, 4730.437, 4731.92, and 5180.262 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for injectable or nasally administered glucagon in the name of a school, school district, or camp. (I) "Licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs" or "prescriber" means an individual who is authorized by law to prescribe drugs or dangerous drugs or drug therapy related devices in the course of the individual's professional practice, including only the following: (1) A dentist licensed under Chapter 4715. of the Revised Code; (2) A clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse; (3) A certified registered nurse anesthetist who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse, but only to the extent of the nurse's authority under section 4723.43 of the Revised Code; (4) An optometrist licensed under Chapter 4725. of the Revised Code to practice optometry; (5) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery; (6) A physician assistant who holds a license to practice as a physician assistant issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority; (7) A veterinarian licensed under Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code; (8) A certified mental health assistant licensed under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code who has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority by the physician supervising the certified mental health assistant. (J) "Sale" or "sell" includes any transaction made by any person, whether as principal proprietor, agent, or employee, to do or offer to do any of the following: deliver, distribute, broker, exchange, gift or otherwise give away, or transfer, whether the transfer is by passage of title, physical movement, or both. (K) "Wholesale sale" and "sale at wholesale" mean any sale in which the purpose of the purchaser is to resell the article purchased or received by the purchaser. (L) "Retail sale" and "sale at retail" mean any sale other than a wholesale sale or sale at wholesale. (M) "Retail seller" means any person that sells any dangerous drug to consumers without assuming control over and responsibility for its administration. Mere advice or instructions regarding administration do not constitute control or establish responsibility. (N) "Price information" means the price charged for a prescription for a particular drug product and, in an easily understandable manner, all of the following: (1) The proprietary name of the drug product; (2) The established (generic) name of the drug product; (3) The strength of the drug product if the product contains a single active ingredient or if the drug product contains more than one active ingredient and a relevant strength can be associated with the product without indicating each active ingredient. The established name and quantity of each active ingredient are required if such a relevant strength cannot be so associated with a drug product containing more than one ingredient. (4) The dosage form; (5) The price charged for a specific quantity of the drug product. The stated price shall include all charges to the consumer, including, but not limited to, the cost of the drug product, professional fees, handling fees, if any, and a statement identifying professional services routinely furnished by the pharmacy. Any mailing fees and delivery fees may be stated separately without repetition. The information shall not be false or misleading. (O) "Wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs" or "wholesale distributor" means a person engaged in the sale of dangerous drugs at wholesale and includes any agent or employee of such a person authorized by the person to engage in the sale of dangerous drugs at wholesale. (P) "Manufacturer of dangerous drugs" or "manufacturer" means a person, other than a pharmacist or prescriber, who manufactures dangerous drugs and who is engaged in the sale of those dangerous drugs. (Q) "Terminal distributor of dangerous drugs" or "terminal distributor" means a person who is engaged in the sale of dangerous drugs at retail, or any person, other than a manufacturer, repackager, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, wholesale distributor, or pharmacist, who has possession, custody, or control of dangerous drugs for any purpose other than for that person's own use and consumption. "Terminal distributor" includes pharmacies, hospitals, nursing homes, and laboratories and all other persons who procure dangerous drugs for sale or other distribution by or under the supervision of a pharmacist, licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs, or other person authorized by the state board of pharmacy. (R) "Promote to the public" means disseminating a representation to the public in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or that is likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of a dangerous drug at retail. (S) "Person" includes any individual, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation, the state, any political subdivision of the state, and any district, department, or agency of the state or its political subdivisions. (T)(1) "Animal shelter" means a facility operated by a humane society or any society organized under Chapter 1717. of the Revised Code or a dog pound operated pursuant to Chapter 955. of the Revised Code. (2) "County dog warden" means a dog warden or deputy dog warden appointed or employed under section 955.12 of the Revised Code. (3) "Wild animal rehabilitation facility" means a facility that holds a permit issued by the chief of the division of wildlife for rehabilitation purposes in accordance with section 1533.08 of the Revised Code or rules adopted by the chief. (U) "Food" has the same meaning as in section 3715.01 of the Revised Code. (V) "Pain management clinic" has the same meaning as in section 4731.054 of the Revised Code. (W) "Investigational drug or product" means a drug or product that has successfully completed phase one of the United States food and drug administration clinical trials and remains under clinical trial, but has not been approved for general use by the United States food and drug administration. "Investigational drug or product" does not include controlled substances in schedule I, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (X) "Product," when used in reference to an investigational drug or product, means a biological product, other than a drug, that is made from a natural human, animal, or microorganism source and is intended to treat a disease or medical condition. (Y) "Third-party logistics provider" means a person that provides or coordinates warehousing or other logistics services pertaining to dangerous drugs including distribution, on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale distributor, or terminal distributor of dangerous drugs, but does not take ownership of the drugs or have responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of the drugs. (Z) "Repackager of dangerous drugs" or "repackager" means a person that repacks and relabels dangerous drugs for sale or distribution. (AA) "Outsourcing facility" means a facility that is engaged in the compounding and sale of sterile drugs and is registered as an outsourcing facility with the United States food and drug administration. (BB) "Laboratory" means a laboratory licensed under this chapter as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs and entrusted to have custody of any of the following drugs and to use the drugs for scientific and clinical purposes and for purposes of instruction: dangerous drugs that are not controlled substances, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; dangerous drugs that are controlled substances, as defined in that section; and controlled substances in schedule I, as defined in that section. (CC) "Overdose reversal drug" means both of the following: (1) Naloxone; (2) Any other drug that the state board of pharmacy, through rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, designates as a drug that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the reversal of a known or suspected opioid-related overdose. Sec. 4729.513. A manufacturer of dangerous drugs may donate inhalers, as defined in section 3313.7113 of the Revised Code, epinephrine delivery systems, as defined in section 3313.718 of the Revised Code, or injectable or nasally administered glucagon to any of the following: (A) The board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; (B) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (C) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (D) A college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (E) A chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; (F)(E) A residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code; (G)(F) A child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; (H)(G) A child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4729.541. (A) Except as provided in divisions (B) and (C) of this section, all of the following are exempt from licensure as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs: (1) A licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs; (2) A business entity that is a corporation formed under division (B) of section 1701.03 of the Revised Code, a limited liability company formed under former Chapter 1705. of the Revised Code as that chapter existed prior to February 11, 2022, or Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code, or a professional association formed under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code if the entity has a sole shareholder who is a prescriber and is authorized to provide the professional services being offered by the entity; (3) A business entity that is a corporation formed under division (B) of section 1701.03 of the Revised Code, a limited liability company formed under former Chapter 1705. of the Revised Code as that chapter existed prior to February 11, 2022, or Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code, a partnership or a limited liability partnership formed under Chapter 1775. of the Revised Code, or a professional association formed under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code, if, to be a shareholder, member, or partner, an individual is required to be licensed, certified, or otherwise legally authorized under Title XLVII of the Revised Code to perform the professional service provided by the entity and each such individual is a prescriber; (4) An individual who holds a current license, certificate, or registration issued under Title XLVII of the Revised Code and has been certified to conduct diabetes education by a national certifying body specified in rules adopted by the state board of pharmacy under section 4729.68 of the Revised Code, but only with respect to insulin that will be used for the purpose of diabetes education and only if diabetes education is within the individual's scope of practice under statutes and rules regulating the individual's profession; (5) An individual who holds a valid certificate issued by a nationally recognized S.C.U.B.A. diving certifying organization approved by the state board of pharmacy under rules adopted by the board, but only with respect to medical oxygen that will be used for the purpose of emergency care or treatment at the scene of a diving emergency; (6) With respect to epinephrine delivery systems that may be possessed under section 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, or 3326.28, or 3328.29 of the Revised Code, any of the following: the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; or a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (7) With respect to epinephrine delivery systems that may be possessed under section 5180.26 of the Revised Code, any of the following: a residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code; a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (8) With respect to epinephrine autoinjectors that may be possessed under Chapter 3728. of the Revised Code, a qualified entity, as defined in section 3728.01 of the Revised Code; (9) With respect to inhalers that may be possessed under section 3313.7113, 3313.7114, 3314.144, or 3326.30, or 3328.30 of the Revised Code, any of the following: the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; or a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (10) With respect to inhalers that may be possessed under section 5180.261 of the Revised Code, any of the following: a residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code; a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (11) With respect to overdose reversal drugs that may be possessed for the purposes described in section 3715.50 of the Revised Code, any person or government entity exercising the authority conferred by that section; (12) With respect to overdose reversal drugs that may be possessed for use in personally furnishing supplies of the drug pursuant to a protocol established under section 3715.503 of the Revised Code, any individual exercising the authority conferred by that section; (13) With respect to injectable or nasally administered glucagon that may be possessed under sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, and 3326.60, and 3328.38 of the Revised Code, any of the following: the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; or a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (14) With respect to injectable or nasally administered glucagon that may be possessed under section 5180.262 of the Revised Code, any of the following: a residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code; a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (15) A person who possesses nitrous oxide for use as a direct ingredient in food pursuant to 21 C.F.R. 184.1545 or for testing or maintaining a plumbing or heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system; (16) A person who possesses medical oxygen, sterile water, or sterile saline for direct administration to patients or for the purpose of installation or maintenance of home medical equipment, as defined in section 4752.01 of the Revised Code; (17) A facility that is owned and operated by the United States department of defense, the United States department of veterans affairs, or any other federal agency. (B) If a person described in division (A) of this section is a pain management clinic or is operating a pain management clinic, the person shall hold a license as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs with a pain management clinic classification issued under section 4729.552 of the Revised Code. (C) Any of the persons described in divisions (A)(1) to (16) of this section shall hold a license as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs in order to possess, have custody or control of, and distribute any of the following: (1) Dangerous drugs that are compounded or used for the purpose of compounding; (2) A schedule I, II, III, IV, or V controlled substance, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.433. (A) As used in this section, "epinephrine delivery system" has the same meaning as in section 3313.718 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any conflicting provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician assistant who holds a license issued under this chapter and a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority may do any of the following without having examined an individual to whom epinephrine may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with Chapter 3728. of the Revised Code; (b) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine delivery systems for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code; (c) Issue a prescription for epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with Chapter 3728. of the Revised Code; (d) Issue a prescription for epinephrine delivery systems for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code. (2) An epinephrine autoinjector personally furnished or prescribed under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (C) A physician assistant who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which an epinephrine delivery system, including an autoinjector, is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4730.437. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician assistant who holds a valid prescriber number issued by the board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom glucagon may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5180.262 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for injectable or nasally administered glucagon in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5180.262 of the Revised Code. (2) Injectable or nasally administered glucagon personally furnished or prescribed under division (A)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (B) A physician assistant who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which injectable or nasally administered glucagon is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4731.92. (A) As used in this section, "physician" means an individual authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom glucagon may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5180.262 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5180.262 of the Revised Code. (2) Injectable or nasally administered glucagon personally furnished or prescribed under division (B)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (C) A physician who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which injectable or nasally administered glucagon is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4731.96. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Epinephrine delivery system" has the same meaning as in section 3313.718 of the Revised Code. (2) "Physician" means an individual authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any conflicting provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician may do any of the following without having examined an individual to whom epinephrine may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with Chapter 3728. of the Revised Code; (b) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine delivery systems for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code; (c) Issue a prescription for epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with Chapter 3728. of the Revised Code; (d) Issue a prescription for epinephrine delivery systems for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code. (2) An epinephrine autoinjector personally furnished or prescribed under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (C) A physician who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which an epinephrine delivery system, including an autoinjector, is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 5104.53. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Family services program" has the same meaning as in section 5101.35 of the Revised Code. (2) "IEP" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Ohio works first" has the same meaning as in section 5107.02 of the Revised Code. (4) "Resource caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (5) "Supplemental nutrition assistance program" means the program administered by the department of job and family services pursuant to section 5101.54 of the Revised Code. (B) The early childhood education grant program is created in the department of children and youth. Subject to available funds, the program shall support and invest in early learning and development programs operating in this state by awarding grants to programs that meet the conditions of this section in an amount that corresponds to the number of eligible children served by the programs. (C) To be eligible for a grant under this section, an early learning and development program shall meet each of the following conditions: (1) The program is rated through the step up to quality program established under section 5104.29 of the Revised Code at the tiered rating specified by the department in rules adopted under this section. (2) The program provides early learning and development services to one or more preschool-age children described in division (D) of this section. (3) The program meets any other eligibility condition specified by the department in rules adopted under this section. (D) A preschool-age child who meets all of the following conditions, as determined by a the early learning and development program in consultation with the county department of job and family services, is eligible to participate in the early childhood education grant program if a slot is available: (1) Either the amount of the child's family income does not exceed two hundred per cent of the federal poverty line or the child meets one of the following conditions: (a) An IEP has been developed for the child; (b) The child is placed with a resource caregiver as described in Chapter 5103. of the Revised Code, with such placement documented by either a family case plan or kinship permanency incentive payments; (c) The child is homeless as described in division (V) of section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; (d) The child has exited the state's part C early intervention services program implemented pursuant to sections 5180.30 to 5180.32 of the Revised Code as documented by an individual family service plan; (e) The child is a medicaid recipient or is part of a household or assistance group that receives supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits or participates in the Ohio works first program. (2) The child is a citizen of the United States or a qualified alien. (3) The child meets any other eligibility condition specified by the department in rules adopted under this section. (E) The family of a child who is eligible to participate under this section may elect to utilize the early childhood education grant program instead of another source of state funding for child care. (F) An early learning and development program that utilized the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code to track a child's attendance for the early childhood education grant program prior to the effective date of this amendment shall continue to use that system for attendance. (G) Any funds appropriated to the department for purposes of the early childhood education grant program shall be used as follows: (1) In each fiscal year, not more than two per cent of appropriated funds shall be used for program support and technical assistance. (2) Appropriated funds other than those described in division (E)(1)(G)(1) of this section shall be distributed to grant recipients to be used to provide early learning and development services. (3) Any remaining funds beyond those required under divisions (G)(1) and (2) of this section may be awarded to new or existing grant recipients under this section to allow more children to participate in the program or support program expansion, improvement, innovation, or new pilot programs. Funds used under division (G)(3) of this section shall be targeted for high-need areas. (F)(H) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director shall adopt rules to implement this section and administer the early childhood education grant program, including rules addressing all of the following topics: (1) Eligibility conditions and other requirements for participation in the grant program by early learning and development programs, including the tiered rating at which a program becomes eligible to participate; (2) Eligibility conditions for children participating in the early childhood education grant program if a slot is available; (3) Standards, procedures, and requirements to apply for and distribute funds to participating early learning and development programs; (4) In the event funds are distributed in error under the program, methods by which the department may recover those funds. (G)(I) The award of an early childhood education grant under this section shall not be considered publicly funded child care or a family services program. Sec. 5502.262. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Administrator" means the superintendent, principal, chief administrative officer, or other person having supervisory authority of any of the following: (a) A city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district; (b) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, as required through reference in division (A)(11)(d) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code; (c) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, as required through reference in section 3326.11 of the Revised Code; (d) A college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (e) A district or school operating a career-technical education program approved by the department of education and workforce under section 3317.161 of the Revised Code; (f)(e) A chartered nonpublic school; (g)(f) An educational service center; (h)(g) A preschool program or school-age child care program licensed by the department of children and youth; (i)(h) Any other facility that primarily provides educational services to children subject to regulation by the department of education and workforce. (2) "Emergency management test" means a regularly scheduled drill, exercise, or activity designed to assess and evaluate an emergency management plan under this section. (3) "Building" means any school, school building, facility, program, or center. (4) "Regional mobile training officer" means the regional mobile training officer appointed under section 5502.70 of the Revised Code for the region in which a district, school, center, program, or facility is located. (B)(1) Each administrator shall develop and adopt a comprehensive emergency management plan, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section, for each building under the administrator's control. The administrator shall examine the environmental conditions and operations of each building to determine potential hazards to student and staff safety and shall propose operating changes to promote the prevention of potentially dangerous problems and circumstances. In developing the plan for each building, the administrator shall involve community law enforcement and safety officials, parents of students who are assigned to the building, and teachers and nonteaching employees who are assigned to the building. The administrator may involve the regional mobile training officer in the development of the plan. The administrator shall incorporate remediation strategies into the plan for any building where documented safety problems have occurred. (2) Each administrator shall also incorporate into the emergency management plan adopted under division (B)(1) of this section all of the following: (a) A protocol for addressing serious threats to the safety of property, students, employees, or administrators; (b) A protocol for responding to any emergency events that occur and compromise the safety of property, students, employees, or administrators. This protocol shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (i) A floor plan that is unique to each floor of the building; (ii) A site plan that includes all building property and surrounding property; (iii) An emergency contact information sheet. (c) A threat assessment plan developed as prescribed in section 5502.263 of the Revised Code. A building may use the model plan developed by the department of public safety under that section; (d) A protocol for school threat assessment teams established under section 3313.669 of the Revised Code; (e) A protocol that addresses student use of cellular telephones during an active threat or emergency. (3) Each protocol described in division (B) of this section shall include procedures determined to be appropriate by the administrator for responding to threats and emergency events, respectively, including such things as notification of appropriate law enforcement personnel, calling upon specified emergency response personnel for assistance, and informing parents of affected students. Prior to the opening day of each school year, the administrator shall inform each student or child enrolled in the school and the student's or child's parent of the parental notification procedures included in the protocol. (4) Each administrator shall keep a copy of the emergency management plan adopted pursuant to this section in a secure place. (C)(1) The administrator shall submit to the director of public safety, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section, an electronic copy of the emergency management plan prescribed by division (B) of this section not less than once every three years, whenever a major modification to the building requires changes in the procedures outlined in the plan, and whenever information on the emergency contact information sheet changes. (2) The administrator also shall file a copy of the plan with each law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the school building and, upon request, to any of the following: (a) The fire department that serves the political subdivision in which the building is located; (b) The emergency medical service organization that serves the political subdivision in which the building is located; (c) The county emergency management agency for the county in which the building is located; (d) The regional mobile training officer. (3) Upon receipt of an emergency management plan, the director shall post the information on the contact and information management system and submit the information in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section, to the attorney general, who shall post that information on the Ohio law enforcement gateway or its successor. (4) Any department or entity to which copies of an emergency management plan are filed under this section shall keep the copies in a secure place. (D)(1) Not later than the first day of September of each year, each administrator shall review the emergency management plan and certify to the director that the plan is current and accurate. (2) Anytime that an administrator updates the emergency management plan pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, the administrator shall file copies, not later than the tenth day after the revision is adopted and in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section, to the director and to any entity with which the administrator filed a copy under division (C)(2) of this section. (E) Each administrator shall do both of the following: (1) Prepare and conduct at least one annual emergency management test, as defined in division (A)(2) of this section, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section; (2) Grant access to each building under the control of the administrator to law enforcement personnel and to entities described in division (C)(2) of this section, to enable the personnel and entities to hold training sessions for responding to threats and emergency events affecting the building, provided that the access occurs outside of student instructional hours and the administrator, or the administrator's designee, is present in the building during the training sessions. (F) The director of public safety, in consultation with representatives from the education community and in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules regarding emergency management plans under this section, including the content of the plans and procedures for filing the plans. The rules shall specify that plans and information required under division (B) of this section be submitted on standardized forms developed by the director for such purpose. The rules shall also specify the requirements and procedures for emergency management tests conducted pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section. Failure to comply with the rules may result in discipline pursuant to section 3319.31 of the Revised Code or any other action against the administrator as prescribed by rule. (G) Division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code applies to any administrator who is subject to the requirements of this section and is not exempt under division (H) of this section and who is an applicant for a license or holds a license from the state board of education pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) The director may exempt any administrator from the requirements of this section, if the director determines that the requirements do not otherwise apply to a building or buildings under the control of that administrator. (2) The director shall exempt from the requirements of this section the administrator of an online learning school, established under section 3302.42 of the Revised Code, unless students of that school participate in in-person instruction or assessments at a location that is not covered by an existing emergency management plan, developed under this section as of December 14, 2021. (I) Copies of the emergency management plan, including all records related to the plan, emergency management tests, and information required under division (B) of this section are security records and are not public records pursuant to section 149.433 of the Revised Code. In addition, the information posted to the contact and information management system, pursuant to division (C)(3)(b) of this section, is exempt from public disclosure or release in accordance with sections 149.43, 149.433, and 5502.03 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding section 149.433 of the Revised Code, a floor plan filed with the attorney general pursuant to this section is not a public record to the extent it is a record kept by the attorney general. Sec. 5705.212. (A)(1) The board of education of any school district, at any time and by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may declare by resolution that the amount of taxes that may be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district, that it is necessary to levy not more than five taxes in excess of that limitation for current expenses, and that each of the proposed taxes first will be levied in a different year, over a specified period of time. The board shall identify the taxes proposed under this section as follows: the first tax to be levied shall be called the "original tax." Each tax subsequently levied shall be called an "incremental tax." The rate of each incremental tax shall be identical, but the rates of such incremental taxes need not be the same as the rate of the original tax. The resolution also shall state that the question of these additional taxes shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election. The resolution shall specify separately for each tax proposed: the amount of the increase in rate that it is necessary to levy, expressed separately for the original tax and each incremental tax; that the purpose of the levy is for current expenses; the number of years during which the original tax shall be in effect; a specification that the last year in which the original tax is in effect shall also be the last year in which each incremental tax shall be in effect; and the year in which each tax first is proposed to be levied. The original tax may be levied for any number of years not exceeding ten, or for a continuing period of time. The resolution shall specify the date of holding the special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after the adoption and certification of the resolution and shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. (2) The board of education, by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may adopt a resolution proposing to renew taxes levied other than for a continuing period of time under division (A)(1) of this section. Such a resolution shall provide for levying a tax and specify all of the following: (a) That the tax shall be called and designated on the ballot as a renewal levy; (b) The rate of the renewal tax, which shall be a single rate that combines the rate of the original tax and each incremental tax into a single rate. The rate of the renewal tax shall not exceed the aggregate rate of the original and incremental taxes. (c) The number of years, not to exceed ten, that the renewal tax will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (d) That the purpose of the renewal levy is for current expenses; (e) Subject to the certification and notification requirements of section 5705.251 of the Revised Code, that the question of the renewal levy shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at the general election held during the last year the original tax may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate or at a special election held during the ensuing year. (3) A resolution adopted under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall go into immediate effect upon its adoption and no publication of the resolution is necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. Immediately after its adoption, a copy of the resolution shall be certified to the board of elections of the proper county in the manner provided by division (A) of section 5705.251 of the Revised Code, and that division shall govern the arrangements for the submission of the question and other matters concerning the election to which that section refers. The election shall be held on the date specified in the resolution. If a majority of the electors voting on the question so submitted in an election vote in favor of the taxes or a renewal tax, the board of education, if the original or a renewal tax is authorized to be levied for the current year, immediately may make the necessary levy within the school district at the authorized rate, or at any lesser rate in excess of the ten-mill limitation, for the purpose stated in the resolution. No tax shall be imposed prior to the year specified in the resolution as the year in which it is first proposed to be levied. The rate of the original tax and the rate of each incremental tax shall be cumulative, so that the aggregate rate levied in any year is the sum of the rates of both the original tax and all incremental taxes levied in or prior to that year under the same proposal. A tax levied for a continuing period of time under this section may be reduced pursuant to section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding section 133.30 of the Revised Code, after the approval of a tax to be levied in the current or the succeeding year and prior to the time when the first tax collection from that levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in an amount not to exceed fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. The notes shall be sold as provided in Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. If anticipation notes are issued, they shall mature serially and in substantially equal amounts during each year over a period not to exceed five years; and the amount necessary to pay the interest and principal as the anticipation notes mature shall be deemed appropriated for those purposes from the levy, and appropriations from the levy by the board of education shall be limited each fiscal year to the balance available in excess of that amount. If the auditor of state has certified a deficit pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, the notes authorized under this section may be sold in accordance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, except that the board may sell the notes after providing a reasonable opportunity for competitive bidding. (C)(1) The board of education of a qualifying school district, at any time and by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that it is necessary to levy not more than five taxes in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the current expenses of partnering community schools and, if any of the levy proceeds are so allocated, of the school district, and that each of the proposed taxes first will be levied in a different year, over a specified period of time. A qualifying school district that is not a municipal school district may allocate all of the levy proceeds to partnering community schools. A municipal school district shall allocate a portion of the levy proceeds to the current expenses of the district. The board shall identify the taxes proposed under this division in the same manner as in division (A)(1) of this section. The rate of each incremental tax shall be identical, but the rates of such incremental taxes need not be the same as the rate of the original tax. In addition to the specifications required of the resolution in division (A) of this section, the resolution shall state the number of the mills to be levied each year for the current expenses of the partnering community schools and the number of the mills, if any, to be levied each year for the current expenses of the school district. The number of mills for the current expenses of partnering community schools shall be the same for each of the incremental taxes, and the number of mills for the current expenses of the qualifying school district shall be the same for each of the incremental taxes. The levy of taxes for the current expenses of a partnering community school under division (C) of this section and the distribution of proceeds from the tax by a qualifying school district to partnering community schools is hereby determined to be a proper public purpose. (2) The board of education, by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may adopt a resolution proposing to renew taxes levied other than for a continuing period of time under division (C)(1) of this section. In such a renewal levy, the rates allocated to the qualifying school district and to partnering community schools each may be increased or decreased or remain the same, and the total rate may be decreased or remain the same. In addition to the requirements of division (A)(2) of this section, the resolution shall state the number of the mills to be levied for the current expenses of the partnering community schools and the number of the mills to be levied for the current expenses of the school district. (3) A resolution adopted under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section is subject to the rules and procedures prescribed by division (A)(3) of this section. (4) The proceeds of each tax levied under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section shall be credited and distributed in the manner prescribed by division (B)(3) of section 5705.21 of the Revised Code, and divisions (B)(4), (5), and (6) of that section apply to taxes levied under division (C) of this section. (5) Notwithstanding section 133.30 of the Revised Code, after the approval of a tax to be levied under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section, in the current or succeeding year and prior to the time when the first tax collection from that levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy for the current expenses of the qualifying school district and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy and allocated to the school district. The portion of levy proceeds to be allocated to partnering community schools shall not be included in the estimated proceeds anticipated under this division and shall not be used to pay debt charges on any anticipation notes. The notes shall be sold as provided in Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. If anticipation notes are issued, they shall mature serially and in substantially equal amounts during each year over a period not to exceed five years. The amount necessary to pay the interest and principal as the anticipation notes mature shall be deemed appropriated for those purposes from the levy, and appropriations from the levy by the board of education shall be limited each fiscal year to the balance available in excess of that amount. If the auditor of state has certified a deficit pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, the notes authorized under this section may be sold in accordance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, except that the board may sell the notes after providing a reasonable opportunity for competitive bidding. As used in division (C) of this section, "qualifying school district" and "partnering community schools" have the same meanings as in section 5705.21 of the Revised Code. (D) The submission of questions to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. (E) When a school board certifies a resolution to the county auditor under division (B)(1) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code proposing to levy a tax under division (A)(1) or (C)(1) of this section, the county auditor shall certify, in addition to the other information the auditor is required to certify under that section, an estimate of both the levy's annual collections for the tax year for which the original tax applies and the levies' aggregate annual collections for the tax year for which the final incremental tax applies, in both cases rounded to the nearest dollar, which shall be calculated assuming that the amount of the tax list of the taxing authority remains throughout the life of the levy the same as the amount of the tax list most recently certified by the county auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code. If a school district is located in more than one county, the county auditor shall obtain from the county auditor of each other county in which the district is located the current tax valuation for the portion of the district in that county. Sec. 5705.213. (A)(1) The board of education of any school district, at any time and by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may declare by resolution that the amount of taxes that may be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district and that it is necessary to levy a tax in excess of that limitation for current expenses. The resolution also shall state that the question of the additional tax shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election. The resolution shall specify, for each year the levy is in effect, the amount of money that the levy is proposed to raise, which may, for years after the first year the levy is made, be expressed in terms of a dollar or percentage increase over the prior year's amount. The resolution also shall specify that the purpose of the levy is for current expenses, the number of years during which the tax shall be in effect which may be for any number of years not exceeding ten, and the year in which the tax first is proposed to be levied. The resolution shall specify the date of holding the special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety-five days after the adoption and certification of the resolution to the county auditor and not earlier than ninety days after certification to the board of elections. The date of the election shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. (2) The board of education, by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may adopt a resolution proposing to renew a tax levied under division (A)(1) of this section. Such a resolution shall provide for levying a tax and specify all of the following: (a) That the tax shall be called and designated on the ballot as a renewal levy; (b) The amount of the renewal tax, which shall be no more than the amount of tax levied during the last year the tax being renewed is authorized to be in effect; (c) The number of years, not to exceed ten, that the renewal tax will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (d) That the purpose of the renewal levy is for current expenses; (e) Subject to the certification and notification requirements of section 5705.251 of the Revised Code, that the question of the renewal levy shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at the general election held during the last year the tax being renewed may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate or at a special election held during the ensuing year. (3) A resolution adopted under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall go into immediate effect upon its adoption and no publication of the resolution is necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. Immediately after its adoption, a copy of the resolution shall be certified to the county auditor of the proper county, who shall, within ten days, calculate and certify to the board of education the estimated levy, for the first year, and for each subsequent year for which the tax is proposed to be in effect. The estimates shall be made both in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's market value. In making the estimates, the auditor shall assume that the amount of the tax list remains throughout the life of the levy, the same as the tax list most recently certified by the county auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code. If the board desires to proceed with the submission of the question, it shall certify its resolution, with the estimated tax levy expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's market value for each year that the tax is proposed to be in effect, to the board of elections of the proper county in the manner provided by division (A) of section 5705.251 of the Revised Code. Section 5705.251 of the Revised Code shall govern the arrangements for the submission of the question and other matters concerning the election to which that section refers. The election shall be held on the date specified in the resolution. If a majority of the electors voting on the question so submitted in an election vote in favor of the tax, and if the tax is authorized to be levied for the current year, the board of education immediately may make the additional levy necessary to raise the amount specified in the resolution or a lesser amount for the purpose stated in the resolution. (4) The submission of questions to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding section 133.30 of the Revised Code, after the approval of a tax to be levied in the current or the succeeding year and prior to the time when the first tax collection from that levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in an amount not to exceed fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. The notes shall be sold as provided in Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. If anticipation notes are issued, they shall mature serially and in substantially equal amounts during each year over a period not to exceed five years; and the amount necessary to pay the interest and principal as the anticipation notes mature shall be deemed appropriated for those purposes from the levy, and appropriations from the levy by the board of education shall be limited each fiscal year to the balance available in excess of that amount. If the auditor of state has certified a deficit pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, the notes authorized under this section may be sold in accordance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, except that the board may sell the notes after providing a reasonable opportunity for competitive bidding. Sec. 5753.11. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public school district" means any city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. "Public school district" does not include any STEM school operated under section 3326.51 of the Revised Code. (2) "Student population" means the number of students residing in a county who are enrolled in a public school district in grades kindergarten through twelve and the total number of preschool children with disabilities on the following dates: (a) For the January distribution, the Friday of the first full school week in October; (b) For the August distribution, the Friday of the first full school week in May. (B) For the purpose of calculating student population, each public school district shall, twice annually, report to the department of education and workforce the students enrolled in the district on the days specified in division (A)(2) of this section. A student shall be considered to be enrolled in a public school district if the student is participating in education programs of the public school district and the public school district has not: (1) Received documentation from a parent terminating enrollment of the student; (2) Been provided documentation of a student's enrollment in another public or private school; or (3) Ceased to offer education to the student. If more than one public school district reports a student as enrolled, the department shall use procedures adopted by the department for the reconciliation of enrollment to determine the district of enrollment for purposes of this section. In the case of the dual enrollment of a student in a joint vocational school district and another public school district, the student shall be included in the enrollments for both schools. If the valid school district or enrollment cannot be determined in time for the certification, the count of these students shall be divided equally between the reporting districts. (C) The department of education and workforce shall certify to the department of taxation the student population for each county and the student population for each public school district located in whole or in part in the county on or before the thirtieth day of December, for the January distribution and on or before the thirtieth day of July, for the August distribution. A student shall be included in the school district enrollment for a county only if a student resides in that county. The location of each community school shall be the enrollment area required to be defined by the community school and its sponsor in accordance with division (A)(19) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code, and the location of each STEM school shall be any county in which its enrolled students reside, and the location of the college-preparatory boarding schools shall be the territory of the school district in which the college-preparatory school is located or the territory of any city, exempted village, or local school district that has agreed to be a participating district under section 3328.04 of the Revised Code. The student population count certified by the department of education and workforce to the department of taxation is final and shall not be adjusted by future updates to the counts. (D) Not later than the thirty-first day of January and the thirty-first day of August of each year, the tax commissioner shall distribute funds in the gross casino revenue county student fund to public school districts. The commissioner shall calculate the amount of funds to distribute to each public school district as follows: (1) The commissioner shall calculate the proportional share of the funds attributable to each county by dividing the total student population certified for each county by the sum of the total student population certified in all counties statewide. (2) The commissioner shall multiply the amount in division (D)(1) of this section by the total amount of funds in the gross casino revenue county student fund to obtain the share of funds for each county. (3) The commissioner shall multiply the amount in division (D)(2) of this section by the quotient of the student population certified for each individual district located in the county divided by the sum of the student population certified for all public school districts located in the county. The commissioner shall distribute to each public school district the amount so calculated for each district. Sec. 6109.121. (A) The director of environmental protection shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that do all of the following: (1) Require the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system to conduct sampling of the system for lead and copper; (2) Establish a schedule for lead and copper sampling applicable to the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system that, at a minimum, does both of the following: (a) Allows the director, in establishing the schedule, to consider the following factors when determining if a community or nontransient noncommunity water system must conduct sampling at least once annually: (i) The age of the water system; (ii) Whether corrosion control requirements are met; (iii) Any other relevant risk factors, as determined by the director, including aging infrastructure likely to contain lead service lines. (b) Requires the owner or operator of a system where such risk factors are identified to conduct sampling at least once annually until the risk factors are mitigated in accordance with rules. (3) Require the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system to provide collected samples to a certified laboratory for analysis; (4) Authorize the director to require additional sampling for pH level and other water quality parameters to determine if corrosion control requirements are met; (5) Authorize the director to establish corrosion control requirements for community and nontransient noncommunity water systems; (6) Require the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system to conduct a new or updated corrosion control treatment study and submit a new or updated corrosion control treatment plan not later than eighteen months after any of the following events: (a) The system changes or adds a source from which water is obtained. (b) The system makes a substantial change in water treatment. (c) The system operates outside of acceptable ranges for lead, copper, pH, or other corrosion indicators, as determined by the director. (d) Any other event determined by the director to have the potential to impact the water quality or corrosiveness of water in the system. (7) Authorize the director to waive the requirement to conduct a new or updated corrosion control study established in rules adopted under division (A)(6) of this section in appropriate circumstances; (8) When the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system is required to complete a corrosion control treatment study and submit a plan in accordance with rules adopted under division (A)(6) of this section, require the owner or operator to complete the study and submit the plan to the director for approval even if sampling results conducted subsequent to the initiation of the study and plan do not exceed the lead action level established in rules adopted under this chapter; (9) When the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system is required to complete a corrosion control treatment study and submit a plan in accordance with rules adopted under division (A)(6) of this section, require the owner or operator to submit to the director an interim status report of actions taken to implement the corrosion control study six months and twelve months from the date of initiation of the corrosion control study requirement; (10) Establish a lead threshold for individual taps; (11) Establish and revise content for public education materials; (12) Authorize the director to develop procedures and requirements to document that notices were provided by the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system as required under the rules adopted under division (A)(15) of this section; (13) Authorize the director to assess administrative penalties in accordance with section 6109.23 of the Revised Code for violations of the notice requirements established in rules adopted under divisions (A)(15)(b) and (c)(i) of this section; (14) Require a laboratory that receives a lead or copper tap water sample from a community or nontransient noncommunity water system to do both of the following: (a) Complete a lead or copper analysis of the sample, as applicable, not later than thirty business days after the receipt of the sample; (b) Not later than the end of the next business day following the day the analysis of the sample is completed, report the results of the analysis and all identifying information about where the sample was collected to the community or nontransient noncommunity water system and the director. (15) Require the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system to do all of the following, as applicable, with regard to laboratory results received under rules adopted under division (A)(14) of this section: (a) If the laboratory results show that a sample from an individual tap is below the applicable lead threshold as established in rules adopted under this chapter, provide notice of the results of each individual tap sample to the owner and persons served at the residence or other structure where the tap was sampled within a time period specified in rules that is not more than thirty business days after the receipt of the laboratory results; (b) If the results show that a sample from an individual tap is above the applicable lead threshold as established under rules adopted under this chapter, provide notice of the results of each individual tap sample to the owner and persons served at the residence or other structure where the tap was sampled within a time period specified in rules that is not more than two business days after the receipt of the laboratory results, and do all of the following, as applicable: (i) For the owner or operator of a nontransient noncommunity water system, immediately remove from service all fixtures identified as contributing to elevated lead levels; (ii) For the owner or operator of a community water system, include in the system's annual consumer confidence report the lead or copper laboratory results, an explanation of the associated health risks, what actions consumers of the system can take to reduce health risks, and the actions the system is taking to reduce public exposure; (iii) Not later than two business days after the receipt of the laboratory results, provide information on the availability of health screening and blood lead level testing to the owner and persons served at the residence or other structure where the sample was collected and provide notice of the laboratory results to the applicable local board of health. (c) If the laboratory results show that the community or nontransient noncommunity water system exceeds the lead action level established in rules adopted under this chapter, do all of the following, as applicable: (i) Not later than two business days after the receipt of the laboratory results, provide notice to all of the system's water consumers that the system exceeds the lead action level. The owner or operator shall provide the notice in a form specified by the director. (ii) Not later than five business days after the receipt of the laboratory results by the owner or operator of a community water system, provide information on the availability of tap water testing for lead to all consumers served by the system who are known or likely to have lead service lines, lead pipes, or lead solder as identified in the map required to be completed by rules adopted under division (A)(18) of this section; (iii) Not later than thirty business days after the receipt of the laboratory results, make an analysis of laboratory results available to all consumers served by the system, comply with public education requirements established in rules adopted under this chapter that apply when a public water system exceeds the lead action level, and provide information to consumers served by the system about the availability of health screenings and blood lead level testing in the area served by the water system; (iv) Subject to rules adopted under division (A)(7) of this section, perform a corrosion control treatment study and submit a corrosion control treatment plan to the director not later than eighteen months after the date on which laboratory results were received by the owner or operator indicating that the system exceeded the lead action level. (16) Require that not later than five business days after the receipt of the laboratory results, the owner or operator shall certify to the director that the owner or operator has complied with the requirements of rules adopted under divisions (A)(15)(b), (A)(15)(c)(i), and (A)(15)(c)(ii) of this section, as applicable. (17) Require that if the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system fails to provide the notices required under rules adopted under division (A)(15)(b) or (c)(i) of this section, the director shall provide those notices beginning ten business days from the date that the director receives laboratory results under the rules adopted under division (A)(14) of this section. (18) Require the owner or operator of a community or nontransient noncommunity water system to submit a map to the director showing areas of the system that are known or are likely to contain lead service lines and identifying characteristics of buildings served by the system that may contain lead piping, solder, or fixtures. The rules shall, at a minimum, require the owner or operator to do all of the following: (a) Submit a copy of the applicable map to the department of health and the department of job and family services; (b) Submit a report to the director containing at least the applicable map and a list of sampling locations that are tier I sites used to collect samples as required by rules adopted under this chapter, including contact information for the owner and occupant of each sampling site; (c) Update and resubmit the information required by divisions (A)(18)(a) and (b) of this section according to a schedule determined by the director, but not less frequently than required under the Safe Drinking Water Act. (B) The director shall post information on the environmental protection agency's web site about sources of funding that are available to assist communities with lead service line identification and replacement and schools with fountain and water-service fixture replacement. (C) As required by the director, an owner or operator of a nontransient noncommunity water system that is a school or child care center shall collect additional tap water samples in buildings identified in the map required to be completed by rules adopted under division (A)(18) of this section. (D) As used in this section: (1) "Child care center" has the same meaning as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "School" means a school operated by the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the governing board of an educational service center, the governing authority of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, the governing body of a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, the board of trustees of a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or the governing authority of a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school. (3) "Local board of health" means the applicable board of health of a city or general health district or the authority having the duties of a board of health under section 3709.05 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 109.57, 109.803, 124.011, 133.06, 135.142, 135.143, 149.41, 2151.354, 2152.19, 2915.092, 2919.24, 2921.44, 3301.01, 3301.02, 3301.03, 3301.07, 3301.079, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0716, 3301.0730, 3301.111, 3301.12, 3301.133, 3301.45, 3301.52, 3301.85, 3302.01, 3302.02, 3302.021, 3302.03, 3302.034, 3302.035, 3302.04, 3302.05, 3302.07, 3302.10, 3302.12, 3302.13, 3302.151, 3302.17, 3302.21, 3302.41, 3307.01, 3309.01, 3309.011, 3310.03, 3310.14, 3310.522, 3311.242, 3311.741, 3311.80, 3313.11, 3313.411, 3313.413, 3313.483, 3313.603, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.612, 3313.614, 3313.618, 3313.6110, 3313.6111, 3313.6112, 3313.6113, 3313.6114, 3313.64, 3313.661, 3313.663, 3313.664, 3313.6611, 3313.7112, 3313.7118, 3313.753, 3313.814, 3313.902, 3314.016, 3314.017, 3314.02, 3314.031, 3314.034, 3314.35, 3314.351, 3314.353, 3314.362, 3315.42, 3316.03, 3316.04, 3316.06, 3316.14, 3317.02, 3317.023, 3317.03, 3317.18, 3317.25, 3319.2310, 3319.31, 3319.311, 3319.319, 3319.39, 3319.393, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3325.08, 3326.11, 3327.014, 3331.02, 3333.041, 3333.048, 3333.301, 3345.061, 3365.01, 3365.032, 3365.07, 3728.01, 3737.07, 3781.106, 3792.04, 4109.07, 4117.01, 4723.483, 4723.4811, 4729.01, 4729.513, 4729.541, 4730.433, 4730.437, 4731.92, 4731.96, 5104.53, 5502.262, 5705.212, 5705.213, 5753.11, and 6109.121 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 3301.28, 3301.68, 3302.032, 3302.036, 3302.042, 3302.06, 3302.061, 3302.062, 3302.063, 3302.064, 3302.065, 3302.066, 3302.067, 3302.068, 3313.484, 3313.487, 3313.488, 3313.489, 3313.4810, 3313.615, 3313.85, 3314.25, 3314.354, 3316.041, 3318.60, 3318.61, 3318.62, 3328.01, 3328.02, 3328.03, 3328.04, 3328.11, 3328.12, 3328.13, 3328.14, 3328.15, 3328.16, 3328.17, 3328.18, 3328.19, 3328.191, 3328.192, 3328.193, 3328.20, 3328.21, 3328.22, 3328.23, 3328.24, 3328.241, 3328.25, 3328.26, 3328.27, 3328.29, 3328.30, 3328.31, 3328.32, 3328.34, 3328.35, 3328.36, 3328.37, 3328.38, 3328.41, 3328.45, 3328.50, 3328.52, and 3328.99 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 4729.01 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 52, H.B. 96, S.B. 56, and S.B. 152, all of the 136th General Assembly. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________